Massachusetts, session 194th, H4000.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. To provide for the operations of the several departments, boards,
commissions and institutions of the commonwealth and other services of the commonwealth and
for certain permanent improvements and to meet certain requirements of law, the sums set forth
in this act, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified, are hereby
appropriated from the General Fund unless specifically designated otherwise, subject to the
provisions of law regulating the disbursement of public funds and the approval thereof for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. All sums appropriated under this act, including supplemental
and deficiency budgets, shall be expended in a manner reflecting and encouraging a policy of
nondiscrimination and equal opportunity for members of minority groups, women and persons
with a disability. All officials and employees of an agency, board, department, commission or
division receiving funds under this act shall take affirmative steps to ensure equality of
opportunity in the internal affairs of state government and in their relations with the public,
including those persons and organizations doing business with the commonwealth. Each agency,
board, department, commission and division of the commonwealth, in spending appropriated
sums and discharging its statutory responsibilities, shall adopt measures to ensure equal
opportunity in the areas of hiring, promotion, demotion or transfer, recruitment, layoff or
termination, rates of compensation, in-service or apprenticeship training programs and all other
terms and conditions of employment.

SECTION 1A. In accordance with Articles LXIII and CVII of the Articles of Amendment to the Constitution of the
Commonwealth and section 6D of chapter 29 of the General Laws, it is hereby declared that the amounts of revenue set
forth in this section by source for the respective funds of the commonwealth for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 are
necessary and sufficient to provide the means to defray the appropriations and expenditures from such funds for said
fiscal year as set forth and authorized in this act. The comptroller shall keep a distinct account of actual receipts from
each such source by each such fund to furnish the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means with quarterly statements comparing such receipts with the projected receipts
set forth in this section, and include a full statement comparing such actual and projected receipts in the annual report
for said fiscal year pursuant to section 12 of chapter 7A of the General Laws. The quarterly and annual reports shall also
include detailed statements of any other sources of revenue for the budgeted funds in addition to those specified in this
section.
Fiscal Year 2026 Revenue by Source and Budgeted Fund (in Millions)
All Commonwealth Other
Budgeted General Transportation Major Other
Revenue Source Funds Fund Fund Funds Funds
Alcoholic Beverages 98.1 98.1 . . .
Banks 18.7 18.7 . . .
Cigarettes 262.3 262.3 . . .
Corporations 4,078.2 4,078.2 . . .
Deeds 376.8 376.8 . . .
Fair Share 2,400.0 1,635.0 765.0 . .
Income 24,240.0 24,240.0 . . .
Inheritance and Estate 517.0 517.0 . . .
Insurance 784.3 757.3 . . 27.0
Marijuana Excise 185.9 . . 185.9 .
Motor Fuel 742.2 . 741.2 . 1.0
Public Utilities . . . . .
Room Occupancy 265.0 265.0 . . .
Sales - Regular 6,702.0 4,413.3 . . 2,288.7
Sales - Meals 1,725.0 1,725.0 . . .
Sales - Motor Vehicles 1,181.0 . 779.2 . 401.8
Miscellaneous 12.6 12.6 . . .
Fiscal Year 2026 Base Tax Revenue Estimate 43,589.0 38,399.2 2,285.4 185.9 2,718.5
Statutory Tax Transfers
Annual Contribution to the State Pension System -4,500.6 -4,500.6 . . .
Sales Tax Transfer to the MBTA -1,425.3 . . . -1,425.3
Sales Tax Transfer to the MSBA -1,265.3 . . . -1,265.3
UI Surcharge to the Workforce Training Trust Fund -27.0 . . . -27.0
Fair Share Transfer to Education and Transportation Fund -1,185.0 -1,185.0 . . .
Fair Share Transfer to Education and Transportation Reserve Fund -450.0 -450.0 . . .
Excess Capital Gains to the Stabilization Fund -133.1 -133.1 . . .
Excess Capital Gains Tax to Disaster Relief and Resiliency Fund -13.8 -13.8 . . .
Excess Capital Gains to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund -99.8 -99.8 . . .
Excess Capital Gains to the Pension Liability Fund -432.6 -432.6 . . .
Total Statutory Tax Transfers -9,532.5 -6,815.0 . . -2,717.6
Total Fiscal Year 2026 Consensus Tax Revenue Available for 34,056.5 31,584.2 2,285.4 185.9 1.0
Budget
Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue
Tax-Related Settlements & Judgments 50.0 50.0 . . .
Total Tax Initiatives and Other Tax Revenue 50.0 50.0 . . .
Total Taxes for Budget 34,106.5 31,634.2 2,285.4 185.9 1.0
Non-Tax Revenue
Federal Reimbursements 16,156.8 16,148.4 . . 8.4
Departmental Revenues 6,525.6 5,766.5 692.9 12.3 53.9
Consolidated Transfers 5,717.2 5,717.2 . . .
Total Non-Tax Revenue 28,399.5 27,632.1 692.9 12.3 62.3
Fiscal Year 2026 Grand Total 62,506.0 59,266.3 2,978.3 198.2 63.2

SECTION 1B. The comptroller shall keep a distinct account of actual receipts of non-tax revenues by each
department, board, commission or institution to furnish the executive office for administration and finance and the house
and senate committees on ways and means with quarterly statements comparing such receipts with projected receipts
set forth in this section and to include a full statement comparing such receipts with projected receipts in the annual
report for such fiscal year pursuant to section 12 of chapter 7A of the General Laws. The quarterly and annual reports
shall also include detailed statements of any other sources of revenue for the budgeted funds in addition to those
specified in this section.
Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Judiciary
Supreme Judicial Court $0 $2,183,220 $0 $2,183,220 $0
Committee for Public Counsel $0 $3,275,000 $0 $3,275,000 $0
Appeals Court $0 $315,317 $0 $315,317 $0
Trial Court $0 $61,634,000 $0 $61,634,000 $0
TOTAL: $0 $67,407,537 $0 $67,407,537 $0
District Attorneys
Middlesex District Attorney $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Plymouth District Attorney $0 $1,000 $0 $1,000 $0
Worcester District Attorney $0 $5,000 $0 $5,000 $0
TOTAL: $0 $6,000 $0 $6,000 $0
Governor
Office of the Governor $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
TOTAL: $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Secretary of the Commonwealth
Secretary of the Commonwealth $0 $296,118,673 $0 $295,609,384 $531,000
TOTAL: $0 $296,118,673 $0 $295,609,384 $531,000
Treasurer and Receiver General
Office of the Treasurer $0 $510,095,500 $604,814,937 $1,084,560,437 $65,584,951
Massachusetts Cultural Council $0 $16,000 $0 $16,000 $0
Massachusetts Teachers' Retirement Board $0 $40,000,000 $0 $40,000,000 $0
State Lottery Commission $0 $115,707,006 $1,238,645,216 $1,354,352,222 $0
TOTAL: $0 $665,818,506 $1,843,460,153 $2,478,928,659 $65,584,951
Attorney General
Office of the Attorney General $5,706,908 $51,942,184 $0 $50,240,797 $7,408,295
TOTAL: $5,706,908 $51,942,184 $0 $50,240,797 $7,408,295
State Ethics Commission
State Ethics Commission $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
TOTAL: $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Inspector General
Office of the Inspector General $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
TOTAL: $0 $1,680,000 $0 $0 $1,680,000
Office of Campaign and Political Finance

Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Office of Campaign and Political Finance $0 $54,500 $0 $54,500 $0
TOTAL: $0 $54,500 $0 $54,500 $0
Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination
Massachusetts Commission Against
Discrimination $3,499,236 $440,800 $0 $30,800 $3,909,236
TOTAL: $3,499,236 $440,800 $0 $30,800 $3,909,236
Office of the State Comptroller
Office of the State Comptroller $15,039,962 $8,582,897 $2,002,882,415 $2,020,011,506 $153,310,441
TOTAL: $15,039,962 $8,582,897 $2,002,882,415 $2,020,011,506 $153,310,441
Massachusetts Gaming Commission
Massachusetts Gaming Commission $0 $0 $638,966,438 $638,966,438 $0
TOTAL: $0 $0 $638,966,438 $638,966,438 $0
Cannabis Control Commission
Cannabis Control Commission $0 $20,281,406 $0 $20,281,406 $0
TOTAL: $0 $20,281,406 $0 $20,281,406 $0
Executive Office for Administration and
Finance
Secretary of Administration and Finance $0 $1,150,000 $0 $1,150,000 $27,084,188
Division of Capital Asset Management &
Maintenance $705,317 $4,580,073 $11,296,868 $4,570,073 $42,124,494
Civil Service Commission $0 $12,500 $0 $12,500 $0
Group Insurance Commission $0 $1,135,914,348 $409,862,157 $1,543,579,759 $2,196,746
Division of Administrative Law Appeals $0 $70,000 $0 $0 $70,000
Department of Revenue $63,125,570 $208,847,121 $0 $237,266,487 $34,706,204
Appellate Tax Board $0 $2,985,306 $0 $2,585,306 $400,000
Human Resources Division $70,890,182 $3,240,000 $0 $3,240,000 $141,780,363
Operational Services Division $0 $30,421,408 $0 $12,271,701 $37,473,712
TOTAL: $134,721,069 $1,387,220,756 $421,159,025 $1,804,675,826 $285,835,707
Executive Office of Technology Services
and Security
Executive Office of Technology Services and
Security $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $212,097,221
TOTAL: $0 $2,733,931 $0 $0 $212,097,221
Executive Office of Veterans' Services
Department of Veterans' Services $0 $760,000 $0 $0 $5,760,000
Chelsea Soldiers' Home $16,424,436 $2,078,384 $0 $18,502,820 $0
Holyoke Soldiers' Home $7,871,365 $1,518,702 $0 $7,200,424 $2,189,643
TOTAL: $24,295,801 $4,357,086 $0 $25,703,244 $7,949,643
Executive Office of Energy and
Environmental Affairs
Executive Office of Energy & Environmental
Affairs $25,000 $9,410,000 $0 $8,745,000 $7,247,316
Department of Public Utilities $0 $55,889,254 $0 $55,889,254 $0
Department of Environmental Protection $0 $34,723,982 $0 $28,638,164 $6,085,818

Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Department of Fish and Game $8,420,000 $14,412,489 $1,945,000 $24,309,500 $467,989
Department of Agricultural Resources $0 $6,846,325 $0 $6,846,325 $0
Department of Conservation and Recreation $0 $27,898,991 $0 $27,898,991 $0
Department of Energy Resources $0 $10,031,633 $0 $10,031,633 $0
TOTAL: $8,445,000 $159,212,674 $1,945,000 $162,358,867 $13,801,123
Executive Office of Health and Human
Services
Secretary of Health and Human Services $12,836,543,926 $2,256,468,318 $16,000,000 $14,779,012,244 $470,079,949
Mass Commission for the Blind $5,037,612 $7,500 $0 $5,045,112 $0
Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission $9,207,866 $40,000 $0 $9,247,866 $0
Mass Commission for the Deaf $246,064 $3,500 $0 $249,564 $6,450,000
Department of Youth Services $5,706,738 $130,000 $0 $5,836,738 $0
Department of Transitional Assistance $502,590,389 $925,000 $17,600,000 $521,115,389 $0
Department of Public Health $172,831,389 $121,913,282 $1,000,000 $146,505,364 $223,610,884
Department of Children and Families $351,707,551 $2,658,000 $700,000 $348,030,124 $7,035,427
Department of Mental Health $137,313,535 $26,644,612 $0 $163,833,147 $125,000
Department of Developmental Services $1,192,315,397 $3,875,621 $0 $1,196,191,018 $0
TOTAL: $15,213,500,467 $2,412,665,833 $35,300,000 $17,175,066,566 $707,301,260
Health Policy Commission
Health Policy Commission $0 $11,366,000 $0 $11,366,000 $0
TOTAL: $0 $11,366,000 $0 $11,366,000 $0
Center for Health Information and
Analysis
Center for Health Information and Analysis $0 $47,755,938 $0 $47,755,938 $0
TOTAL: $0 $47,755,938 $0 $47,755,938 $0
Board of Library Commissioners
Board of Library Commissioners $0 $3,200 $0 $3,200 $0
TOTAL: $0 $3,200 $0 $3,200 $0
Executive Office of Housing and Livable
Communities
Department of Housing & Livable
Communities $0 $6,897,012 $0 $3,325,500 $3,571,512
TOTAL: $0 $6,897,012 $0 $3,325,500 $3,571,512
Executive Office of Economic
Development
Executive Office of Housing and Economic
Development $0 $0 $2,492,000 $2,492,000 $6,864,065
Office of Consumer Affairs and Business
Regulation $0 $1,856,490 $0 $861,038 $995,452
Division of Banks $0 $46,733,859 $0 $45,233,859 $1,500,000
Division of Insurance $0 $269,768,412 $0 $269,768,412 $0
Division of Professional Licensure $0 $42,520,330 $0 $22,603,769 $19,916,561
Division of Standards $0 $3,397,940 $0 $2,417,577 $980,363
Department of Telecommunications and
Cable $0 $5,198,884 $0 $5,198,884 $0
TOTAL: $0 $369,475,915 $2,492,000 $348,575,539 $30,256,441

Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Executive Office of Labor and Workforce
Development
Labor and Workforce Development $0 $2,400,150 $23,697,500 $25,636,574 $461,076
TOTAL: $0 $2,400,150 $23,697,500 $25,636,574 $461,076
Executive Office of Education
Department of Early Education and Care $306,415,325 $2,226,146 $0 $308,121,471 $520,000
Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education $0 $7,750,792 $0 $5,026,250 $2,724,542
Department of Higher Education $0 $8,000,000 $0 $8,000,000 $0
Executive Office of Education $0 $0 $0 $0 $3,000,000
University of Massachusetts $0 $110,000,000 $0 $110,000,000 $0
Bridgewater State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Fitchburg State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Framingham State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Salem State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Westfield State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Worcester State College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Berkshire Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Bristol Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Cape Cod Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Greenfield Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Holyoke Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Mass Bay Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Massasoit Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Middlesex Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Mount Wachusett Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Northern Essex Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
North Shore Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Quinsigamond Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Springfield Technical Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
Roxbury Community College $0 $2,500,000 $0 $0 $2,500,000
Bunker Hill Community College $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
TOTAL: $306,415,325 $130,476,938 $0 $431,147,721 $8,744,542
Executive Office of Public Safety and
Security
Executive Office of Public Safety and
Security $0 $2,100,000 $0 $2,100,000 $11,464,504
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner $0 $10,164,450 $0 $1,517,565 $8,646,885
Criminal History Systems Board $0 $34,916,711 $0 $28,593,036 $6,323,675
Department of State Police $1,935,922 $111,433,000 $0 $2,663,000 $155,862,297
Municipal Police Training Council $0 $5,600,000 $0 $0 $5,600,000
Department of Fire Services $0 $61,148,536 $0 $58,814,976 $2,333,560
Military Division $0 $1,900,000 $0 $0 $2,000,000
Emergency Management Agency $175,000,000 $0 $0 $175,000,000 $0
Department of Corrections $3,500,000 $6,013,000 $4,687,000 $0 $28,850,000
Parole Board $0 $0 $0 $0 $0
TOTAL: $180,435,922 $233,275,697 $4,687,000 $268,688,577 $221,080,921

Non-Tax Revenue: Department Summary
Federal Departmental Budgeted Total Total
Revenue Source Revenues Revenues Transfers Unrestricted Restricted
Sheriffs
Hampden Sheriff's Office $825,000 $3,687,251 $0 $881,000 $3,631,251
Worcester Sheriff's Office $25,000 $750 $0 $25,750 $0
Middlesex Sheriff's Office $12,000 $338,996 $0 $75,996 $275,000
Hampshire Sheriff's Office $7,600 $2,525 $0 $10,125 $0
Berkshire Sheriff's Office $6,000 $3,105,000 $0 $11,000 $3,100,000
Franklin Sheriff's Office $86,200 $7,000 $0 $93,200 $0
Essex Sheriff's Office $41,000 $1,858,115 $0 $49,115 $1,850,000
Barnstable Sheriff's Office $0 $1,552,970 $0 $2,970 $1,550,000
Bristol Sheriff's Office $82,712 $20,000 $0 $102,712 $0
Dukes Sheriff's Office $0 $330,656 $0 $30,656 $300,000
Norfolk Sheriff's Office $576,000 $430,860 $0 $576,000 $430,860
Plymouth Sheriff's Office $25,620,000 $1,800,000 $0 $27,120,000 $300,000
Suffolk Sheriff's Office $0 $2,000,000 $0 $200,000 $1,800,000
TOTAL: $27,281,512 $15,134,123 $0 $29,178,524 $13,237,111
Executive Office of Aging and
Independence
Department of Elder Affairs $237,433,737 $1,434,850 $0 $238,868,587 $0
TOTAL: $237,433,737 $1,434,850 $0 $238,868,587 $0
Massachusetts Department of
Transportation
Massachusetts Department of Transportation $0 $628,727,105 $742,616,656 $1,371,343,761 $0
TOTAL: $0 $628,727,105 $742,616,656 $1,371,343,761 $0
Total Non-Tax Revenue: $16,156,774,939 $6,525,469,711 $5,717,206,187 $27,515,231,451 $1,736,760,480

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
SECTION 2.
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-0003 For the operation of the supreme judicial court, including the salaries
of the chief justice and the 6 associate justices ......................................... $12,314,981
0320-0010 For the operation of the clerk’s office of the supreme judicial court
for Suffolk county ........................................................................................... $2,428,095
0321-0001 For the operation of the commission on judicial conduct .............................. $1,187,392
0321-0100 For the services of the board of bar examiners ............................................. $2,349,408
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0321-1500 For the operation of the committee for public counsel services under
chapter 211D of the General Laws including, but not limited to, payroll
costs of the committee’s public defenders, attorneys in charge and
appeals attorneys, including fringe benefit costs; provided, that the
committee shall maintain a system in which not less than 20 per cent
of indigent clients shall be represented by public defenders; provided
further, that to the extent feasible, the committee shall assign public
defenders to district and superior courts; provided further, that the
committee shall approve by majority vote any increase in the base
salary or rate of compensation for employees holding management
positions, including, but not limited to, chiefs, deputy chiefs, directors,
assistant directors and managers; provided further, that not later than
December 2, 2025, the committee shall submit a report to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to, the expected surplus or deficiency of items 0321-1500,
0321-1510 and 0321-1520 for fiscal year 2026; provided further, that not
later than March 3, 2026, the committee shall submit an annual report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means in a
cumulative manner and which shall be compared with data from the
current period to the previous 2 fiscal years; and provided further, that
the report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the caseload of
attorneys in charge compared to the caseload of public defenders; (ii)
the number of cases handled by the committee in each reporting
period, delineated by public defender and private bar advocate; (iii) the
average number of hours spent per case by public defenders; (iv) the
number of public defenders currently employed by the committee and
the total number employed by the committee at the end of each fiscal
year, delineated by division; (v) the number of public defender
vacancies to be filled; (vi) the average cost for public defender services
rendered per case in the prior fiscal year; (vii) the number of cases
assigned to private bar advocates; (viii) the average number of hours
billed by private bar advocates; (ix) the average cost for private bar
advocate services rendered per case in the prior fiscal year; (x) the
billable hours of private counsel, delineated by travel time and time
spent in court, including wait time and trial preparation time, including
1

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
interview time, investigating time and research time; (xi) any changes
to the private bar billing system and any billing improvements that have
been made; (xii) the total number of support staff, investigators,
attorneys in charge and management personnel currently employed
by the committee and the total number employed by the committee at
the end of each fiscal year for the previous 2 fiscal years; and (xiii) a
summary of all spending for psychologists, psychiatrists and
investigators, including the total number of hours billed, the number
of unique vendors and the average number of hours billed ...................... $89,000,000
0321-1510 For compensation paid to private counsel assigned to criminal and civil
cases under subsection (b) of section 6 of chapter 211D of the General
Laws, pursuant to section 11 of said chapter 211D; provided, that not
more than $3,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services
rendered prior to fiscal year 2026 .............................................................. $215,000,000
0321-1520 For fees and costs as defined in section 27A of chapter 261 of the
General Laws, as ordered by a justice of the appeals court or a justice
of a department of the trial court on behalf of persons who are indigent
as defined in said section 27A of said chapter 261; provided, that not
more than $2,000,000 from this item shall be expended for services
rendered prior to fiscal year 2026 ................................................................ $25,172,236
Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation.
0321-1600 For the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to provide legal
representation for indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents of
the commonwealth; provided, that not later than February 3, 2026, the
corporation shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means using the most recent United States Census
Bureau population data available that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the number of persons assisted by the programs funded by the
corporation in the prior fiscal year; (ii) any proposed expansion of legal
services, delineated by type of service, target population and cost; and
(iii) the total number of indigent or otherwise disadvantaged residents
who received services from the corporation, delineated by type of case
and geographic location; provided further, that the corporation may
contract with any organization to provide representation; and provided
further, that notwithstanding the first paragraph of section 9 of chapter
221A of the General Laws, funds shall be expended for the Disability
Benefits Project, the Medicare Advocacy Project and the
Domestic Violence Legal Assistance Project ........................................... $51,000,000
0321-1800 For the access to counsel program; provided, that funds may be
expended for costs associated with implementing the program; and
provided further, that, subject to appropriation, funds shall be
distributed by the Massachusetts Legal Assistance Corporation to
designated non-profit organizations to increase access to legal
representation for low-income tenants and low-income owner
occupants in eviction proceedings ................................................................ $3,000,000
Mental Health Legal Advisors Committee.
0321-2000 For the operation of the mental health legal advisors committee and
for certain programs for the indigent mentally ill established in section
34E of chapter 221 of the General Laws ...................................................... $3,315,604
2

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Prisoners’ Legal Services.
0321-2100 For the expenses of Prisoners’ Legal Services ............................................. $3,272,105
Social Law Library.
0321-2205 For the expenses of the social law library located in Suffolk county ............. $2,960,287
Appeals Court.
0322-0100 For the appeals court, including the salaries, traveling allowances
and expenses of the chief justice, recall justices and associate justices
.................................................................................................................... $16,126,966
Trial Court.
0330-0101 For the salaries of the justices of the 7 departments of the trial court ......... $90,824,456
0330-0300 For the central administration of the trial court, including costs
associated with trial court non-employee services, dental and vision
health plan agreements for employees who are subject to a collective
bargaining agreement, jury expenses, law libraries, statewide
telecommunications, private and municipal court rentals and leases,
operation of courthouse facilities, rental of county court facilities,
witness fees, printing expenses, equipment maintenance and repairs,
the court interpreter program, insurance and chargeback costs, the
Massachusetts sentencing commission, court security and judicial
training; provided, that 50 per cent of all fees payable under rules 15(d)
and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure shall
be paid from this item; provided further, that funds may be expended
for training on domestic violence issues, the maintenance of a
domestic violence registry, evaluations of batterers’ intervention
programs and the risk assessment tool for domestic violence offenders
under chapter 260 of the acts of 2014; provided further, that not less
than $378,000 shall be expended for the Race and Bias Initiative to
expand the trial court’s Office of Diversity, Equity, Inclusion &
Experience and to provide additional diversity training for all court
employees; provided further, that in planning and implementing the
policies of the Race and Bias Initiative, the trial court’s Office of
Diversity, Equity, Inclusion & Experience shall solicit feedback from
community stakeholders in order to identify any structural,
organizational or cultural barriers to ensure equity in the justice system
for people of racial, linguistic, cultural or sexual minorities and shall
recommend methods to remove such barriers to guarantee the
provision of competent representation and inclusive practices in every
courtroom in the commonwealth; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for juvenile court investigators rates at an amount that at
least maintains the rates from fiscal year 2025; provided further, that
funds may be expended to provide information and assistance to self-
represented litigants; provided further, that the trial court shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on revenues collected in the trial court; provided further, that
each report shall provide for the previous quarter for each court
division and courthouse: (i) the total amount ordered in fees and fines;
3

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
(ii) the total amount dismissed in fees and fines; (iii) the total amount
paid in fees and fines; and (iv) the total amount outstanding in fees
and fines; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2026, the
court administrator shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the number of court officers,
per diem court officers and security personnel located in each trial
court of the commonwealth; provided further, that notwithstanding
section 9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the rights afforded to a veteran under said
section 9A of said chapter 30, shall also be afforded to any such
veteran who holds a trial court office or position in the service of the
commonwealth not classified under chapter 31 of the General Laws,
other than an elective office, an appointive office for a fixed term or an
office or position under section 7 of said chapter 30 and who has: (a)
held the office or position for not less than 1 year; and (b) completed
30 years of total creditable service to the commonwealth, as defined
in chapter 32 of the General Laws; provided further, that the trial court
shall submit a report to the victim and witness assistance board,
established in section 4 of chapter 258B of the General Laws, detailing
the amount of assessments imposed within each court by a justice or
clerk-magistrate during the previous calendar year under section 8 of
said chapter 258B; provided further, that the report shall include, but
not be limited to, the number of cases in which the assessment was
reduced or waived by a judge or clerk-magistrate within the courts;
provided further, that not later than January 6, 2026, the report shall
be submitted to the victim and witness assistance board; and provided
further, that not less than 15 days before the transfer of funds between
items within the trial court, the court administrator shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (1) the amount of funds transferred from
any item of appropriation; (2) the line item number of the appropriation
making the transfer; (3) the line item number of the appropriation
receiving the transfer; and (4) the reason for the transfer ......................... $358,597,713
0330-0344 For the administration and transportation costs associated with a
veterans court program .................................................................................... $254,222
0330-0410 For the implementation of alternative dispute resolution
programming; provided, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended
for online dispute resolution ........................................................................... $1,372,241
0330-0441 For permanency mediation services in the probate and juvenile courts........... $515,000
0330-0500 For the use of video teleconferencing for court appearances by persons
in the custody of the houses of correction ........................................................ $254,925
0330-0599 For a probation program that administers high-intensity supervision
to promote successful probation outcomes and reduce recidivism;
provided, that the office of the commissioner of probation may partner
with the same external research organization in fiscal year 2026 as
selected in fiscal year 2025 to: (i) monitor program fidelity and design;
(ii) implement the model; and (iii) collect and analyze the outcome
evaluation; provided further, that said program shall be conducted at
both a district and a superior court; provided further, that the trial court
shall maintain this probation program in at least the 10 court locations
currently in operation; and provided further, that not later than March
4

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
13, 2026, the office of the commissioner of probation shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means that
shall include, but not be limited to, any relevant data on participants and
outcomes ...................................................................................................... $1,373,164
0330-0601 For the operation of the specialty courts; provided, that no funds shall
be transferred from this item to any other item in the trial court; and
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the trial court shall, in
coordination with partner departments and agencies, submit reports
on interdepartmental service agreements made with the partner
departments and agencies to the court administrator and the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) the amount of funds transferred to each specific agency
or department for use in the specialty courts; (ii) the specific intent of
the transfer in relation to specialty court operations; (iii) any additional
services implemented by way of the transfer; and (iv) the amount of
unspent funds from the transfer at the time of reporting ................................ $7,970,454
0330-0612 For the administration of the Massachusetts Community Justice
Project to serve individuals with mental health and substance use
disorders who are involved in the criminal justice system; provided,
that the trial court shall continue to fund a project coordinator to
oversee coordination and administration and to provide financial
oversight of the sequential intercept model; and provided further, that
not later than March 3, 2026, the project coordinator shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means that
shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) design of the sequential
intercept model mappings; (ii) locations of workshops held to advocate
for the model; (iii) number of cases in which the model has been
utilized; (iv) impact of the model on rehabilitation and recidivism; and
(v) cost savings associated with the model ...................................................... $228,116
0330-0613 For the implementation of the recommendations set forth by the
Council of State Governments Justice Center-Massachusetts
Criminal Justice Review including, but not limited to, the establishment
of new programs and expansion of existing programs targeted at
recidivism reduction; provided, that the trial court shall transfer funds
to other commonwealth agencies and departments of the
commonwealth as outlined in this item; provided further, that not less
than 15 days before any such transfer, the trial court administrator
shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that if no state agency or department is specifically
designated to receive funds from this item, the trial court administrator
shall distribute funding based on the recommendations of the Council
of State Governments Justice Center-Massachusetts Criminal Justice
Review; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2026, each state
agency or department receiving funds from this item shall submit a
report to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing, as
applicable, participation, completion and recidivism rates, delineated
by gender; provided further, that the department of correction shall
expend not less than $637,500 to expand recidivism reduction
programming; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the
department of correction shall submit a report to the executive office of
public safety and security, the executive office for administration and
finance, the house and senate committees on ways and means and
5

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
the joint committee on the judiciary on the types of recidivism reduction
programs provided, participation, completion and recidivism rates for
said recidivism reduction programming; provided further, that the
report shall be delineated by gender and include descriptions of new
programs offered to women as a result of these funds; provided
further, that not less than $345,000 shall be expended on grants
administered by the executive office of public safety and security to
support the expansion of evidence-based cognitive behavioral
programs in county houses of correction and jails; provided further,
that the secretary of public safety and security shall award grants on
a competitive basis and applicants shall provide a plan for ensuring that
proposed programs shall be implemented with fidelity to a research-
based, evidence-based or evidence-informed program design;
provided further, that if there is no existing research or evidence
supporting the proposed program, applicants shall describe in detail
how the program will be evaluated with sufficient rigor to add to existing
research; provided further, that not less than $130,000 shall be
expended for: (a) evaluating the caseload of parole and probation
officers; (b) hiring new officers accordingly; and (c) expanding
programs and services at community corrections centers; provided
further, that not less than $2,300,000 shall be expended for a
transitional youth early intervention probation pilot program to be
administered by the office of the commissioner of probation; provided
further, that not less than $45,000 shall be expended for the
improvement of case management and data-tracking capacity in the
office of the commissioner of probation; and provided further, that
not less than $5,075,000 shall be expended in conjunction with the
executive office of health and human services for the development
and implementation of a behavioral health strategy, including
statewide capacity to track the utilization of behavioral health care
services and behavioral health outcomes for persons in the criminal
justice system within the Medicaid management information system .......... $8,662,500
Superior Court Department.
0331-0100 For the operation of the superior court department; provided, that
funds shall be expended for medical malpractice tribunals under
section 60B of chapter 231 of the General Laws; and provided further,
that the clerk of the court shall be responsible for the internal
administration of the clerk’s office, including personnel, staff services
and record keeping ..................................................................................... $40,924,734
District Court Department.
0332-0100 For the operation of the district court department, including a civil
conciliation program; provided, that notwithstanding the provisions of
any general or special law to the contrary, the district court of Chelsea
shall be the permanent location for the northern trial session to handle
6-person jury cases; and provided further, that all personnel within said
district court whose duties related to said northern trial session
shall report to the clerk-magistrate of said district court ............................... $91,656,230
Probate and Family Court Department.
6

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
0333-0002 For the operation of the probate and family court department;
provided, that not less than $848,014 shall be expended for the
continuation of the case management triage plan ...................................... $48,053,606
Land Court Department.
0334-0001 For the operation of the land court department ............................................... $6,103,614
Boston Municipal Court Department.
0335-0001 For the operation of the Boston municipal court department ...................... $17,013,331
Housing Court Department.
0336-0002 For the operation of the housing court department; provided, that
funds shall be expended on court interpreter services ................................ $14,717,104
Juvenile Court Department.
0337-0002 For the operation of the juvenile court department .................................... $27,679,013
Office of the Commissioner of Probation.
0339-1001 For the office of the commissioner of probation; provided, that the
office shall enter into an interagency service agreement with the
department of revenue to verify income data and to use the
department’s wage reporting and bank match system for weekly tape-
matching to determine an individual’s eligibility for appointment of
indigent counsel under chapter 211D of the General Laws; provided
further, that not less than $479,167 shall be expended for DNA testing;
provided further, that not less than $450,000 shall be expended for
expanded drug testing capacity; provided further, that not less than
$222,000 shall be expended for increased sealing and expungement
capacity; provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended for a caseload management software system for the juvenile
and probate and family courts; provided further, that not less
than $641,000 shall be expended for a pre-trial services unit; provided
further, that not less than $350,000 shall be expended for increased
electronic monitoring capacity; provided further, that not less than
$374,667 shall be expended for a probate and family court workload
reduction project; provided further, that not less than $160,000 shall
be expended for the purchase of bulletproof vests for probation
officers; provided further, that funds may be expended for increased
lab-based testing, oral toxicology tests and new urine tests to detect
additional substances; provided further, that funds shall be used for the
ongoing development and implementation of the validated risk
assessment tool to inform pre-adjudication decision making with
regard to detention, release on personal recognizance or release
under conditions of criminal defendants before the adult trial court;
provided further, that not later than November 3, 2025, the office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the status of the
validated risk assessment tool; (ii) efforts to implement the risk
assessment tool; (iii) further goals to expand the use of the risk
assessment tool; and (iv) the outcomes associated with utilization of
7

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
the risk assessment tool; and provided further, that funds from this
item shall be expended for the costs associated with the full
implementation of chapter 303 of the acts of 2006 and chapter 418 of
the acts of 2006 to ensure effective supervision of probationers who
are monitored through global positioning system bracelets .............. $197,302,225
0339-1003 For the office of community corrections and performance-based
contracts for the operation of community corrections centers; provided,
that not later than March 3, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to: (i) the performance standards used to evaluate
community corrections centers; (ii) a description of how each
community corrections center compares based on performance and
utilization data; (iii) the amount of each contract awarded to
community corrections centers on a per-client-day basis; (iv) the
standards for terminating contracts with underperforming community
corrections centers; and (v) plans for increasing the use of community
corrections centers by the courts, the department of correction and the
county sheriffs’ offices; provided further, that the executive director of
the office of community corrections may make funds available from
this item for rehabilitative pilot programs that incorporate evidence-
based corrections practices; and provided further, that the office may
provide re-entry services programs, which shall not operate as
intermediate sanctions programs as defined in section 1 of chapter
211F of the General Laws, to any person released from incarceration
including, but not limited to, any probationer or parolee ............................ $33,668,302
0339-1005 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the office of the
commissioner of probation for cities and towns, acting either
individually or in concert, to pilot or expand multidisciplinary
approaches to divert juveniles and young adults from the juvenile and
criminal justice systems prior to arrest or arraignment through
coordinated programs for prevention and intervention that serve
youths and their families including, but not limited to: (i) connecting
youths to mental health services; (ii) providing youth development
activities and mentoring; (iii) promoting school safety, family home
visits, juvenile diversion programs and restorative justice and
mediation programs; and (iv) providing assistance for families and
schools to navigate the legal system; provided, that eligible applicants
may partner with nonprofit organizations to provide programs and
services; provided further, that the office shall give preference to
applications that: (a) clearly outline a comprehensive plan for
municipalities to collaborate with law enforcement agencies, schools,
community-based organizations and government agencies to address
juvenile delinquency and young adult crime; (b) include written
commitments of municipalities, law enforcement agencies, schools,
community-based organizations and government agencies to
collaborate; (c) make a written commitment to match grant funds with
not less than a 25 per cent matching grant provided by either municipal
or private contributions; and (d) identify a local governmental unit to
serve as the fiscal agent for the proposed programs and services;
provided further, that administrative costs for approved grant
applications shall not exceed 5 per cent of the value of the grant; and
provided further, that not later than March 13, 2026, the office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the number of grant
8

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
applications received; (2) the number of grants approved; (3) the
amount of funds issued to each grantee; and (4) details regarding
each grantee, including geographic location, services offered,
organizations with which the grantee collaborated, matching funds
provided and the number of juveniles and young adults served ..................... $515,000
0339-1011 For a grant program to be administered by the office of the
commissioner of probation for community-based residential re-entry
programs to reduce recidivism by providing transitional housing,
workforce development and case management to individuals returning
to the community from county correctional facilities and state prisons,
including incarcerated persons under the supervision of state prisons
and county correctional facilities approved under sections 49 and 86F
of chapter 127 of the General Laws and individuals on parole or on
probation; provided, that no funds shall be transferred from this item to
any other item in the trial court; provided further, that said programs
shall provide supervision and accountability as needed; provided
further, that the funds shall be awarded through a competitive process
to qualified nonprofit organizations with a documented history of
providing comprehensive, evidence-based or evidence-informed
community residential re-entry services; provided further, that
applicants shall provide a plan for ensuring that proposed programs
shall be implemented with fidelity to a research-based, evidence-
based or evidence-informed program design; provided further, that not
less than $1,000,000 shall be spent on women and elderly persons
returning from incarceration; and provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the outcomes and recidivism
rates of the participants ............................................................................. $16,079,410
Office of Jury Commissioner.
0339-2100 For the office of jury commissioner under chapter 234A of the
General Laws ................................................................................................ $3,998,640
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Suffolk District Attorney.
0340-0100 For the Suffolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program, the domestic violence unit and the children’s
advocacy center; provided, that 50 per cent of fees payable under
rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal
Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this item;
and provided further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid
an annual salary of less than $68,000 ..................................................... $29,078,956
0340-0198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Suffolk district attorney’s office ......................................................................... $488,843
Middlesex District Attorney.
0340-0200 For the Middlesex district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
9

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $24,748,204
0340-0298 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Middlesex district attorney’s office .................................................................... $724,350
Eastern District Attorney.
0340-0300 For the Eastern district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $15,002,530
0340-0398 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Eastern district attorney’s office ....................................................................... $695,868
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0400 For the Worcester district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $16,246,281
0340-0498 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Worcester district attorney’s office ................................................................... $588,201
Hampden District Attorney.
0340-0500 For the Hampden district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $16,892,176
0340-0598 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Hampden district attorney’s office .................................................................... $595,785
Northwestern District Attorney.
10

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
0340-0600 For the Northwestern district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program, the domestic violence unit and the anti-crime
task force; provided, that 50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d)
and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for
appeals taken by the office shall be paid from this item; and provided
further, that no assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary
of less than $68,000 ................................................................................... $10,010,676
0340-0698 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Northwestern district attorney’s office .............................................................. $418,560
Norfolk District Attorney.
0340-0700 For the Norfolk district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $14,643,846
0340-0798 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Norfolk district attorney’s office ........................................................................ $576,944
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0800 For the Plymouth district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ....................................................................................................... $12,934,832
0340-0898 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Plymouth district attorney’s office ..................................................................... $602,558
Bristol District Attorney.
0340-0900 For the Bristol district attorney’s office, including the victim and witness
assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault prosecution
program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50 per cent of
fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the Massachusetts
Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the office shall be
paid from this item; and provided further, that no assistant district
attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than $68,000 ..................... $14,716,103
0340-0998 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Bristol
district attorney’s office .................................................................................... $720,188
Cape and Islands District Attorney.
11

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
0340-1000 For the Cape and Islands district attorney’s office, including the victim
and witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program and the domestic violence unit; provided, that 50
per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ......................................................................................................... $6,650,846
0340-1098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the Cape
and Islands district attorney’s office .................................................................. $398,503
Berkshire District Attorney.
0340-1100 For the Berkshire district attorney’s office, including the victim and
witness assistance program, the child abuse and sexual assault
prosecution program, the drug task force, the domestic violence unit
and the Berkshire county law enforcement task force; provided, that
50 per cent of fees payable under rules 15(d) and 30(c)(8) of the
Massachusetts Rules of Criminal Procedure for appeals taken by the
office shall be paid from this item; and provided further, that no
assistant district attorney shall be paid an annual salary of less than
$68,000 ......................................................................................................... $6,137,391
0340-1198 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the
Berkshire district attorney’s office ..................................................................... $324,857
MASSACHUSETTS DISTRICT ATTORNEYS ASSOCIATION.
0340-0203 For the implementation and administration of drug diversion programs
for nonviolent young adult drug offenders; provided, that individuals
using heroin or other opiate derivatives who are arrested for
nonviolent crimes shall be eligible for such programs; provided further,
that individuals charged with violent crimes shall not be eligible for
participation in a drug diversion program; provided further, that a
district attorney’s office may contract with any organization to
administer a drug diversion program or an education program;
provided further, that such programs shall be designed in consultation
with the department of public health; provided further, that eligible drug
diversion programs shall offer pre-arraignment or post-arraignment
programs for non-violent drug offenders to provide candidates the
opportunity to receive comprehensive substance use treatment
services in lieu of prosecution through the traditional court process;
provided further, that treatment plans may include, but shall not be
limited to, inpatient, outpatient and step-down recovery services;
provided further, that diversion program candidates without insurance
coverage for such services shall not be denied access to the program
based on the inability to pay; provided further, that not less than 60
days before the distribution of funds, the Massachusetts District
Attorneys Association shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the amount to be given
to each district attorney’s office; (ii) the methodology for the
distribution; and (iii) the administration and cost of the program; and
provided further, that no funds from this item shall be expended on
12

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
the administrative costs of the Massachusetts District Attorneys
Association ....................................................................................................... $499,950
0340-2100 For the operation of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association,
including the implementation and related expenses of the district
attorneys’ offices automation, case management and tracking system;
provided, that expenses associated with the system may be charged
directly to this item; provided further, that the association shall work in
conjunction with the disabled persons protection commission and the
11 district attorneys' offices to prepare a report that shall include, but
not be limited to: (i) the number of abuse cases that are referred to
each district attorney’s office for further investigation; (ii) the number
of said referrals resulting in the filing of criminal charges, delineated by
type of charge; (iii) the number of cases referred to each district
attorney's office that remain open as of the date for submission of the
report; and (iv) the number of cases that resulted in a criminal
prosecution and the disposition of each such prosecution; provided
further, that not later than March 13, 2026, said report shall be
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate; provided
further, that not later than January 15, 2026, the association shall work
in conjunction with the 11 district attorneys’ offices to prepare and
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate;
provided further, that the association shall provide said offices with an
agreed-upon template for the report to be filled out; provided further,
that said offices shall submit said report in a standard electronic
format; provided further, that said template shall include, delineated by
charge type: (a) the number of criminal cases initiated by arraignment
in each department of the trial court; (b) the number of criminal cases
disposed of in each department of the trial court; (c) the number of
cases appealed to the appeals courts, or of the supreme judicial court,
a single justice of the appeals court or supreme judicial court or any
other appeals; (d) the number of cases reviewed but not charged; and
(e) the number of cases under active management where the case
includes charges for drug offenses under chapter 94C of the General
Laws, motor vehicle offenses under chapter 90 of the General Laws
or firearm offenses under chapter 140 of the General Laws; and
provided further, that each district attorney shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means at least 30 days before
transferring any funds from the AA object class of each district
attorney’s administrative line item and means of its intention to make
that transfer ................................................................................................... $2,638,927
0340-2117 For the retention of assistant district attorneys and non-attorney staff
with not less than 3 years of experience; provided, that the
Massachusetts District Attorneys Association shall transfer funds to
the AA object class in each of the 11 district attorneys’ offices; provided
further, that the association shall develop a formula for the distribution
of said funds; provided further, that funds distributed from this item to
the district attorneys’ offices shall be used for retention purposes and
shall not be transferred out of the AA object class; provided further, that
not more than $125,000 shall be distributed to any 1 district attorney’s
office for such purpose; provided further, that not less than 60 days
prior to the distribution of funds, the Massachusetts District Attorneys
Association shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
13

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
on ways and means detailing: (i) the methodology used to determine
the amount to be disbursed; (ii) the amount to be given to each district
attorney’s office; (iii) the methodology for the distribution; and (iv) the
number of assistant district attorneys and non-attorney staff from each
office who would receive funds from this item; and provided further,
that no funds from this item shall be expended for the administrative
costs of the Massachusetts District Attorneys Association ........................... $1,000,000
0340-8908 For the costs associated with maintaining the Massachusetts
District Attorneys Association’s wide area network ....................................... $3,364,704
EXECUTIVE.
0411-1000 For the offices of the governor, the lieutenant governor and the
governor’s council; provided, that the amount appropriated in this item
may be used at the discretion of the governor for the payment of
extraordinary expenses not otherwise provided for and for transfers to
appropriation items where the amounts otherwise available may be
insufficient; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
governor’s commission on intellectual disability; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the governor’s development coordinating
council; and provided further, that the advisory council on Alzheimer’s
disease and related disorders, established in section 379 of chapter
194 of the acts of 1998, shall continue during fiscal year 2026 ..................... $6,482,282
0411-1020 For the operation of the office of climate innovation and resilience ................. $500,000
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0000 For the operation of the office of the secretary of the commonwealth;
provided, that the secretary may transfer funds between items 0540-
0900, 0540-1000, 0540-1100, 0540-1200, 0540-1300, 0540-1400,
0540-1500, 0540-1600, 0540-1700, 0540-1800, 0540-1900, 0540-
2000 and 0540-2100 under an allocation schedule, which shall be filed
with the house and senate committees on ways and means not less
than 30 days before the transfer; and provided further, that each
register of deeds using electronic record books shall ensure that all
methods of electronically recording instruments conform to the
regulations or standards established by the secretary of the
commonwealth and the records conservation board ................................... $8,639,411
0511-0001 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more
than $15,000 in revenues collected from the sale of merchandise at
the state house gift shop to restock gift shop inventory .................................... $15,000
0511-0002 For the operation of the corporations division; provided, that the
division shall implement a corporate dissolution program; and
provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the secretary of the
commonwealth shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the total number of reports
filed as a result of this program and the amount of revenue generated
for the commonwealth ..................................................................................... $606,206
14

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
0511-0200 For the operation of the archives division; provided, that the secretary
of the commonwealth shall expend not less than $200,000 for
preservation matching grants for municipalities and nonprofit
organizations to preserve veterans’ monuments, memorials and other
significant sites and historic documents; and provided further, that the
program shall be administered by the state historic records advisory
board ................................................................................................................ $879,130
0511-0230 For the operation of the records center ............................................................. $36,259
0511-0250 For the operation of the archives facility .......................................................... $847,715
0511-0260 For the operation of the commonwealth museum ........................................... $292,412
0511-0270 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who shall contract with the
University of Massachusetts Donahue Institute to provide the
commonwealth with technical assistance on United States census
data and to prepare annual population estimates ........................................ $1,530,663
0511-0280 For the secretary of the commonwealth, who may expend not more
than $500,000 in revenues collected from fees assessed upon
communication technology service providers for administration and
monitoring of the remote online notarization program under subsection
(i) of section 28 of chapter 222 of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the secretary of the
commonwealth may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ............................................................................................................. $500,000
0511-0420 For the operation of the address confidentiality program ................................ $273,211
0517-0000 For the printing of public documents ............................................................... $577,146
0521-0000 For the operation of the elections division, including preparation,
printing and distribution of ballots and for other miscellaneous
expenses for primary and other elections; provided, that the secretary
of the commonwealth may award grants for voter registration and
education; and provided further, that the registration and education
activities may be conducted by community-based voter registration
and education organizations ...................................................................... $14,085,226
0521-0001 For the operation of the central voter registration computer system;
provided, that not later than January 30, 2026, the secretary of the
commonwealth shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing voter registration activity ........ $11,448,118
0521-0002 For implementing early voting in the commonwealth under sections 6
and 7 of chapter 115 of the acts of 2020 and section 25B of chapter
54 of the General Laws, as determined through the collection and
certification of accurate accounting by the state auditor and division of
local mandates for distribution by the secretary of the commonwealth ....... $3,000,000
0524-0000 For providing information to voters .................................................................. $455,738
15

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
0526-0100 For the operation of the Massachusetts historical commission ................... $1,153,624
0527-0100 For the operation of the ballot law commission ................................................. $10,384
0528-0100 For the operation of the records conservation board ........................................ $36,396
0540-0900 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lawrence ............................. $1,431,071
0540-1000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Salem .................................. $3,246,205
0540-1100 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Franklin ............................. $711,431
0540-1200 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampden ........................ $2,230,765
0540-1300 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Hampshire ......................... $890,512
0540-1400 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Lowell .................................. $1,358,057
0540-1500 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Cambridge ........................... $4,587,131
0540-1600 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Adams .................................. $475,103
0540-1700 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Pittsfield .................................. $642,533
0540-1800 For the registry of deeds located in the town of Great Barrington................... $381,268
0540-1900 For the registry of deeds located in the county of Suffolk ............................. $2,685,808
0540-2000 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Fitchburg ................................ $826,636
0540-2100 For the registry of deeds located in the city of Worcester ............................ $2,658,397
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Office of the Treasurer and Receiver General.
0610-0000 For the office of the treasurer and receiver general; provided, that the
treasurer shall provide computer services required by the teachers’
retirement board; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
payment of bank fees; and provided further, that financial assistance
shall be made available to injured firefighters ............................................. $12,729,305
0610-0010 For programs to promote and improve financial literacy for
Massachusetts residents .............................................................................. $1,476,700
0610-0050 For the administration of the alcoholic beverages control commission
in its efforts to regulate and control the conduct and condition of traffic
in alcoholic beverages; provided, that the commission shall maintain at
least 1 chief investigator and other investigators as may be necessary
for the regulation and control of trafficking of alcoholic beverages;
provided further, that the commission shall work and cooperate with
the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives in the
United States Department of Justice and other relevant federal
agencies to assist in its efforts to regulate and control trafficking of
16

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
alcoholic beverages; and provided further, that the commission shall
seek out matching federal funds and apply for federal grants that may
be available to assist in the enforcement of laws pertaining to the
trafficking of alcoholic beverages .................................................................. $6,255,309
0610-0051 For the operation of the alcoholic beverages control commission
relative to the prevention of underage drinking and related programs
including, but not limited to, applying for and obtaining Bureau of
Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives in the United States
Department of Justice funds, grants and other federal appropriations;
provided, that the commission may expend not more than $350,000 in
revenues collected from fees generated by the commission; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .............................................................................................................. $350,000
0610-0060 For the costs associated with the investigation and enforcement
division of the alcoholic beverages control commission’s
implementation of the enhanced liquor enforcement programs known
as the safe campus, safe holidays, safe prom and safe summer
programs; provided, that funds from this item shall not support other
operating costs of item 0610-0050 .................................................................. $348,780
0610-2000 For payments made to veterans under section 1 of chapter 646 of the
acts of 1968, section 16 of chapter 130 of the acts of 2005 and section
11 of chapter 132 of the acts of 2009; provided, that the office of the
state treasurer may expend not more than $500,000 for costs incurred
in the administration of these payments; and provided further, that not
later than September 26, 2025, the state treasurer shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i)
the number of veterans applying for the payments, delineated by in-
person and online applications; and (ii) how many payments were
approved in the prior fiscal year ..................................................................... $2,803,626
0611-1000 For bonus payments to war veterans ................................................................. $44,500
0612-0105 For payment of the public safety employee killed in the line of duty
benefit established in section 100A of chapter 32 of the General Laws;
provided, that the office of the state treasurer shall provide immediate
written notification to the secretary of administration and finance and
the house and senate committees on ways and means upon the
expenditure of the funds appropriated in this item; and provided
further, that at the written request of the office of the state treasurer,
the comptroller shall transfer uncommitted and unobligated funds from
item 1599-3384 to this item .............................................................................. $600,000
Lottery Commission.
0640-0000 For the operation of the state lottery commission and arts lottery;
provided, that no funds shall be expended from this item for costs
associated with the promotion or advertising of lottery games;
provided further, that positions funded from this item shall not be
17

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
subject to chapters 30 and 31 of the General Laws; and provided
further, that 25 per cent of the amount appropriated in this item shall
be transferred quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming Fund,
established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the
General Fund ............................................................................................ $118,028,408
0640-0005 For the costs associated with monitor games; provided, that 25 per
cent of the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred
quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in
section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the General Fund ........... $4,321,359
0640-0010 For the promotional activities associated with the state lottery
program; provided, that not later than June 26, 2026, the state lottery
commission shall issue a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing additional revenues generated as a
result of promotional activities funded from this item; and provided
further, that 25 per cent of the amount appropriated in this item shall be
transferred quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming Fund,
established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the
General Fund ................................................................................................ $7,000,000
0640-0096 For the commonwealth’s fiscal year 2026 contributions to the health
and welfare fund established under the collective bargaining
agreement between the state lottery commission and the Service
Employees International Union, Local 888, AFL-CIO; provided, that
the contributions shall be paid to the fund on such basis as the
collective bargaining agreement provides; and provided further, that
25 per cent of the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred
quarterly from the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in
section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the General Fund .............. $618,509
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-0300 For the services and operations of the Massachusetts cultural council,
including grants to or contracts with public and nonpublic entities;
provided, that the council may expend the amounts appropriated in
this item for the council as provided in sections 52 to 58A, inclusive,
of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided further, that 25 per cent
of the amount appropriated in this item shall be transferred quarterly
from the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, established in section 35 of
chapter 10 of the General Laws, to the General Fund; provided further,
that a person employed under this item shall be considered an
employee within the meaning of section 1 of chapter 150E of the
General Laws and shall be placed in the appropriate bargaining unit;
provided further, that the council shall expend from any source an
amount not less than 75 per cent of this item on grants and subsidies
to further the achievement of the goals of the council’s 3-year strategic
plan, including: (i) stewarding programmatic practices that advance
equity, diversity and inclusion; (ii) advancing the creative and cultural
sector through building partnerships, identifying recommendations,
and storytelling; and (iii) ensuring internal systems, structures and
ways of working reflect the council’s values of creativity, public service
and inclusion and advance the sector’s needs; and provided further,
that not later than November 3, 2025, the council shall submit its
board-approved fiscal year 2026 spending plan to the office of the
state treasurer, the executive office for administration and finance, the
18

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on tourism, arts and cultural development including, but not
limited to, the amounts to be expended on: (a) grants and subsidies;
(b) personnel; (c) leases and utilities; and (d) travel, delineated by in-
state and board-approved out-of-state travel ............................................. $26,045,152
Debt Service.
0699-0005 For the state treasurer, who may retain and expend not more
than $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 from premiums paid on the
sales of revenue anticipation notes and expend those premium
payments to pay the principal and interest on account of the revenue
anticipation notes ........................................................................................ $30,000,000
0699-0014 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain
indebtedness incurred under chapter 233 of the acts of 2008
for financing the accelerated bridge program ......................................... $270,606,457
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
0699-0015 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain bonded
debt and the sale of bonds of the commonwealth; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
treasurer may make payments under section 38C of chapter 29 of the
General Laws from this item and items 0699-9100, 0699-2005 and
0699-0014; provided further, that the payments shall pertain to the
bonds, notes or other obligations authorized to be paid from each item;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the comptroller may transfer the amounts that would
otherwise be unexpended on June 30, 2026 from this item to items
0699-9100, 0699-2005 and 0699-0014 or from said items 0699-9100,
0699-2005 and 0699-0014 to this item that would otherwise have
insufficient amounts to meet debt service obligations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026; provided further, that each amount transferred
shall be charged to the funds as specified in the item to which the
amount is transferred; provided further, that payments on bonds
issued under section 2O of said chapter 29 shall be paid from this item
and shall be charged to the infrastructure subfund of the
Commonwealth Transportation Fund; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any provision of this item or of any other general or
special law to the contrary, the comptroller may charge the payments
authorized in the item to the appropriate budgetary or other fund
subject to a plan which the comptroller shall file 10 days in advance
with the house and senate committees on ways and means ................ $2,250,387,453
General Fund ......................................................... 56.83%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund .................... 43.17%
0699-2005 For the payment of interest, discount and principal on certain
indebtedness that may be incurred for financing the central
artery/third harbor tunnel funding shortfall ................................................. $82,370,751
Commonwealth Transportation Fund....................... 100%
0699-9100 For the payment of costs associated with any bonds, notes or other
obligations of the commonwealth, including issuance costs, interest
19

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
on bonds, bond and revenue anticipation notes, commercial paper and
other notes under sections 47 and 49B of chapter 29 of the General
Laws and for the payment to the United States under Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 148, of any rebate amount or yield
reduction payment owed with respect to any bonds or notes or other
obligations of the commonwealth; provided, that the state treasurer
shall certify to the comptroller a schedule of the distribution of costs
among the various funds of the commonwealth; provided further, that
not more than $400,000 shall be expended from this item for the costs
of personnel at the debt department of the office of the state treasurer;
provided further, that the comptroller shall charge costs to the funds in
accordance with the schedule; and provided further, that any deficit in
this item at the close of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026 shall be
charged to the various funds or to the General Fund or the
Commonwealth Transportation Fund debt service reserves ....................... $28,681,484
OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR.
0710-0000 For the office of the state auditor, including the review and monitoring
of privatization contracts under sections 52 to 55, inclusive, of chapter
7 of the General Laws ................................................................................. $20,200,234
0710-0100 For the operation of the division of local mandates ......................................... $443,932
0710-0200 For the operation of the bureau of special investigations; provided, that
the office of the state auditor shall submit quarterly reports to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the total
amount of fraudulently obtained benefits identified by the bureau, the
total value of settlement restitution payments, actual monthly
collections and any circumstances that produce shortfalls in
collections ..................................................................................................... $2,599,086
0710-0225 For the operation of the Medicaid audit unit within the division of audit
operations to prevent and identify fraud and abuse in the MassHealth
system; provided, that the federal reimbursement for any expenditure
from this item shall not be less than 50 per cent; provided further, that
not later than February 27, 2026, the division shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing all
findings on activities and payments made through the MassHealth
system; provided further, that the report shall include, to the extent
available, a review of all post-audit efforts undertaken by MassHealth
to recoup payments owed to the commonwealth due to identified fraud
and abuse; provided further, that the report shall include the
responses of MassHealth to the most recent post-audit review survey,
including the status of recoupment efforts; and provided further, that
the report shall include the unit’s recommendations to enhance
recoupment efforts ........................................................................................ $1,483,719
0710-0300 For costs related to the use of data analytic techniques to identify fraud
by the bureau of special investigations ............................................................ $557,724
0710-0400 For the operation of an information technology audit unit within the
office of the state auditor in order to conduct audits of high risk
information technology related activities including, cybersecurity,
20

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
data access, systems operations, data integrity and regulatory
compliance ...................................................................................................... $865,519
Police Reform Commission.
0800-0000 For the operation of the Massachusetts Peace Officer Standards and
Training Commission; provided, that not later than March 16, 2026,
the commission shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the commission's current caseload for fiscal year 2026; (ii) the
number of complaints concerning police officer conduct received by the
commission; (iii) patterns of unprofessional police conduct identified by
the commission; and (iv) the number of police officers suspended by
the commission and the reason for said suspension .................................... $8,922,427
0800-0001 For the operation of the commission on the status of African Americans
......................................................................................................................... $150,000
0800-0002 For the operation of the commission on the status of Latinos and
Latinas ............................................................................................................. $150,000
0800-0003 For the operation of the commission on the status of
persons with disabilities................................................................................. $150,000
0800-0004 For the operation of the commission on the social status of
Black men and boys .................................................................................... $150,000
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
0810-0000 For the office of the attorney general, including the administration of
the local consumer aid fund, established in section 11G of chapter 12
of the General Laws, the operation of the anti-trust division, all regional
offices, a high-tech crime unit and the victim and witness assistance
program; provided, that the victim and witness assistance program
shall be administered under chapters 258B and 258C of the General
Laws ........................................................................................................... $48,072,168
0810-0013 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a false
claims program not more than $4,542,326 in revenues collected from
enforcement of sections 5A to 5O, inclusive, of chapter 12 of the
General Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $4,542,326
0810-0014 For the operation of the office of ratepayer advocacy within the office
of the attorney general under section 11E of chapter 12 of the General
Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the amount assessed under said section 11E of said chapter
12 shall equal the amount expended from this item and the associated
fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item; and provided
further, that funds shall be expended for the expenses of legal and
21

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
technical personnel and associated administrative and travel expenses
relative to participation in regulatory proceedings at the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission on behalf of ratepayers in the
commonwealth ............................................................................................. $3,233,255
0810-0016 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend not more
than $618,200 from revenues collected from costs of litigation,
including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees as awarded to
the attorney general by the court or as agreed upon by the parties in
settlement of any claims brought pursuant to the acts enforced in this
item, for the development and prosecution of claims for enforcement
by the commonwealth of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. 1251
et seq., the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7401 et seq., the federal
Safe Drinking Water Act, 42 U.S.C. 300f et seq., the federal
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and
Liability Act, 42 U.S.C. 9601 et seq., the federal Emergency Planning
and Community Right-to-Know Act, 42 U.S.C 11001 et seq., the
federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. 6901 et
seq. and the federal Endangered Species Act, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.
including, but not limited to, the investigation of such claims, personnel
and litigation costs, the engagement of experts, the administration of
studies or related activities and the enforcement of settlements;
provided, that penalties payable to the commonwealth under the
General Laws that are recovered by the commonwealth in the course
of prosecuting claims for enforcement of federal law shall be deposited
into the General Fund; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues
and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system ........................................................................ $618,200
0810-0021 For the operation of the Medicaid fraud control unit; provided, that the
federal reimbursement for any expenditure from this item shall not be
less than 75 per cent of the expenditure; provided further, that funds
shall continue to be used specifically for the investigation and
prosecution of abuse, neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation
based on referrals from the department of public health under section
72H of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided further, that the unit
shall provide training for all investigators of the department of public
health’s division of health care quality responsible for the investigations
on a periodic basis pursuant to a comprehensive training program to
be developed by the division and the unit; and provided further, that
training shall include instruction on techniques for improving the
efficiency and quality of investigations of abuse, neglect,
mistreatment and misappropriation referred under said section 72H of
said chapter 111 ............................................................................................ $5,726,249
0810-0045 For the wage enforcement program; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, a nonmanagement position
funded by this item shall be considered a job title in a collective
bargaining unit as prescribed by the labor relations commission and
shall be subject to chapter 150E of the General Laws; provided
further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the
operation and administration of a specialized prevailing wage and
22

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
construction investigatory and enforcement unit within the wage
enforcement program; provided further, that the unit shall consist of
not less than 2 investigators assigned to eastern Massachusetts, 2
investigators assigned to central Massachusetts and 2 investigators
assigned to western Massachusetts; provided further, that the
specialized unit shall be supervised by at least 1 supervising
investigator and 1 assistant attorney general in the wage enforcement
program’s Boston office with significant experience investigating
violations of the commonwealth’s prevailing wage and construction
laws; and provided further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the
specialized unit shall submit a report on its annual enforcement actions
and violation trends within the construction industry to the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate ..................................................... $7,367,276
0810-0061 For the funding of existing and future litigation committed to
obtaining significant recoveries for the commonwealth ................................ $3,856,817
0810-0098 For the overtime costs of state police officers assigned to the office of
the attorney general; provided, that other costs associated with said
officers shall not be funded from this item; and provided further, that
no expenditures shall be made on or after the effective date of this
item that would cause the commonwealth’s obligation under this item
to exceed the amount appropriated in this item ............................................... $857,588
0810-0201 For the costs incurred in administrative or judicial proceedings on
insurance under section 11F of chapter 12 of the General Laws;
provided, that funds made available in this item may be used to
supplement the automobile insurance fraud unit and the workers’
compensation fraud unit in the office of the attorney general; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the
amount expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item ......................................................... $2,033,032
0810-0338 For the investigation and prosecution of automobile insurance fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the
amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item ............................................................ $581,532
0810-0399 For the investigation and prosecution of workers’ compensation fraud;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the amount assessed for these costs shall be equal to the
amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item; provided further, that the office
of the attorney general shall investigate and prosecute, when
appropriate, employers who fail to provide workers’ compensation
insurance as required by law and those employers or employees who
may seek to defraud the system; and provided further, that the unit
shall investigate and report on all companies not in compliance with
chapter 152 of the General Laws .......................................................................... $408,338
0810-1205 For programs devoted to combatting opioid addiction including, but not
limited to, the investigation and enforcement of opioid dispensing
practices and fraudulent prescribing practices; provided, that not later
than January 30, 2026, the office of the attorney general shall submit
23

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
the results of said program including, but not limited to, the
effectiveness of investigations, opioid and trafficking settlements
pursued and long-term plans for the program .............................................. $2,738,897
0810-1206 For the office of the attorney general, which may expend for a civil
penalties revolving fund an amount not to exceed $2,247,769
from revenues collected from enforcement of civil law; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed
the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system ....................................................... $2,247,769
Victim and Witness Assistance Board.
0840-0004 For compensation to victims of violent crimes; provided, that
notwithstanding chapter 258C of the General Laws, if a claimant is 60
years of age or older at the time of the crime and is not employed or
receiving unemployment compensation, such claimant shall be
eligible for compensation under said chapter 258C even if the claimant
has suffered no out-of-pocket loss; provided further, that
compensation to such claimant shall be limited to a maximum of $50;
and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, victims of the crime of rape shall be notified of all
available services designed to assist rape victims including, but not
limited to, the services provided under section 5 of chapter 258B of
the General Laws ........................................................................................ $3,426,323
0840-0100 For the operation of the victim and witness assistance board; provided,
that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the operation and
administration of trainings and educational programming that
advances the goals of the Massachusetts office for victim assistance;
provided further, that the chair of the victim and witness assistance
board shall submit to the general court and the secretary of
administration and finance a report detailing the claims submitted to
the state treasurer for payment under item 0840-0004, indicating both
the number and costs for each category of claim; and provided further,
that the report shall be submitted not later than January 12, 2026 .............. $2,213,707
0840-0101 For the salaries and administration of the SAFEPLAN advocacy
program to be administered by the Massachusetts office for victim
assistance; provided, that not later than January 30, 2026, the office
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing the effectiveness of contracting for the program
including, but not limited to, the: (i) expansion of the program’s
services to new courthouses throughout the commonwealth; (ii)
number and types of incidents to which the advocates responded; (iii)
types of services and service referrals provided by the domestic
violence advocates; (iv) cost of providing such services; and (v) extent
of coordination with other service providers and state agencies; and
provided further, that SAFEPLAN services shall be maintained at not
less than the levels provided in fiscal year 2025 ........................................... $2,453,510
24

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION.
0900-0100 For the operation of the state ethics commission ......................................... $3,788,198
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL.
0910-0200 For the operation of the office of the inspector general ................................ $6,771,171
0910-0210 For the office of the inspector general, which may expend revenues
collected not more than $1,680,000 from the fees charged to
participants in the OIG Academy, including the Massachusetts public
purchasing official certification program for the operation of such
programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, funds may be collected in the prior fiscal year for
service programs or activities delivered during the next fiscal year; and
provided further, that any unspent balance at the close of the current
fiscal year up to the ceiling shall remain in the account and may be
expended for the item in the following fiscal year ........................................ $1,680,000
0910-0220 For the operation of the bureau of program integrity established in
section 16V of chapter 6A of the General Laws ............................................... $840,613
0910-0230 For the operation of the data analytics unit within the office of the
inspector general ............................................................................................. $703,636
0910-0300 For the operation of the internal special audit unit established in section
9 of chapter 6C of the General Laws ............................................................. $1,522,930
0910-0330 For the operation of the division of state police oversight established
in section 72 of chapter 22C of the General Laws ............................................ $481,542
OFFICE OF CAMPAIGN AND POLITICAL FINANCE.
0920-0300 For the operation of the office of campaign and political finance .................. $2,207,235
OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE.
0930-0100 For the operation of the office of the child advocate; provided, that not
less than $100,000 shall be used to ensure effective cross-agency
coordination of early childhood and school-aged student wellness
efforts to address barriers to student academic success, including, but
not limited to, access to social services, mental health and behavioral
health resources; provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall
be expended on efforts to ensure that transition-age youth who are
aging out of the care or custody of the department of children and
families or the department of youth services are well-prepared for and
25

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
supported in their transition into adulthood; and provided further, that
such services shall include, but not be limited to, staff support through
case management and the provision of direct housing services.................. $4,084,063
0930-0101 For the operation of the state center on child wellbeing and trauma ............. $3,750,000
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION AGAINST DISCRIMINATION.
0940-0100 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination; provided,
that the commission shall pursue the highest allowable rate of federal
reimbursement; provided further, that not later than March 5, 2026, the
commission shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the: (i) number of currently pending cases and
the number of cases under investigation and in post-probable cause,
with the number of post-probable cause cases delineated by the
number of cases in the conciliation, pre-public hearing and post-public
hearing stages; (ii) number of cases pending before the commission
in which a state agency or state authority is named as a respondent,
delineating those cases by agency or authority; (iii) number of new
cases filed in fiscal year 2025; (iv) number of cases closed by the
commission in fiscal year 2025; and (v) average duration of cases
closed by the commission in fiscal year 2025, delineated by cases that
reached the conciliation, pre-public hearing and post-public hearing
stages; provided further, that funds made available in this item shall
be in addition to funds available in items 0940-0101 and 0940-0103;
and provided further, that all non-clerical positions shall be exempt
from chapter 31 of the General Laws ............................................................ $9,005,005
0940-0101 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, which may
expend not more than $1,100,000 in revenues collected from fees and
federal reimbursements received for the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development’s fair housing programs during fiscal
year 2026 and for federal reimbursements received for this and other
programs in prior fiscal years; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the commission may also
expend revenues generated through the collection of fees and costs
so authorized; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $1,100,000
0940-0102 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, which may
expend not more than $410,000 in revenues collected from fees
charged for training and monitoring programs; provided, that the
commission shall work with the office of access and opportunity and
the office of diversity and equal opportunity to design and deliver
training to executive branch staff; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commission may also expend revenues generated through the
collection of fees and costs so authorized; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
26

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the commission may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ....................................... $410,000
0940-0103 For the Massachusetts commission against discrimination, which may
expend not more than $1,400,000 in revenues from fees and federal
reimbursements received in fiscal year 2026 and prior fiscal years for
the purposes of United States Equal Employment Opportunity
Commission fair employment programs; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commission may also expend revenues generated through the
collection of fees and costs so authorized; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the commission may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate, as reported in the state accounting system .................... $1,400,000
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN.
0950-0000 For the commission on the status of women established in section 66
of chapter 3 of the General Laws ..................................................................... $972,297
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF GRANDPARENTS RAISING GRANDCHILDREN.
0950-0030 For the commission on the status of grandparents raising
grandchildren established in section 69 of chapter 3 of the General
Laws ................................................................................................................. $284,272
MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION ON LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, QUEER AND QUESTIONING YOUTH.
0950-0050 For the commission on lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning youth established in section 67 of chapter 3 of the General
Laws; provided, that funds shall be used to address issues related to
the implementation of the commonwealth’s anti-bullying law under
section 37O of chapter 71 of the General Laws ............................................ $1,600,000
COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF ASIAN AMERICANS AND PACIFIC
ISLANDERS.
0950-0080 For the commission on the status of Asian and Pacific Islanders
established in section 68 of chapter 3 of the General Laws ............................. $586,188
OFFICE OF THE VETERAN ADVOCATE.
0960-1000 For the operation of the office of the veteran advocate ................................ $2,000,000
27

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
OFFICE OF THE STATE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0001 For the office of the state comptroller for the management of the
accounting, payroll, related financial systems and annual financial
reports, including prescribing the books and manner of accounting and
internal control guidance for all commonwealth agencies to promote
accountability, integrity and clarity in commonwealth business, fiscal
and administrative enterprises and to mitigate the risk of fraud, waste
and abuse of commonwealth resources; provided, that the comptroller
shall submit quarterly reports to the executive office for administration
and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and
means which shall include, for each state agency for which the
commonwealth is billing, the eligible state services and the full-year
estimate of revenues and collected revenues; provided further, that
the comptroller shall make expenditures for an enhanced intercept
collections of delinquent debt program; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
comptroller may take any necessary actions to secure financial and
payroll data including, but not limited to, restricting certain data
released under section 20 of chapter 66 of the General Laws ................... $11,419,114
MASSACHUSETTS GAMING COMMISSION.
1050-0140 For payments to cities and towns under chapter 23K of the General
Laws ................................................................................................................. $922,824
CANNABIS CONTROL COMMISSION.
1070-0840 For the operation of the cannabis control commission ............................... $16,424,372
Marijuana Regulation Fund ....................................... 100%
1070-0842 For the cannabis control commission’s oversight of the medical
marijuana industry ........................................................................................ $3,457,321
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
1100-1100 For the office of the secretary of administration and finance; provided,
that the secretary shall provide biannual reports, the first of which shall
be submitted not later than January 30, 2026 and the second of which
shall be submitted not later than May 27, 2026, to the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that the
reports shall summarize existing and proposed collective bargaining
agreements in an electronic format, which shall include for each
agreement, , but not be limited to: (i) the session law for the previously
agreed upon collective bargaining agreement; (ii) the current
agreement status; (iii) the collective bargaining unit and unit number;
(iv) the number of full-time equivalent employees subject to the
28

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
agreement, by item; (v) a description of the membership of the unit;
(vi) the total salary base of the most recent previous agreement; (vii)
the start date and expiration date of the most recent agreement; (viii)
the estimated total fiscal impact of the agreement compared to the
previous agreement; (ix) the base salary increases required by the
agreement, by effective time; and (x) the funding status of the
agreement; provided further, that the reports shall detail, by bargaining
unit, the costs to the commonwealth resulting from the collective
bargaining agreements with various public employees’ unions,
delineated by item; provided further, that the reports shall include, but
not be limited to, the: (a) effective date of any new negotiations or
renegotiations; (b) end date of the contract; (c) number of employees
in the bargaining unit, by department; and (d) costs associated with
any new negotiations or renegotiations, including salary adjustments,
step increases, statutory benefits and other non-salary costs for the
current and subsequent fiscal years for the life of the contract;
provided further, that the executive office for administration and
finance shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing federal grant applications
submitted and federal grants received by executive branch agencies
during the applicable reporting period; and provided further, that not
later than December 2, 2025, the executive office for administration
and finance shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means evaluating the stress impacts of varying economic
scenarios for the next 2 fiscal years including, but not limited to, the:
(1) potential effects of economic changes on tax revenue collections;
and (2) sufficiency of the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund
established in section 2H of chapter 29 of the General Laws and other
reserve balances in offsetting potential revenue declines ............................ $4,911,475
1100-1201 For supporting activities relating to accountability and transparency
including, but not limited to, economic forecasting, adoption of uniform
procedures across state agencies and departments and maximizing
federal revenue opportunities .......................................................................... $588,525
1100-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office for administration and finance .......................................... $38,877,981
1100-2200 For the state infrastructure implementation coordinator and the
operation of the federal funds and infrastructure development office;
provided, that the office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on its activities including, but
not limited to: (i) federal competitive funds awarded to the
commonwealth; (ii) federal competitive funds being pursued; and (iii)
the status of pending applications submitted for federal competitive
funds ............................................................................................................. $1,977,064
1106-0064 For the caseload and economic forecasting office; provided, that the
office shall forecast: (i) MassHealth enrollment by group and coverage
type; (ii) participation in state-subsidized child care provided through
items 3000-3060 and 3000-4060; (iii) participation in emergency
assistance and housing programs provided through items 7004-0101,
7004-0102, 7004-0108 and 7004-9316; (iv) enrollment of active
members and dependents in the group insurance commission; (v)
recipients of direct benefits provided by the department of transitional
assistance through items 4400-1004, 4403-2000, 4405-2000 and
29

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4408-1000; (vi) participation in programs provided by the department
of children and families through items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041; and
(vii) other related economic forecasts; provided further, that not later
than October 31, 2025, the office shall report its fiscal year 2025
actuals, fiscal year 2026 year-to-date actuals and forecasts and fiscal
year 2027 forecasts to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means;
and provided further, that not later than March 16, 2026, the office
shall submit updated forecasts to the executive office for
administration and finance and to the house and senate committees
on ways and means ......................................................................................... $248,098
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3199 For the operation of the office of facilities management and
maintenance, including the cost of utilities and associated contracts
for properties managed by the division of capital asset management
and maintenance ........................................................................................ $26,589,990
1102-3205 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance, which
may expend for the maintenance and operation of the Massachusetts
information technology center and other state buildings not more
than $11,296,868 in revenues collected from rentals, commissions,
fees and any other sources pertaining to the operations of said
facilities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ......................................................................................................... $11,296,868
1102-3233 For the division of capital asset management and maintenance for
the certification of contractors and subcontractors ........................................... $996,529
Bureau of the State House.
1102-1128 For state house accessibility coordination, including communications
access to public hearings and meetings; provided, that access shall
include interpreter services for the deaf and hard of hearing .......................... $161,088
1102-3331 For the operation of the bureau of the state house; provided, that the
superintendent, director of operations and other employees of the
bureau shall work in conjunction with the business manager of the
house of representatives and the chief financial officer of the senate
on the maintenance, repair, purchases and payments for materials
and services; provided further, that funds shall be expended for full-
time maintenance coverage of elevators at the state house; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended for personnel
necessary to provide management of physical security technology at
the state house ............................................................................................. $4,556,426
1102-3400 For security operations at the bureau of the state house ................................. $250,000
Office on Disability.
30

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
1107-2400 For the Massachusetts office on disability .................................................... $1,405,887
DISABLED PERSONS PROTECTION COMMISSION.
1107-2501 For the operation of the disabled persons protection commission
including, but not limited to, the costs of maintaining a computerized
registry system of persons who have been substantiated for
registrable abuse of a person with an intellectual or developmental
disability; provided, that the commission shall facilitate compliance by
the department of mental health and the department of developmental
services with uniform investigative standards; provided further, that
the commission shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the number of claims of abuse by
caretakers made by employees or contracted service employees of
the department of developmental services, the department of mental
health and the Massachusetts rehabilitation commission; provided
further, that the report shall include the number of: (i) substantiated
claims; (ii) unsubstantiated claims; and (iii) false claims reported as a
result of intentional and malicious action; and provided further, that all
persons who call the commission’s 24-hour hotline shall be provided
with the opportunity to elect that the call not be recorded .......................... $12,489,298
Civil Service Commission.
1108-1011 For the civil service commission; provided, that the General Fund shall
be reimbursed for the appropriation in this item through a fee charged
on a per-claim basis; provided further, that the commission shall
develop and implement regulations to provide for reimbursement to
the General Fund; and provided further, that the commission may
assess a fee upon the appointing authority when inappropriate action
has occurred ................................................................................................. $1,317,029
Group Insurance Commission.
1108-5100 For the operation of the group insurance commission; provided, that
on a monthly basis, the commission shall provide the caseload
forecasting office with enrollment data and any other information
pertinent to caseload forecasting; provided further, that the
information shall be provided in a manner that meets all applicable
federal and state privacy requirements; provided further, that the
commission shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) any proposed plan changes accompanied by a detailed rationale
for such changes; (ii) a detailed delineation of any estimated
deficiencies or reversions in the current fiscal year, detailed by item;
and (iii) a projection of any funding changes for the following fiscal
year, detailed by item; provided further, that not later than September
26, 2025 the first such report shall be submitted; and provided further,
that the commission shall provide all materials presented at any public
meetings hosted by the commission to the house and senate
committees on ways and means not later than 15 days after the public
meeting ......................................................................................................... $5,742,723
31

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
1108-5200 For the commonwealth’s share of the group insurance premium and
plan costs incurred in fiscal year 2026; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for the commonwealth’s share of group
insurance premium and plan costs provided to employees and retirees
in prior fiscal years; provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, funds in this item shall not be available
during the accounts payable period of fiscal year 2026 and any
unexpended balance in this item shall revert to the General Fund on
June 30, 2026; provided further, that the secretary of administration
and finance shall charge the department of unemployment assistance
and other departments, authorities, agencies and divisions that have
federal or other funds allocated to them for this purpose for that portion
of insurance premium and plan costs as the secretary determines shall
be borne by such funds and shall notify the comptroller of the amounts
to be transferred, after similar determination, from the several state or
other funds and amounts received in payment of all such charges or
transfers shall be credited to the General Fund; provided further, that
the group insurance commission shall obtain reimbursement for
premium and administrative expenses from other agencies and
authorities not funded by state appropriations; provided further, that
the secretary of administration and finance may charge all agencies
for the commonwealth’s share of the health insurance costs incurred
on behalf of any employees of those agencies who are on leave of
absence for a period of more than 1 year; provided further, that the
amounts received in payment for the charges shall be credited to the
General Fund; provided further, that notwithstanding section 26 of
chapter 29 of the General Laws, the commission may negotiate,
purchase and execute contracts before July 1 of each year for policies
of group insurance under chapter 32A of the General Laws; provided
further, that the rules for determining the commonwealth’s share of the
group insurance premiums for active and retired state employees shall
be the same as the standards in effect on July 1, 2012; provided
further, that funds may be expended from this item for elderly retired
governmental employees and retired municipal teachers; provided
further, that not less than 90 days before any changes in coverage,
benefits or the schedule of copayments and deductibles for plans
offered by the group insurance commission; provided further, that the
commission may pay premium and plan costs for municipal
employees and retirees who are enrolled in the commission’s health
plans under the commission’s regulations; and provided further, that
not later than March 3, 2026, the commission shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on: (i) the average full
cost premium equivalent per enrollee; (ii) the average actual cost per
enrollee for enrollees from participating municipalities; (iii) the
contribution ratios for each participating municipality for fiscal year
2026; (iv) the number of members in high deductible health plans; (v)
the premium reimbursement paid by each municipality per active
enrollee by plan; (vi) the average employee premium contribution by
plan for each municipality; (vii) estimates for the total premium per
active enrollee by plan for each municipality; (viii) the average
employee out-of-pocket expenditure and premium contribution by
salary level of employees; (ix) a comparison of the total premium
estimate with the sum total of municipality reimbursement and
average employee premium contribution; (x) the total amount spent
on pharmaceutical drugs; and (xi) the cost of the commonwealth’s
projected share of premiums for the next fiscal year ............................ $2,399,561,737
32

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
1108-5201 For the costs incurred by the group insurance commission associated
with providing municipal health insurance coverage under section 19 of
chapter 32B of the General Laws; provided, that the commission may
expend not more than $2,196,746 from revenue received from
administrative fees associated with providing municipal health
insurance coverage under said section 19 of said chapter 32B; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ........................................................................................................... $2,196,746
1108-5500 For the costs, notwithstanding chapter 32A of the General Laws, of
dental and vision benefits for active state employees, not including
employees of authorities or any other political subdivision, who are not
otherwise provided those benefits under a separate item or by the terms
of a contract or collective bargaining agreement; provided, that such
employees shall pay 15 per cent of the monthly premiums
established by the group insurance commission for the benefits ............. $12,634,259
Division of Administrative Law Appeals.
1110-1000 For the operation of the division of administrative law appeals;
provided, that the division shall maintain, to the fullest extent
practicable, a complete physical and technological separation from
any agency, department, board, commission or program the decisions,
determinations or actions of which may be appealed to it; and provided
further, that a decision issued by a commissioner or other head of an
agency or by such person’s designee following the issuance of a
recommended decision by an administrative law judge shall be an
agency decision subject to judicial review under chapter 30A of the
General Laws ................................................................................................ $1,951,036
1110-1002 For the division of administrative law appeals, which may expend not
more than $70,000 in revenues from fees charged to appellants upon
the filing of claims, for the operation of such services provided ......................... $70,000
George Fingold Library.
1120-4005 For the administration of the George Fingold Library .................................... $1,641,321
Department of Revenue.
1201-0100 For the operation of the department of revenue, including tax
collection administration, audits of certain foreign corporations and the
division of local services; provided, that the department may allocate
funds to the office of the attorney general for the tax prosecution unit;
provided further, that the department may charge the expenses for
computer services, including the costs of personnel and other support
costs provided to the child support enforcement unit, from this item to
item 1201-0160 consistent with the costs attributable to that unit;
provided further, that the department shall provide the general court
33

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
with access to the municipal data bank; provided further, that
notwithstanding section 1 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, seasonal
positions funded by this item shall be positions requiring the services
of an incumbent, beginning not earlier than December 1 and ending not
later than November 30; provided further, that seasonal positions
funded by this item shall not be filled by an incumbent for more than
10 months within a 12-month period; and provided further, that not
less than $820,000 shall be expended to organizations providing tax
assistance services to individuals and families qualifying for the
volunteer income tax assistance program, in partnership with the
Internal Revenue Service, for the provision of such services ................... $103,964,517
1201-0122 For grants to qualified low-income taxpayer clinics established under
section 13 of chapter 14 of the General Laws; provided, that not later
than March 2, 2026, the department of revenue shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the: (i) number
of grant applications; (ii) number of rejected applications; (iii) reasons
for those rejections; (iv) estimated number of taxpayers served by
each approved grant; (v) geographic location of the approved grant
recipient clinic; and (vi) average size of approved grants ................................ $500,000
1201-0130 For the department of revenue, which may expend for the operation of
the department not more than $27,938,953 from revenues collected
by the additional auditors for an enhanced audit program; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................. $27,938,953
1201-0160 For the child support enforcement division; provided, that the
department of revenue may allocate funds appropriated in this item to
other state agencies for the performance of certain child support
enforcement activities and those agencies may expend funds for the
purposes of this item; provided further, that not later than February 27,
2026, all such allocations shall be reported to the house and senate
committees on ways and means upon the allocation of the funds;
provided further, that federal receipts associated with the child support
computer network shall be drawn down at the highest possible rate of
reimbursement and deposited into a revolving account to be expended
for the network; provided further, that federal receipts associated with
child support enforcement grants shall be deposited into a revolving
account to be drawn down at the highest possible rate of
reimbursement and shall be expended for the grant authority; provided
further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the department shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the balance, year-to-date and projected receipts and
year-to-date and projected expenditures, by subsidiary, of the child
support trust fund established under section 9 of chapter 119A of the
General Laws; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and
related expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
34

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
in the state accounting system for federal incentives and the network
in items 12010165, 1201-0410 and 1201-0412 .......................................... $48,226,547
1201-0164 For the child support enforcement division; provided, that the division
may expend not more than $6,767,251 from the federal
reimbursements awarded for personnel and lower subsidiary related
expenditures; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $6,767,251
1201-0400 For the operation of the multi-agency illegal tobacco task force
established under section 40 of chapter 64C of the General Laws ............... $1,188,443
1201-0911 For the costs associated with expert witnesses retained by the
department of revenue to resolve tax disputes; provided, that
expenditures from this item shall be the lesser of $175,000 or the
amount certified by the secretary of administration and finance under
section 156 of chapter 139 of the acts of 2012 ................................................ $175,000
1231-1000 For the Commonwealth Sewer Rate Relief Fund, established
under section 2Z of chapter 29 of the General Laws..................................... $1,500,000
1232-0100 For underground storage tank reimbursements to parties that have
remediated spills of petroleum products under chapter 21J of the
General Laws ............................................................................................... $5,920,100
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Product
Cleanup Fund........................................................... 100%
1232-0200 For the Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Cleanup Fund
Administrative Review Board established under section 8 of chapter
21J of the General Laws and for the administration of the underground
storage tank program associated with the implementation of said
chapter 21J; provided, that notwithstanding section 4 of said chapter
21J or any other general or special law to the contrary, appropriations
made in this item shall be sufficient to cover the administrative
expenses of the underground storage tank program; and provided
further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the board shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
the status of the underground storage tank program including, but not
limited to, the: (i) number of municipal grants made for the removal
and replacement of underground storage tanks; (ii) reimbursements
for remediated petroleum spills; (iii) number of backlog claims; (iv)
average waiting period for claims granted in the past year; and (v)
number of tanks not in compliance with said chapter 21J ............................ $1,818,477
Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Product
Cleanup Fund........................................................... 100%
1233-2000 For the tax abatement program for certain veterans, widows, blind
persons and the elderly; provided, that cities and towns shall be
reimbursed for the abatements granted under clauses Seventeenth,
35

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Twenty-second, Twenty-second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second
C, Twenty-second D, Twenty-second E, Twenty-second F, Thirty-
seventh, Thirty-seventh A, Forty-first, Forty-first B, Forty-first C, Forty-
first C 1/2 and Fifty-second of section 5 of chapter 59 of the General
Laws; provided further, that the commonwealth shall reimburse each
city or town that accepts said clause Forty-first B or said clause Forty-
first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 for additional costs incurred
in determining eligibility of applicants under said clause Forty-first B or
said clause Forty-first C of said section 5 of said chapter 59 not more
than $2 per exemption granted; and provided further, that funds in this
item shall be available for reimbursements to cities and towns for
additional exemptions granted from the motor vehicle excise under the
seventh paragraph of section 1 of chapter 60A of the General Laws ....... $38,972,625
1233-2350 For the distribution to cities and towns of the balance of the State
Lottery and Gaming Fund under clause (c) of the second paragraph of
section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws and additional aid to
municipalities as provided for in section 3 .............................................. $1,308,713,668
General Fund ........................................................ 63.62%
Gaming Local Aid Fund ........................................ 36.38%
1233-2400 For reimbursements to cities and towns in lieu of taxes on state-owned
land under sections 13 to 17, inclusive, of chapter 58 of the General
Laws; provided, that not less than $1,520,000 shall be expended for
one-time, additional reimbursements to cities and towns so that no city
or town shall receive an amount from this line item in fiscal year 2026
that is less than the amount said city or town received in fiscal year
2025 ............................................................................................................ $54,520,000
1233-2401 For reimbursements to qualifying cities and towns for additional
educational costs under chapter 40S of the General Laws .............................. $750,000
Appellate Tax Board.
1310-1000 For the operation of the appellate tax board; provided, that the board
shall schedule hearings in each county; and provided further, that not
later than January 9, 2026, the board shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the number of hearings
held at each location ..................................................................................... $2,663,396
1310-1001 For the appellate tax board, which may expend not more than
$400,000 in revenues from fees collected; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the board may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...................................... $400,000
Health Policy Commission.
1450-1200 For the operation of the health policy commission; provided, that the
commission shall provide all materials presented at any public
meetings hosted by the commission to the house and senate
36

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
committees on ways and means no later than 15 days after the public
meeting ....................................................................................................... $12,610,954
Reserves.
1599-0026 For a reserve to support municipal improvements; provided, that not
less than $3,000,000 shall be expended for the District Local
Technical Assistance Fund established under section 2XXX of chapter
29 of the General Laws, for initiatives, including projects that
encourage regionalization, to be administered by the division of local
services and distributed through the District Local Technical
Assistance Fund ........................................................................................... $6,899,999
1599-0093 For contract assistance to the Massachusetts Clean Water Trust
including, but not limited to, the debt service obligations of the trust,
principal forgiveness, interest rate reduction and other subsidies
or financial assistance under sections 6 and 18 of chapter 29C of the
General Laws.............................................................................................. $63,383,680
1599-0105 For a reserve for costs associated with the delivery of medication-
assisted treatment for substance use disorder at county correctional
facilities under section 98 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018; provided,
that the secretary of administration and finance, in consultation with
the commissioner of public health, may transfer funds from this item
to commonwealth agencies as defined under section 1 of chapter 29
of the General Laws; and provided further, that not less than 30 days
before any such transfer, the secretary shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the
amount to be given to each state agency, delineated by item ................... $18,500,000
1599-1970 For a reserve for the Massachusetts Department of Transportation to
defray the costs of the Massachusetts Turnpike Authority, or its
successor, incurred in fiscal year 2025 under section 138 of chapter
27 of the acts of 2009 ................................................................................ $125,000,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ...................... 100%
1599-1977 For contract assistance and other payments to the Massachusetts
Development Finance Agency for payment of debt service and related
obligations in connection with bonds issued by the agency under
chapter 293 of the acts of 2006, as amended by chapter 129 of the
acts of 2008, chapter 238 of the acts of 2012, chapter 287 of the acts
of 2014 and chapter 219 of the acts of 2016; provided, that not later
than January 30, 2026, the secretary of administration and finance
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means on the estimated contract assistance and other payments
to be required under said chapter 293 of the acts of 2006, said chapter
219 of the acts of 2016, said chapter 238 of the acts of 2012 and said
chapter 287 of the acts of 2014 for obligations existing not later than
July 1, 2025, in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 and an estimate of
anticipated contract assistance and other payments arising out of
potential agreements reasonably expected to be entered into after July
1, 2025, in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 ....................................................... $13,000,000
1599-2003 For the Uniform Law Commission; provided, that prior fiscal
year payments may be payable from this item ................................................... $75,000
37

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
1599-3234 For the South Essex sewerage district debt service assessment ...................... $33,914
1599-3384 For a reserve for the payment on behalf of a state agency as defined
under section 1 of chapter 29 of the General Laws under regulations
promulgated by the comptroller, of certain court judgments,
settlements and legal fees that were ordered to be paid in the current
fiscal year or a prior fiscal year; provided, that the office of the
comptroller shall not pay attorneys’ fees to outside counsel
representing a state agency, including a state official or employee who
is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope of
employment for the commonwealth, in litigation before a court until the
office of the attorney general has reviewed and provided written
approval for the outside counsel's bills, which may be reviewed in
redacted form if warranted because of a conflict of interest; provided
further, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay attorneys’ fees
for outside counsel representing a state agency in such litigation that
exceeds a cumulative amount of $250,000 until the secretary of
administration and finance or a designee has reviewed and provided
written approval for such attorneys’ fees for outside counsel; provided
further, that before a state official or employee who is sued for actions
undertaken within that individual’s scope of employment for the
commonwealth may seek reimbursement from this item, that
individual shall obtain written approval from the office of the attorney
general in a form to be approved by the office of the comptroller;
provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall not pay a
settlement of litigation before a court on behalf of a state agency that
is not within an executive office identified under section 2 of chapter
6A of the General Laws, including any state official or employee who is
sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s scope of
employment for the commonwealth, until the office of the attorney
general has reviewed and provided written approval for such a
settlement; provided further, that the office of the comptroller shall not
pay a settlement of litigation before a court that exceeds $250,000 on
behalf of a state agency that is not within an executive office identified
under said section 2 of said chapter 6A, including a state official or
employee who is sued for actions undertaken within that individual’s
scope of employment for the commonwealth, until the secretary of
administration and finance or a designee has reviewed and provided
written approval for such a settlement; provided further, that the office
of the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
5-year historical expenditure average as certified by the secretary of
administration and finance or the current appropriation, whichever is
greater; provided further, that the comptroller shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means on
the amounts expended from this item, delineated by item; and provided
further, that upon written notification to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means, uncommitted and unobligated funds from this item
may be transferred to item 0612-0105 upon the request of the state
treasurer ........................................................................................................ $1,000,000
1599-4417 For the Edward J. Collins Jr. Center for Public Management in the
John W. McCormack Graduate School of Policy and Global Studies
at the University of Massachusetts at Boston .................................................. $350,000
38

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
1599-6903 For the fiscal year 2026 costs of rate implementations under chapter
257 of the acts of 2008; provided, that rate implementations under said
chapter 257 may include, but shall not be limited to, costs associated
with any court order or settlement between providers of services and
the commonwealth related to the rate implementation process;
provided further, that preference in distributing funds from this item
shall be given to personnel earning wages less than $20 per hour;
provided further, that home care workers shall be eligible for funding
from this item; provided further, that workers from shelters and
programs that serve homeless individuals and families that were
previously contracted through the department of transitional
assistance and the department of public health who are currently
contracted with the executive office of housing and livable
communities and direct care workers that serve homeless veterans
through the executive office of veterans' services shall be eligible for
funding from this item; provided further, that no funds from this item
shall be allocated to special education programs under chapter 71B of
the General Laws, contracts for early education and care services or
programs for which payment rates are negotiated and paid as class
rates as established by the executive office of health and human
services; provided further, that no funds shall be allocated from this
item to contracts funded exclusively by federal grants as delineated in
section 2D of this act; provided further, that the secretary of
administration and finance may transfer from the sum appropriated
in this item to other items of appropriation and allocations thereof for
fiscal year 2026, amounts that are necessary to meet these costs
where the amounts otherwise available are insufficient for the purpose
of rate implementations; provided further, that the executive office for
administration and finance shall submit quarterly reports to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on transfers made from
this item; provided further, that the report shall identify, by line item and
service class, all transfers made from this item as of the date of the
report and all transfers expected to be made before the end of the fiscal
year; provided further, that not later than February 3, 2026, the
executive office of health and human services shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of rates
under chapter 257 of the acts of 2008, including, the: (i) state costs for
rates promulgated as of July 1, 2025, by regulation, department and
program; (ii) state costs for rates promulgated as of January 1, 2025,
by regulation, department and program; (iii) per cent of increase in
state funding for rates to be reviewed between July 1, 2025 and June
30, 2026, by regulation, department and program; and (iv) fiscal impact
for increases in state funding versus prior fiscal year actual costs for
rates to be reviewed between July 1, 2025 and June 30, 2026, by
regulation, department and program; provided further, that contracts
between providers and the departments within the executive office of
health and human services and the executive office of elder affairs
shall require providers to report on the impact of the rate
implementations on employee salaries, employee-related costs and
operations; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the
executive office of health and human services shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of
ongoing and proposed initiatives that increase the hourly wages and
compensation of the direct care human service workforce; provided
39

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
further, that this report shall include: (a) the average uniform financial
report provider data on employee tax and fringe benefit information of
the preceding 2 state fiscal years, as validated with information from
the uniform financial report or a method determined by the executive
office; (b) the median salary and compensation information of the
preceding 2 state fiscal years classified by direct care and front-line
staff, medical and clinical staff and management staff, as validated
with information from the uniform financial report or a method
determined by the executive office; and (c) a comparison of the median
salary for each classification of staff position with the fiftieth percentile
wage estimate for that position as determined by the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics for the commonwealth using the available
data for that rate review; and (d) the average employee vacancy rates
of direct care and front-line staff of the preceding 2 state fiscal years
and the current fiscal year from the date of new rate implementations;
provided further, that not later than March 4, 2026, the executive office
health and human services shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means a comparison of the median salary for
each classification of staff position with the seventy-fifth percentile
wage estimate for that position as determined by the Bureau of Labor
Statistics for Massachusetts in the most recent available data;
provided further, that not later than December 30, 2025, the executive
office of health and human services shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means the methodology used to
develop service rates for home health aides, personal care aides and
homemakers; and provided further, that any human service provider
receiving revenue under said chapter 257 shall use not less than 75
per cent of received funds for compensation for their direct care, front-
line and medical and clinical staff, which may include, but shall not be
limited to, hourly rate increases, wraparound benefits, shift
differentials, overtime, hiring and retention bonuses or recruitment,
as defined by the executive office ............................................................. $207,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0100 For the operation of the human resources division and the costs of
administration, training and customer support related to the
commonwealth’s human resources and compensation management
system and the human resource modernization initiative; provided,
that any employee of the commonwealth who chooses to participate in
a bone marrow donor program shall be granted a leave of absence
without loss or reduction in pay to undergo the medical procedure and
for associated physical recovery time, but such leave shall not exceed
5 days; provided further, that notwithstanding clause (n) of section 5
of chapter 31 of the General Laws or any other general or special law
to the contrary, the secretary of administration and finance shall
charge a fee of not less than $50 to be collected from each applicant
for a civil service examination; provided further, that the division shall
administer a program of state employee unemployment management
including, but not limited to, agency training and assistance; provided
further, that funds may be expended to revalidate civil service exams,
including police and fire medical standards; provided further, that the
division shall be responsible for the administration of examinations for
state and municipal civil service titles, establishment of eligible lists,
certification of eligible candidates to state and municipal appointing
authorities and technical assistance in selection and appointment to
40

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
state and municipal appointing authorities; and provided further, that
the division shall administer the statewide classification system
including, but not limited to, maintaining a classification pay plan for
civil service titles in accordance with generally accepted
compensation standards and reviewing appeals for reclassification
.................................................................................................................... $12,988,535
1750-0103 For the operation of the training and career ladder program............................ $833,075
1750-0104 For the human resources division, which may expend for the
administration of the civil service examination program, examinations
for non-civil service positions and implementation of the medical and
physical fitness standards program ............................................................... $5,939,489
1750-0119 For payment of workers’ compensation benefits to certain former
employees of Middlesex and Worcester counties and the Hampshire
council of government; provided, that the human resources division
shall routinely recertify the former employees under current workers’
compensation procedures .................................................................................. $54,119
1750-0300 For the commonwealth’s contributions in fiscal year 2026 to health and
welfare funds established under certain collective bargaining
agreements; provided, that the contributions shall be calculated as
provided under the applicable collective bargaining agreements and
shall be paid to the health and welfare trust funds on a monthly basis
or on such other basis as the applicable collective bargaining
agreement shall provide .............................................................................. $38,957,530
1750-0928 For the cost to lease or rent space to administer the civil service
physical abilities tests and to revalidate civil service exams, including
police and fire medical standards ..................................................................... $767,078
Operational Services Division.
1775-0115 For the operational services division, which may expend not more
than $16,532,285 from revenues collected from the statewide contract
administrative fee to procure, manage and administer statewide
contracts; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the division may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ......................................................................................................... $16,532,285
1775-0124 For the operational services division, which may expend not more
than $127,386 from revenues collected in the recovery of cost
reimbursement and non-reimbursable overbilling and recoupment for
health and human service agencies and as a result of administrative
reviews as determined during the division’s audits and reviews of
providers under section 22N of chapter 7 of the General Laws;
provided, that the division may only retain revenues collected in
excess of $100,000; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses
41

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed
the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system .......................................................... $127,386
1775-0600 For the operational services division, which may expend not more
than $468,036 from revenues collected from the sale of state surplus
personal property and the disposal of surplus motor vehicles including,
but not limited to, state police vehicles from vehicle accident and
damage claims and from manufacturer warranties, rebates and
settlements for the payment, expenses and liabilities for the
acquisition, warehousing, allocation and distribution of surplus
property and the purchase of motor vehicles; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system, including the costs
of personnel ..................................................................................................... $468,036
1775-0700 For the operational services division, which may expend not more
than $1,000,000 from revenues collected in addition to the amount
authorized in item 1775-1000 of section 2B for printing, photocopying,
mailing, related graphic art or design work and other reprographic
goods and services provided to the general public, including all
necessary or incidental expenses; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed
the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate
as reported in the state accounting system ................................................... $1,000,000
1775-0900 For the operational services division, which may expend not more
than $22,000 from revenues collected under chapter 449 of the acts
of 1984 and section 4L of chapter 7 of the General Laws, including the
costs of personnel, from the sale of federal surplus property, including
the payment, expenses and liabilities for the acquisition, warehousing,
allocation and distribution of federal surplus property; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ......................................... $22,000
Supplier Diversity Office.
1780-0100 For the operation and administration of the supplier diversity office;
provided, that the office shall provide training and other services to
diverse businesses, as defined in section 58 of chapter 7 of the
General Laws, certified by the office that allow those businesses to
better compete for state contracts and ensure that equitable practices
and policies in the public marketplace are maintained; provided
further, that the office shall administer an electronic business
certification application, which shall be accessible to business
42

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
applicants through the internet; provided further, that the office shall
ensure the integrity and security of personal and financial information
transmitted by electronic application; and provided further, that the
office shall, using all existing available resources, provide certification
services to all supplier diversity office qualified applicants within or
outside of the commonwealth, as applicable ................................................ $4,621,306
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-0010 For the operation of the executive office of veterans’ services;
provided, that the secretary of veterans' services may transfer funds
between 1410-0010, 1410-0012, 1410-0015, 1410-0018, 1410-0024,
1410-0075, 1410-0251, 1410-0400, 1410-0630, 1410-1616 and
1410-1700; provided further, that funds may be transferred from said
items to items 4180-0100, and 4190-0100; and provided further, that
the secretary shall notify the house and senate committees on ways
and means not less than 30 days in advance of any such transfer ............ $12,435,035
1410-0012 For services to veterans, including the maintenance and operation of
outreach centers; provided, that said outreach centers shall provide
counseling to incarcerated veterans and to Vietnam war era veterans
who may have been exposed to agent orange and the families of such
veterans; provided further, that said outreach centers shall provide
services to veterans who were discharged after September 11, 2001
and the families of those veterans; provided further, that $2,000,000
shall be expended for clinical care, education and training in veterans'
mental and behavioral health issues, including post-traumatic stress,
traumatic brain injury, substance use disorder and suicide prevention
administered by the Massachusetts General Hospital Home Base
Program; provided further, that the executive office of veterans’
services shall make a payment of not less than the amount
appropriated for each outreach center funded by this item in fiscal year
2025; and provided further, that not later than March 27, 2026, the
executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing for each outreach center
receiving funds under this item: (i) the number of veterans served
annually; (ii) the cost and types of programs, including evidence-based
or evidence-informed programs, offered to veterans; and (iii) a 5-year
spending plan or outline that shall include a summary of the
implementation or further development of evidence-based programs
and program evaluation ................................................................................ $9,528,474
1410-0015 For the women veterans’ outreach program .......................................................... $728,882
1410-0018 For the executive office of veterans’ services, which may expend not
more than $760,000 for the maintenance and operation of veterans’
cemeteries in the city known as the town of Agawam and the town of
Winchendon from revenue collected from fees, grants, gifts and other
contributions to the cemeteries; provided, that the funds appropriated
in this item shall not revert to the General Fund but shall be made
available for these purposes through June 30, 2026 ....................................... $760,000
43

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
1410-0024 For the training and certification of veterans' benefits and services
officers; provided, that the secretary of veterans' services shall
continue a training program for veterans' agents and directors of
veterans' services in cities and towns; provided further, that the
executive office of veterans' services shall provide such training in
several locations across the commonwealth; and provided further, that
training shall be provided annually and on an as needed basis to
veterans' service organizations recognized by the executive office of
veterans affairs to provide information and education regarding the
benefits available under chapter 115 of the General Laws and all other
benefits to which a veteran or a veteran's dependents may be entitled
......................................................................................................................... $388,738
1410-0075 For the train vets to treat vets program; provided, that the executive
office of veterans’ services shall work in conjunction with the William
James College, Inc. to administer a behavioral health career
development program for returning veterans ................................................... $275,000
1410-0250 For veterans’ homelessness services; provided, that the executive
office of veterans’ services shall expend not less than the amount
appropriated for veterans’ homelessness services funded by this item
in fiscal year 2025 ......................................................................................... $3,952,392
1410-0251 For the maintenance and operation of homeless shelters and
transitional housing for veterans at the New England Center and
Home for Veterans located in the city of Boston ........................................... $3,843,750
1410-0400 For reimbursements to cities and towns for money expended for
veterans’ benefits and for payments to certain veterans under section
6 of chapter 115 of the General Laws and for the payment of annuities
to certain disabled veterans and the parents and un-remarried
spouses of certain deceased veterans, including deceased veterans
who were residents of the Soldiers’ Home in Massachusetts, located
in the city of Chelsea, and the Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke whose death
occurred due to the 2019 novel coronavirus; provided, that annuity
payments made under this item shall be made under sections 6A, 6B
and 6C of said chapter 115; provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amounts of
veterans’ benefits paid by cities and towns to residents of a soldiers’
home, homeless shelter or transitional housing facility shall be paid by
the commonwealth to said cities and towns; provided further, that
under section 9 of said chapter 115, the executive office of veterans’
services shall reimburse cities and towns for the cost of United States
flags placed on the graves of veterans on Memorial Day; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
the executive office shall continue a training program for veterans’
agents and directors of veterans’ services in cities and towns; provided
further, that the executive office shall provide such training in several
locations across the commonwealth; provided further, that such
training shall be provided annually and on an as needed basis to
veterans’ service organizations to provide information and education
regarding the benefits available under said chapter 115 and all other
benefits to which a veteran or a veteran’s dependents may be entitled;
provided further, that any person applying for veterans’ benefits to pay
for services available under chapter 118E of the General Laws shall
also apply for medical assistance under said chapter 118E to minimize
44

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
costs to the commonwealth and its municipalities; provided further,
that veterans’ agents shall complete applications authorized by the
executive office under said chapter 118E for a veteran, surviving
spouse or dependent applying for medical assistance under said
chapter 115; provided further, that the veterans’ agent shall file the
application for the veteran, surviving spouse or dependent for
assistance under said chapter 118E; provided further, that the
executive office of health and human services shall act on all chapter
118E applications and advise the applicant and the veterans’ agent of
the applicant’s eligibility for said chapter 118E healthcare; provided
further, that the veterans’ agent shall advise the applicant of the right
to assistance for medical benefits under said chapter 115 pending
approval of the application for assistance under said chapter 118E by
the executive office of health and human services; provided further,
that the secretary of veterans’ services may supplement health care
under said chapter 118E with health care coverage under said chapter
115 if the secretary determines that supplemental coverage is
necessary to afford the veteran, surviving spouse or dependent
sufficient relief and support; provided further, that payments to, or on
behalf of, a veteran, surviving spouse or dependent under said
chapter 115 shall not be considered income for determining eligibility
under said chapter 118E; and provided further, that benefits awarded
under said section 6B of said chapter 115 shall be considered
countable income ........................................................................................ $81,806,000
1410-0630 For the administration of the veterans’ cemeteries in the city
known as the town of Agawam and the town of Winchendon ...................... $1,509,770
1410-1616 For war memorials ........................................................................................... $100,000
1410-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office of veterans' services ............................................................ $4,004,167
Soldiers’ Home in Massachusetts.
4180-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the Soldiers’ Home in
Massachusetts, located in the city of Chelsea, including a specialized
unit for the treatment of Alzheimer’s disease patients; provided, that
no fee, assessment or other charge shall be imposed upon or required
of any person for any admission or hospitalization which exceeds the
amount of fees charged in fiscal year 2025................................................ $46,525,514
Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke.
4190-0100 For the maintenance and operation of the Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke;
provided, that no fee, assessment or other charge shall be imposed
upon or required of any person for any outpatient treatment, admission
or hospitalization that exceeds the amount of fees charge in fiscal year
2025; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
operation of an ombudsman’s office at the Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke
to act as an independent, impartial and confidential resource for the
community .................................................................................................. $31,105,778
4190-0103 For the Soldiers' Home in Holyoke, which may expend for its operation
not more than $50,000 from the sale of goods to residents and visitors
of the home ........................................................................................................ $50,000
45

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4190-0300 For the Soldiers’ Home in Holyoke, which may expend not more than
$2,139,643 for the operation of 12 long-term care beds from revenue
generated through the occupancy of these beds; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the Soldiers’ Home
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system,
prior appropriation continued ........................................................................ $2,139,643
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0100 For the operation of the executive office of technology services and
security; provided, that the executive office shall continue a
chargeback system for its information technology services; provided
further, that the state comptroller shall establish accounts and
procedures as the comptroller deems appropriate and necessary to
assist in accomplishing the purposes of this item; provided further, that
the executive office may establish rules and procedures necessary to
implement this item; provided further, that the chief information officer
shall review and approve any planned information technology
development project or purchase by any agency under the authority
of the governor for which the total projected cost exceeds $200,000,
including the cost of any related hardware, software or consulting fees
and regardless of fiscal year or source of funds, before the agency
may obligate funds for the project or purchase; provided further, that
not later than June 30, 2026, the secretary of technology services and
security shall submit to the state auditor, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on state
administration and regulatory oversight a complete accounting of and
justification for all project-related expenditures totaling $250,000 or
more over the previous 12-month period regardless of source of funds
or authorization for such expenditure; and provided further, that not
later than February 17, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report
to the executive office for administration and finance, the state auditor
and the house and senate committees on ways and means that shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) financial statements detailing savings
and, where applicable, additional expenses realized from the
consolidation of information technology services within each executive
office and other initiatives; (ii) efforts being taken to ensure the
compatibility and interoperability of agency systems and to
consolidate relevant data between agencies; (iii) the number of
personnel assigned to information technology services within each
executive office; (iv) efficiencies that have been achieved from the
sharing of resources; (v) the status of the centralization of the
commonwealth's information technology staffing, infrastructure and
network and cloud hosting; (vi) the status of the commonwealth's
cybersecurity; and (vii) strategies and initiatives to further improve the:
(a) efficiency and security of the commonwealth's information
technology; and (b) transparency of the executive office of technology
services and security with the general court, other executive branch
agencies and the general public ................................................................... $3,675,818
46

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
1790-0300 For the executive office of technology services and security, which
may expend not more than $2,733,931 in revenues collected from the
provision of computer resources and services to the general public for
the costs of the bureau of computer services, including the purchase,
lease or rental of telecommunications lines, services and equipment;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the executive office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $2,733,931
1790-1700 For core technology services and security, including those
previously funded through item 1790-0200 in prior fiscal years .................. $55,798,206
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0100 For the operation of the office of the secretary of energy and
environmental affairs, including the water resources commission, the
hazardous waste facility site safety council, the coastal zone
management program and environmental impact reviews conducted
under chapter 30 of the General Laws; provided, that efforts shall be
made to prioritize environmental justice across all departments ................ $18,847,510
2000-0101 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to
coordinate and implement strategies for climate change adaptation
and preparedness including, but not limited to: (i) the resiliency of the
commonwealth's transportation, energy and public health
infrastructures; (ii) built environments; (iii) municipal assistance; (iv)
improved data collection and analysis; (v) enhanced planning; and (vi)
improved resiliency through the strengthening and revitalization of
natural resources, including marshes and other wetlands; provided,
that the executive office may enter into interagency service
agreements to facilitate and accomplish these efforts; provided
further, that not later than February 5, 2026 the executive office of
energy and environmental affairs shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not
be limited to: (a) the commonwealth’s multi-year plan for developing a
climate change resiliency plan and response strategy; (b) plans to
support local partners in climate change adaptation and resiliency; (c)
an analysis of the differing effects of climate change in different
geographic, ecological, and coastal regions of the state, including
urban, suburban and rural homes; (d) a review of the environmental
justice impacts of climate change on communities of color; and (e) a
detailed breakdown of all expenditures made under this item; and
provided further, that not later than December 30, 2025 the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means, the house and senate committees on global
warming and climate change, the joint committee on transportation
and the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and energy
that shall include the status of its efforts to enhance port infrastructure
for the development of offshore wind ........................................................... $5,127,889
47

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
2000-0102 For the executive office of energy and environmental affairs to
implement an environmental justice strategy and promote and secure
environmental justice; provided, that funds shall be expended on
language translation services to ensure adequate access during
public comment periods; and provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2026 the executive office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) the number of full-time equivalent positions assigned
to the executive office’s environmental justice staff; (ii) the
responsibilities held by the executive office’s environmental justice
staff; (iii) the status of environmental justice policies, strategies and
initiatives being pursued for both the current and coming fiscal years;
(iv) the efforts to expand language access through verbal and written
materials, including the languages in which policy and materials have
been translated; and (v) the impact of language access initiatives on
participation in public hearings and public comment periods ....................... $8,292,156
2000-0120 For obligations of the commonwealth to neighboring states incurred
pursuant to interstate compacts for flood control ............................................ $506,140
2000-0125 For the purposes of dam safety technical assistance program for
public and private dam owners; provided, that the program will support
compliance with existing dam safety requirements ...................................... $1,000,162
2000-1011 For the office of environmental law enforcement, which may expend
not more than $40,000 from the administrative handling charge
revenues received from electronic transactions processed through its
online licensing and registration systems; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ........................................ $40,000
2000-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs ................................. $23,608,139
2030-1000 For the operation of the office of environmental law enforcement;
provided, that environmental police officers shall provide monitoring
under the National Shellfish Sanitation Program ....................................... $16,875,354
2030-1004 For environmental police private details; provided, that the office of
environmental law enforcement may expend not more than $650,000
from revenues collected from the fees charged for private details; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ............................................................................................................. $650,000
Department of Public Utilities.
48

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2100-0012 For the operation of the department of public utilities; provided, that
notwithstanding the second sentence of the first paragraph of section
18 of chapter 25 of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal
year 2026 under said first paragraph of said section 18 of said chapter
25 shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended
from this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel
paid from this item ...................................................................................... $18,817,625
2100-0013 For the operation of the transportation oversight division ............................ $1,052,617
2100-0016 For the department of public utilities to regulate steam distribution
companies; provided, that notwithstanding section 18A of chapter 25
of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year 2026 shall
be made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this
item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from
this item ........................................................................................................... $462,184
2100-0017 For the operation of the division of transportation network services;
provided, that the amount assessed under section 23 of chapter 25 of
the General Laws shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce the
amount expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item ......................................................... $4,282,870
2100-5694 For the operation of the energy facilities siting division; provided, that
funds shall be expended for the implementation of section 12N of
chapter 25 of the General Laws, including the maintenance of a real-
time, online, clean energy infrastructure dashboard, and the creation
thereof ........................................................................................................... $4,000,000
Department of Environmental Protection.
2200-0100 For the operation of the department of environmental protection,
including the environmental strike force, the bureau of planning and
evaluation, the bureau of resource protection, the bureau of waste
prevention, the Senator William X. Wall Experiment Station and a
contract with the University of Massachusetts for environmental
research; provided, that section 3B of chapter 7 of the General Laws
shall not apply to fees established in section 18 of chapter 21A of the
General Laws; and provided further, that not later than February 5,
2026 the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the status of hiring of
additional staff; (ii) the staffing levels of the department for the last 10
fiscal years; (iii) the number of enforcement actions for serious
violations and fine collections compared to the previous 10 fiscal
years; and (iv) recommendations for the additional resources needed
to fulfill the department’s enforcement responsibilities ............................... $54,120,855
2200-0102 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend
not more than $650,150 in revenues collected from fees for wetland
permits; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ............................................................................................................. $650,150
49

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
2200-0107 For technical assistance, grants and support of efforts consistent with
the Massachusetts Recycling and Solid Waste Master Plan and the
Massachusetts Climate Protection Plan; provided, that funds may be
expended for a recycling industries reimbursement grant program,
under subsection (b) of section 241A of chapter 43 of the acts of 1997
......................................................................................................................... $488,748
2200-0109 For the department of environmental protection for the sole purpose
of ensuring sufficient staff for timely permit decisions and compliance
assurance ..................................................................................................... $2,485,550
2200-0112 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend
not more than $2,500,000 in revenues collected from permit and
compliance fees for the sole purpose of ensuring sufficient staff for
timely permit decisions and compliance assurance; provided, that if
this item is eliminated or reduced in fiscal year 2026 or operational
funding for the department falls below the level authorized in the
general appropriations act for fiscal year 2015, excluding
appropriations for earmarks and nonrecurring operating costs, the fee
increase supporting this item shall terminate; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..................... $2,500,000
2210-0106 For the department of environmental protection, which may expend
for the administration and implementation of the Massachusetts
Toxics Use Reduction Act, under chapter 21I of the General Laws, not
more than $2,935,668 in revenues collected from fees, penalties,
grants and tuition under said chapter 21I; provided, that not less than
$1,629,860 from this item shall be made available for the operation of
the Toxics Use Reduction Institute program at the University of
Massachusetts at Lowell; provided further, that the department shall
enter into an interagency service agreement with the University of
Massachusetts to make such funding available for this purpose;
provided further, that not less than $644,096 from this item shall be
made available for toxics use reduction technical assistance and
technology under said chapter 21I; provided further, that the
department shall enter into an interagency service agreement with the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs to make such
funding available for this purpose; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..................... $2,935,668
2220-2220 For the administration and implementation of the Clean Air Act under
42 U.S.C. section 7401 et seq., including the operating permit
program, the emissions banking program, the auto-related state
implementation program, the low emission vehicle program, the non-
auto-related state implementation program and the commonwealth’s
50

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
commitments under the New England Governors and Eastern
Canadian Premiers Regional Climate Change Action Plan for reducing
acid rain deposition and mercury emissions ................................................... $827,446
2220-2221 For the administration and implementation of the operating permit and
compliance program required under the Clean Air Act under 42 U.S.C.
section 7401 et seq ...................................................................................... $1,493,314
2250-2000 For the administration and implementation of the Safe Drinking Water
Act of 1974 under section 18A of chapter 21A of the General Laws;
provided, that the department of environmental protection may expend
funds for the study and remediation of lead in public school drinking
water ............................................................................................................. $2,459,359
2260-8870 For the expenses of the hazardous waste cleanup and underground
storage tank programs including, but not limited to, monitoring unlined
landfills, notwithstanding section 4 of chapter 21J of the General Laws;
provided, that the department of environmental protection shall
provide the department of revenue with information necessary for the
completion of the report required in item 1232-0200 including, but not
limited to, the number of tanks out of compliance with said chapter 21J
.................................................................................................................... $15,615,845
2260-8872 For the brownfields site audit program ......................................................... $1,309,188
2260-8881 For the operation of the board of registration of hazardous waste site
cleanup professionals, notwithstanding section 19A of chapter 21A of
the General Laws ............................................................................................ $394,154
Department of Fish and Game.
2300-0100 For the office of the commissioner of fish and game; provided, that the
commissioner’s office shall assess and receive payments from the
division of marine fisheries, the division of fisheries and wildlife, the
office of fishing and boating access, the division of ecological
restoration, the riverways program and all other programs under the
control of the department of fish and game; provided further, that those
assessments shall be used to cover appropriate administrative costs
of the department including, but not limited to, payroll, personnel, legal
and budgetary costs; and provided further, that the amount and
contribution from each division or program shall be determined by the
commissioner ............................................................................................... $2,181,542
2300-0101 For the division of ecological restoration and the riverways program
and for the promotion of public access to rivers and wetland
restoration, including grants to public and nonpublic entities ....................... $5,033,523
2300-0102 For a culverts and small bridges technical assistance program;
provided, that the program will support improvements to culverts and
small bridges for the purpose of public safety, climate change
resilience, and ecosystem restoration .......................................................... $2,772,000
2310-0200 For the administration of the division of fisheries and wildlife, including
expenses of the fisheries and wildlife board, the administration of
game farms and wildlife restoration projects, wildlife research and
management, the administration of fish hatcheries, the improvement
51

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
and management of lakes, ponds and rivers, fish and wildlife
restoration projects, the commonwealth’s share of certain cooperative
fisheries and wildlife programs and for certain programs reimbursable
under the Aid to Fish and Wildlife Restoration Act; provided, that the
division may expend the amount necessary to restore anadromous
fish in the Connecticut and Merrimack river systems; and provided
further, that no funds shall be spent on restoration of catadromous fish
in the Connecticut and Merrimack river systems unless considered
necessary by the division ........................................................................... $18,338,495
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0300 For the operation of the natural heritage and endangered species
program ....................................................................................................... $1,585,987
2310-0306 For the hunter safety training program ............................................................ $571,463
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0316 For the purchase of land containing wildlife habitats and for the costs
of the division of fisheries and wildlife directly related to the
administration of the wildlands stamp program under sections 2A and
2C of chapter 131 of the General Laws ........................................................ $1,500,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2310-0317 For the waterfowl management program established in section 11 of
chapter 131 of the General Laws ...................................................................... $65,000
George L. Darey Inland Fisheries and Game Fund . 100%
2320-0100 For the administration of the office of fishing and boating access,
including the maintenance, operation and improvement of public
access land and water areas; provided, that positions funded by this
item shall not be subject to chapter 31 of the General Laws .......................... $973,975
2330-0100 For the operation of the division of marine fisheries; provided, that the
division may expend funds for the Annisquam river marine research
laboratory, marine research programs, a commercial fisheries
program, a shellfish management program, including coastal area
classification, mapping and technical assistance, the operation of the
Newburyport shellfish purification plant and a shellfish classification
program; provided further, that funds shall be expended on a
recreational fisheries program to be reimbursed by federal funds;
provided further, that the division shall continue to develop strategies
to improve federal regulations governing the commercial fishing
industry and to promote sustainable fisheries; provided further, that
the division shall expend an amount not less than the amount
expended in the prior fiscal year for the operation of the Newburyport
shellfish purification plant; provided further, that the division shall offer
wet storage and de-sanding services at the Newburyport shellfish
purification plant as laid out in the report dated March 1, 2012;
provided further, that for functions not being performed by the plant
prior to July 1, 2012, the division may solicit competitive proposals for
the utilization of excess processing capacity at the Newburyport
shellfish purification plant, which may include proposals to offer wet
52

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
storage and de-sanding services at the plant as described in the
shellfish purification plant management plan dated March 1, 2012;
provided further, that the division shall be under no obligation to
consider or implement any proposal that the division determines would
displace, impede or otherwise hinder the existing functions of the
plant; provided further, that the division may enter into contracts based
on proposals received; provided further, that not less than 60 days
before entering into contracts, the division shall notify the house and
senate committees on ways and means; and provided further, funds
shall be expended for a program of collaborative research by the
division of marine fisheries through the Marine Fisheries Institute, in
collaboration with the School for Marine Science and Technology at
the University of Massachusetts at Dartmouth, that applies innovative
technology to assess the biomass of fish in the region managed by the
New England Fishery Management Council ................................................ $9,364,804
2330-0120 For the division of marine fisheries for a program to enhance and
develop marine recreational fishing and related programs and
activities, including the cost of equipment, maintenance and staff and
the maintenance and updating of data ......................................................... $1,039,977
2330-0121 For the division of marine fisheries to utilize reimbursable federal
sportfish restoration funds to further develop marine recreational
fishing and related programs, including the costs of activities that
increase public access for marine recreational fishing, support
research on artificial reefs and otherwise provide for the development
of marine recreational fishing; provided, that the division may expend
not more than $217,989 in revenues collected from Sport Fish
Restoration Program funds and from the sale of materials which
promote marine recreational fishing; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...................................... $217,989
2330-0199 For conducting surveys to monitor and forecast the number of
commercially important invertebrate species in commonwealth
waters, including ventless lobster traps employing the services of
contracted commercial lobster fishing vessels in the commonwealth;
provided, that the division of marine fisheries may expend not more
than $250,000 in revenues collected from fees generated by the sale
of lobster permits; and provided further, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur expenses
and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed
the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system .......................................................... $250,000
2330-0300 For the administration and operation of the recreational saltwater
fishing permit program under section 17C of chapter 130 of the
General Laws ............................................................................................... $2,266,149
Marine Recreational Fisheries Development Fund .. 100%
53

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0100 For the operation of the department of agricultural resources, including
the division of administration, the integrated pest management
program, the board of agriculture, the division of agricultural markets,
the division of animal health, the division of agricultural conservation
and technical assistance, the division of crop and pest services,
including a program of laboratory services at the University of
Massachusetts at Amherst, the expenses of the pesticide board and
agency costs associated with the administration of other boards,
commissions and committees chaired by the department; provided,
that not less than $120,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts
Farm to School Project, LLC; provided further, that not less than
$100,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Food Trust
Program established in section 65 of chapter 23A of the General Laws;
provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be expended to
enhance the Buy Local effort in western, central, northeastern and
southeastern Massachusetts; and provided further, that any buy local
effort included in this item shall include locally harvested seafood
including, but not limited to, fish and shellfish ............................................ $10,977,101
2511-0103 For the costs associated with agricultural oversight of hemp and
cannabis ....................................................................................................... $1,000,000
Marijuana Regulation Fund ...................................... 100%
2511-0105 For the purchase of supplemental foods for the emergency food
assistance program within the Feeding America nationally certified
food bank system; provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall
reflect the Feeding America allocation formula in order to benefit the
commonwealth’s 4 regional food banks; provided further, that the
department of agricultural resources may assess an administrative
charge not to exceed 2 per cent of the total appropriation in this item;
provided further, that not less than $1,250,000 shall be expended to
the commonwealth’s 4 regional food banks for operating funds to
distribute food for the Massachusetts emergency food assistance
program; provided further, that not less than $500,000 shall be
expended to the Women's Lunch Place, Inc. to provide nutritious food
and individualized services for women who are experiencing
homelessness or poverty; and provided further, that the department of
agricultural resources may assess an administrative charge not to
exceed 2 per cent of the total appropriation in this item ............................. $55,000,000
2511-0107 For the advancement of community food security and the protection
of public access to sufficient, safe and nutritious food .................................... $100,000
2511-3002 For the integrated pest management program .................................................. $84,413
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2800-0100 For the operation of the department of conservation and recreation;
provided, that notwithstanding section 3B of chapter 7 of the General
Laws, the department shall establish or renegotiate fees, licenses,
permits, rents and leases and adjust or develop other revenue sources
54

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
to fund the maintenance, operation and administration of the
department ................................................................................................... $7,071,194
2800-0101 For the watershed management program to operate and maintain
reservoirs, watershed lands and related infrastructure of the
department of conservation and recreation and the office of water
resources in the department; provided, that the amount of the payment
shall be charged to the General Fund and shall not be included in the
amount of the annual determination of fiscal year charges to the
Massachusetts Water Resources Authority assessed to the authority
under the General Laws; provided further, that the department shall
continue to make payments under chapter 616 of the acts of 1957, as
amended by section 89 of chapter 801 of the acts of 1963; and
provided further, that the department shall continue to make payments
under chapter 307 of the acts of 1987 for the use of certain land ................ $1,677,752
2800-0401 For a program to provide stormwater management for all properties
and roadways under the care, custody and control of the department
of conservation and recreation; provided, that the department shall
implement a stormwater management program in compliance with
federal and state stormwater management requirements; provided
further, that the department shall inventory all stormwater
infrastructure, assess its stormwater practices, analyze long-term
capital and operational needs and develop a stormwater management
plan to comply with federal and state regulatory requirements; and
provided further, that in order to protect public safety and to protect
water resources for water supply, recreational and ecosystem uses,
the department shall immediately implement interim stormwater
management practices including, but not limited to, street sweeping,
inspection and cleaning of catch basins and emergency repairs
to roadway drainage ...................................................................................... $3,388,959
2800-0500 For the existing maintenance, operational and infrastructure needs of
the metropolitan beaches as determined by the commission
established under section 70 of chapter 3 of the General Laws;
provided, that not less than $900,000 shall be expended for the
metropolitan beaches in the cities of Lynn, Revere and Quincy, the
towns of Nahant and Hull, the city known as the town of Winthrop and
the East Boston, South Boston and Dorchester sections of the city of
Boston to be fully maintained and seasonally staffed as recommended
by the metropolitan beaches commission in coordination with the
department of conservation and recreation; provided further, that not
less than $50,000 shall be expended for Save the Harbor, Save the
Bay, Inc.’s staff time, consultants and direct expenses to support the
ongoing work of the commission on the future of metropolitan
beaches; and provided further, that not less than $190,000 shall be
expended for matching grants to public and nonpublic entities to
support free public events and programs on the metropolitan beaches
as part of Save the Harbor, Save the Bay, Inc.’s Better Beaches
Grants Program as recommended by the metropolitan beaches
commission ................................................................................................... $1,255,231
2800-0501 For the operation of the beaches, pools and spray pools under the
control of the department of conservation and recreation; provided,
that the seasonal hires of the department’s parks, beaches, pools and
spray pools shall be paid from this item; provided further, that said
55

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
beaches, pools and spray pools shall remain open and staffed from
Memorial Day to Labor Day, inclusive; provided further, that said
beaches, pools and spray pools shall be fully maintained; provided
further, that seasonal employees who are hired before the second
Sunday preceding Memorial Day, whose employment continues
beyond the Saturday following Labor Day and who received health
insurance benefits in fiscal year 2025, shall continue to receive such
benefits in fiscal year 2026 during the period of said employees’
seasonal employment; provided further, that notwithstanding section
1 of chapter 31 of the General Laws, seasonal positions funded by this
item shall be positions requiring the services of an incumbent, on
either a full-time or less than full-time basis, beginning not earlier than
April 1 and ending not later than November 30 or beginning not earlier
than September 1 and ending not later than April 30; and provided
further, that notwithstanding said section 1 of said chapter 31,
seasonal positions funded by this item shall not be filled by an
incumbent for more than 8 months within a 12-month period .................... $29,286,761
2800-0700 For the office of dam safety; provided, that the office shall, in
collaboration with the department of environmental protection and the
department of fish and game, establish and maintain a comprehensive
inventory of all dams and develop a coordinated permitting and
regulatory approach to dam removal for stream restoration and public
safety ............................................................................................................... $752,377
2810-0100 For the operation of the division of state parks and recreation;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall be used to: (i)
operate all of the division’s parks, parkways, boulevards, roadways,
bridges and related appurtenances under the care, custody and
control of the division, flood control activities of the division,
reservations, campgrounds, beaches and pools; (ii) oversee skating
rinks; and (iii) protect and manage the division’s lands and natural
resources, including the forest and parks conservation services and
the bureau of forestry development; provided further, that all
properties that were open in fiscal year 2025 shall be open in fiscal
year 2026; provided further, that the crossing guards located at
department of conservation and recreation intersections shall continue
to perform the duties where state police previously performed such
duties; provided further, that the division may issue grants to public
and nonpublic entities from this item; provided further, that up to
$3,000,000 may be used to support the costs of snow and ice removal;
provided further, that the rinks under the control of the department
shall remain open and staffed for the full rink season and that ice
skating shall be available from September 1 through April 15 of the
following year; provided further, that local youth programs and
nonprofits get first preference in scheduling on all playfields and
hockey rinks operated by the department; provided further, that
additional funds shall be expended to address the needs of state parks
in all regions of the commonwealth; provided further, that not later
than February 3, 2026 the department shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on: (A) the status
of hiring for additional staffing; (B) the staffing levels for the previous
10 fiscal years; and (C) the average staffing level at each park;
provided further, that the department shall take steps to address
personnel needs in a manner that is geographically equitable; and
provided further, that not later than January 13, 2026, the department
56

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing the hires made for division personnel in fiscal
year 2026 .................................................................................................. $112,263,141
2810-0122 For special projects relating to the commonwealth’s state parks and
recreational areas ............................................................................................ $100,000
2820-0101 For the costs associated with the department of conservation and
recreation’s park rangers specific to the security of the state house;
provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall only be expended
for the costs of security and park rangers at the state house ...................... $3,022,821
2820-2000 For the operation of street lighting and the expenses of maintaining
the parkways of the department of conservation and recreation ................. $4,624,670
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-1001 For the Massachusetts residential conservation service program
under chapter 465 of the acts of 1980 and the Massachusetts
commercial and apartment conservation service program under
section 11A of chapter 25A of the General Laws; provided, that the
assessments levied for fiscal year 2026 under said chapter 465 shall
be made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount expended from this
item and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from
this item ........................................................................................................... $268,957
7006-1003 For the operation of the department of energy resources; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
amount assessed under section 11H of chapter 25A of the General
Laws shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce the amount
expended from this item and the associated fringe benefit costs for
personnel paid from this item........................................................................ $6,992,304
7006-1006 For costs associated with the implementation of chapter 239 of the
acts of 2024 .................................................................................................. $1,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
3000-1000 For the administration of the department of early education and care;
provided, that the department shall report on the first business day of
each month to the joint committee on education, the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the executive office for
administration and finance on the unduplicated number of children on
waiting lists for state-subsidized early education and care programs
and services, including supportive child care services; provided
further, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of the General Laws, the
department of early education and care, the child care resource and
referral agencies, the department of elementary and secondary
education, the department of transitional assistance, the department
of children and families, the executive office of housing and livable
communities, the Children’s Trust Fund, established in section 50 of
chapter 10 of the General Laws, the disabled persons protection
57

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
commission, the district attorneys’ offices and the early intervention
program within the department of public health may share with each
other personal data regarding the parents and children who receive
services provided under early education and care programs
administered by the commonwealth for investigations, waitlist
management, program implementation and evaluation, reporting and
policy development purposes; provided further, that not less than
$7,500,000 shall be expended for an early education and care
educator scholarship program established in section 19F of chapter
15A of the General Laws; provided further, that the department shall
issue monthly reports detailing the number and average cost of
voucher and contracted slots funded by the department for items
3000-3060 and 3000-4060 delineated by age category; provided
further, that said reports shall include the number of recipients subject
to subsection (f) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995;
provided further, that the department of early education and care shall
provide the caseload forecasting office and the house and senate
committees on ways and means with enrollment data and any other
information pertinent to caseload forecasting that is requested by the
office on a monthly basis; provided further, that the information shall
be provided in a manner that meets all applicable federal and state
privacy and security requirements; and provided further, that the
commissioner of early education and care may transfer funds between
items 3000-3060 and 3000-4060, as necessary, for this purpose,
under an allocation plan that shall detail, by object class, the
distribution of the funds to be transferred and which shall be submitted
to the house and senate committees on ways and means not less than
30 days before any such transfer ............................................................... $13,551,428
3000-1020 For early education and care quality supports to improve and sustain
educational quality among providers of early education and care and
to assist early educators and providers in attaining higher levels of
proficiency, skill and quality; provided, that funding may be used to
incentivize public-private partnerships to implement reforms that lead
to student success; provided further, that such partnerships’ funding
shall be administered in coordination with the department of
elementary and secondary education, and preference shall be given
to partnerships serving high percentages of high-needs students;
provided further, that supports funded through this item shall include,
but not be limited to, program quality improvements related to meeting
the Massachusetts Quality Rating and Improvement System
standards; provided further, that costs related to department of early
education and care personnel who support quality improvement may
be funded from this item, including the department's licensing staff and
other personnel who ensure compliance with state and federal
requirements for inspections, monitoring and training; provided
further, that funds from this item may support the Massachusetts
universal pre-kindergarten program, inclusive learning environment
grants and early childhood mental health consultation services;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, any payment made under any such grant to a school district
shall be deposited with the treasurer of the city, town or regional
school district and held as a separate account and shall be expended
by the school committee of such city, town or regional school district
without municipal appropriation; and provided further, that supports
funded through this item may include, but not be limited to, the
58

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
development and purchasing of curriculum, the development and
implementation of early childhood assessment systems, incentives for
programs to recruit, develop and retain highly qualified educators,
payment of fees and direct assistance to programs seeking
accreditation by agencies approved by the board of early education
and care and professional development courses ....................................... $46,903,765
3000-1045 For operational grants to child care providers; provided, that for fiscal
year 2026 funds shall be distributed in accordance with the formula
established in section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws;
provided further, that funds from this line item shall be expended in
coordination with funds from line item 1596-2410; provided further,
that the department shall collect data from participating programs,
including, but not limited to: (i) the number of enrolled children; (ii) the
number of educators employed; (iii) efforts to recruit and retain
employees; (iv) any available demographic data of the families served
by participating providers; (v) to the extent feasible, the income level
of the families served by participating providers; (vi) the amount
awarded to each provider; and (vii) the amount of operational grants
spent by provider, delineated by category of spending including, but
not limited to: (A) salaries; (B) other compensation; (C) workforce
training; and (D) facilities improvements; provided further, that
programs shall respond to all data collection requests and surveys
from the department to be eligible for said grants; provided further, that
funds may be expended for departmental technical assistance related
to the administration and distribution of funding; and provided further,
that the department shall provide technical assistance to providers to
assist them in planning expenditures so as to avoid any fiscal cliffs in
future fiscal years, prior appropriation continued ..................................... $115,000,000
Early Education and Care Operational Grant Fund . 100%
3000-2000 For the regional administration and coordination of services provided
by child care resource and referral agencies............................................... $20,000,000
3000-2050 For the administration of the Children’s Trust Fund established in
section 50 of chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided, that the
department of early education and care shall not exercise any
supervision or control with respect to the board of the trust fund;
provided further, that core services shall include, but not be limited to,
home visiting, social and behavioral health services, substance use
treatment and parental resiliency programs; provided further, that the
pilot program shall support the coordination of services and referrals
using existing resources; and provided further, that not later than
December 30, 2025, the Children’s Trust Fund shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities on the
progress of the pilot program and the mobilization of services at the
family centers ............................................................................................... $1,797,197
3000-2060 For evidence-based, adult-focused child sexual abuse prevention
initiatives that provide technical assistance to communities, youth-
serving organizations and schools to: (i) organize local coalitions
dedicated to preventing child sexual abuse; (ii) recruit, train and certify
local volunteers to provide free prevention education for parents,
students and professionals; and (iii) strengthen the core standards
59

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
around the screening of prospective employees, the development of
codes of conduct, the assessment and modification of physical spaces
to reduce opportunities for sexual abuse, the responding to and
reporting of boundary-violating behaviors and suspected acts of sexual
abuse and the training of staff and volunteers on ways to prevent adult
perpetration and child-on-child sexual abuse .............................................. $2,293,184
3000-3060 For early education and care services for children with active cases at
the department of children and families, for families currently involved
with, or transitioning from, transitional aid to families with dependent
children and for families participating in education and training
services funded by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
provided, that providers shall be reimbursed for subsidized child care
services funded under this item based on enrollment; provided further,
that the department of early education and care, in collaboration with
the department of children and families, shall maintain a centralized
list detailing the number of children eligible for services under this item,
the number of supportive slots filled and the number of supportive slots
available; provided further, that for children with active cases at the
department of children and families, funds may be used to provide
services during a transition period of at least 12 months upon the
closure of the family’s case with the department of children and
families; provided further, that in the case of families involved with
transitional aid to families with dependent children, early education
and care shall be available to: (i) recipients of transitional aid to
families with dependent children benefits; (ii) former recipients who are
working for up to 1 year after termination of their benefits; (iii)
participants who are working for up to 1 year after the transitional
period; and (iv) parents who are under 18 years of age who are
currently enrolled in a job training program and who would qualify for
benefits under chapter 118 of the General Laws but for the
consideration of the grandparents’ income; provided further, that all
teens eligible for year-round, full-time early education and care
services shall be participating in school, education, work and training-
related activities or a combination thereof for at least the minimum
number of hours required by regulations; provided further, that
recipients of transitional aid to families with dependent children shall
not be charged fees for care provided under this item; provided further,
that early education and care services for families involved with
transitional aid to families with dependent children funded from this
item shall be distributed geographically in a manner that provides fair
and adequate access to early education and care for all eligible
individuals; provided further, that informal early education and care
benefits for families involved with transitional aid to families with
dependent children may be funded from this item; provided further,
that the commissioner of early education and care may transfer funds
to this item from items 3000-1000 and 3000-4060, as necessary,
under an allocation plan, which shall detail by object class the
distribution of the funds to be transferred and which the commissioner
shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways and means
not less than 30 days prior to the transfer; provided further, that not
later than April 16, 2026, the commissioner shall submit a preliminary
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and
the executive office for administration and finance on the projected
expenses for the program that shall include, but not be limited to, the
expected surplus or deficiency for the program; provided further, that
60

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
if the department determines that the available appropriation for this
program will be insufficient to meet projected expenses, the
commissioner shall file a report with the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the executive office for administration and
finance, not later than June 30, 2026, detailing the amount of
appropriation needed to address such deficiency; provided further,
that reimbursements for services rendered in prior fiscal years may be
expended from this item; provided further, that the department of early
education and care shall recoup funds owed by providers related to
payments made by the department in prior fiscal years by reducing
payments to those providers for services related to this item rendered
in fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that all children eligible for
services under this item shall receive such services ................................ $448,211,115
3000-4060 For income-eligible early education and care programs; provided, that
providers shall be reimbursed for subsidized child care services
funded under this item based on enrollment; provided further, that teen
parents and homeless families identified as likely to become eligible for
transitional aid to families with dependent children may be paid from
this item; provided further, that informal early education and care
benefits for families meeting income-eligibility criteria may be funded
from this item; provided further, that early education and care services
funded under this item shall be distributed geographically in a manner
that provides fair and adequate access to early education and care for
all eligible individuals; provided further, that reimbursements to
providers for services rendered in prior fiscal years may be expended
from this item; provided further, that the department shall recoup funds
owed by providers related to payments made by the department in
prior fiscal years by reducing payments for services related to this item
rendered in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the commissioner
of early education and care may transfer funds to this item from items
3000-1000 and 3000-3060, as necessary, pursuant to an allocation
plan, which shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the funds to
be transferred and which the commissioner shall submit to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the executive office
for administration and finance not less than 30 days prior to the
transfer; provided further, that not more than 3 per cent of the funds
appropriated in this item may be transferred in fiscal year 2026 as set
forth in a plan submitted by the department of early education and
care; provided further, that said plan shall be submitted to the joint
committee on education, the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the executive office for administration and finance;
provided further, that not later than April 15, 2026, the commissioner
shall submit a preliminary report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the executive office for administration and
finance on the projected expenses for the program that shall include,
but not be limited to, the expected surplus or deficiency for the
program; provided further, that not later than June 30, 2026, if the
department determines that the available appropriation for this
program will be insufficient to meet projected expenses, the
commissioner shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the executive office for
administration and finance detailing the amount of appropriation
needed to address such deficiency; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any
payment made under any such grant with a school district shall be
61

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
deposited with the treasurer of the city, town or regional school district
and held as a separate account and shall be expended by the school
committee of such city, town or regional school district without
municipal appropriation ............................................................................. $517,637,865
3000-5000 For grants to head start programs; provided, that funds from this item
may be expended on early head start programs ......................................... $18,500,000
3000-6025 For grants in fiscal year 2026 to support planning and implementation
activities in cities, towns, regional school districts or educational
collaboratives to expand pre-kindergarten or preschool opportunities
on a voluntary basis to children who will be eligible for kindergarten by
September 2027; provided, that planning and implementation grants
may be awarded through a competitive process established by the
department of early education and care utilizing the Massachusetts
Preschool Expansion Grant public-private partnership model;
provided further, that preference in awarding grants shall be given to
districts serving high percentages of high-needs students; provided
further, that additional preference in awarding planning grants may be
given to districts to update strategic expansion plans completed in prior
fiscal years; provided further, that additional preference in awarding
implementation grants shall be given to districts that have completed
strategic planning efforts that support expanding access to high-
quality preschool through the Commonwealth Preschool Partnership
Initiative; provided further, that not later than March 17, 2026, the
department shall submit a report to the joint committee on education
and the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
status of planning and implementation activities, which shall include,
but not be limited to, the: (i) districts that submitted applications for
grant funding; (ii) recipients of grant funding; (iii) anticipated number of
children served by recipients; (iv) size of awarded grants by recipient;
and (v) recipients’ workforce development efforts; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, funds
distributed from this item shall be deposited with the treasurer of the
city, town, regional school district or educational collaborative and held
in a separate account and shall be expended by the school committee
of such city, town, regional school district or educational collaborative
without further appropriation; provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months; and
provided further, that funds from this item may be used to provide
administration support to grantees, including technical assistance and
program evaluation ..................................................................................... $10,000,000
3000-6075 For early childhood mental health consultation services in early
education and care programs in the commonwealth; provided, that
preference shall be given to those services designed to limit the
number of expulsions and suspensions from the programs and to early
education and care programs serving high percentages of high-needs
students; provided further, that eligible recipients for such grants shall
include municipal school districts, regional school districts,
educational collaboratives, head start programs, licensed child care
providers, child care resource and referral centers and other qualified
entities; and provided further, that funds shall be spent on trauma-
informed professional development for early education providers ................ $5,000,000
62

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
3000-7000 For statewide neonatal and postnatal home parenting education and
home visiting programs for at-risk newborns to be administered by the
Children’s Trust Fund, established in section 50 of chapter 10 of the
General Laws; provided, that such services shall be made available
statewide to parents under 24 years of age; provided further, that the
department of early education and care shall collaborate with the
Children’s Trust Fund, when appropriate, to coordinate services
provided through this item with services provided through item 3000-
7050 to ensure that parents receiving services through this item are
aware of all opportunities available to them and their children through
the department; provided further, that the Children’s Trust Fund shall
oversee the maintenance of a participant data system; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
priority for such services shall be given to low-income parents .................. $17,642,896
High-Quality EEC Affordability Fund ..................... 96.36%
General Fund .......................................................... 3.64%
3000-7040 For the department of early education and care, which may expend
not more than $520,000 for contingency contracts related to pursuing
federal reimbursement or avoiding costs in its capacity as the single
state agency under Title IV, Part E, of the Social Security Act, as
codified at 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapter IV, part E; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the
contrary, these contingency contracts shall not exceed 3 years except
with prior review and approval by the executive office for administration
and finance; and provided further, that for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ....................................... $520,000
3000-7050 For the coordinated family and community engagement grant
program, which shall establish a statewide network of supports for
early education; provided, that the department of early education and
care shall distribute grants not later than August 29, 2025 in order to
allow a full year of service for families involved in these programs;
provided further, that the department shall, to the maximum extent
feasible, coordinate services provided through this item with services
provided through item 3000-7000 in order to ensure that parents
receiving services through this item are aware of all opportunities
available to them and their children through the department; provided
further, that eligible recipients for such grants shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the Massachusetts Family Networks program; (ii)
municipal school districts; (iii) regional school districts; (iv) educational
collaboratives; (v) the parent-child home program; (vi) head start
programs; (vii) other school readiness and family support programs;
(viii) licensed child care providers; and (ix) child care resource and
referral centers; provided further, that supports funded through this
item shall be in alignment with the quality requirements of the
Massachusetts universal pre-kindergarten program and the
Massachusetts Quality Rating and Improvement System; provided
further, that the department shall take steps to streamline activities
and programs funded through this item; provided further, that the
department may expend funds from this item on grants for
63

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
supplemental services for children with individualized education
plans; provided further, that not more than $160,000 shall be
expended for technical assistance; and provided further, that funds may
be expended for programs or activities during the summer months ............ $11,740,598
3000-7052 For the parent-child plus program, also known as the parent-child
home program ............................................................................................... $4,250,000
3000-7055 For the Neighborhood Villages Inc. pilot program to provide high-
quality, economically integrated infant and toddler classrooms that
demonstrate best practices for supporting children, families and the
early childhood workforce and establish infrastructure to facilitate
wraparound health and wellness programming for children and
families; provided, that funds shall be used to support high-quality
early education and care classroom instruction and workforce
development training; provided further, that funds shall be used to
allow for the enhancement, coordination and alignment of early
learning programs with community-based health providers and those
resources that impact outcomes across health and early learning; and
provided further, that the pilot program shall serve to identify resources
and promising practices that inform efforts to support school-
readiness and ensure the healthy development and well-being of
children and families ..................................................................................... $1,000,000
3000-7066 For professional development and higher education opportunities and
supports for early educators to be coordinated by the department in
conjunction with Massachusetts-based 2-year public institutions of
higher education; provided, that programming shall focus on the
statewide recruitment and training needs of the early education and
care workforce, encourage opportunities for career advancement and
retention and incorporate early education and care stakeholder,
employer and industry collaboration; and provided further, that
professional development opportunities shall be consistent with the
core competencies and career pathways established by the
department and, to the greatest extent possible, shall provide a
standard number of college credits transferable to all other public
institutions of higher education in the commonwealth .................................. $4,950,000
3000-7070 For Reach Out and Read, Inc.; provided, that the funds distributed
through Reach Out and Read, Inc. shall be contingent upon a match
of not less than $1 in private or corporate contributions for every $1
in state grant funding.................................................................................... $1,750,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0005 For youth violence prevention program grants administered by the
executive office of health and human services; provided, that the
grants shall be targeted at reducing youth violence among young
persons at the highest annual risk of being perpetrators or victims of
gun and community violence; provided further, that these funds shall
be made available to those municipalities with the highest number of
annual youth homicides and serious assaults as determined by the
executive office; provided further, that any new grants awarded from
64

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
this item in fiscal year 2026 shall comply with the grant application
requirements set forth in item 4000-0005 of section 2 of chapter 38 of
the acts of 2013; provided further, that the executive office of health
and human services may select the same evaluator in fiscal year 2026
as selected in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that funds may be set
aside for the administration of these programs; and provided further,
that not later than February 6, 2026, the secretary of health and human
services shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing: (i) successful grant applications; (ii) the
criteria used in selecting grant recipients; (iii) a set of clearly defined
goals and benchmarks on which grant recipients shall be evaluated;
and (iv) outcomes and findings that demonstrate program success
from the grant awards for fiscal year 2025 ................................................. $12,600,000
4000-0007 For housing and supportive services for unaccompanied youth under
section 16X of chapter 6A of the General Laws; provided, that not later
than February 6, 2026, the executive office of health and human
services shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on: (i) the number of youths served through this item;
(ii) the types of services received by participating youths; (iii) the
number of youths who transition into stabilized housing and the zip code
of the stabilized housing; (iv) the number of youths who remain in
stabilized housing after 90 days, when applicable; (v) other
quantifiable data related to client outcomes as determined by the
secretary; (vi) the number of youths turned away from the program;
and (vii) the amount of funding awarded to vendors for the delivery of
services and the names of each vendor ..................................................... $10,545,850
4000-0009 For the office of health equity established in section 16AA of chapter
6A of the General Laws; provided, that the office may enter into
service agreements with the department of public health to fulfill the
obligations of the office; provided further, that not later than December
19, 2025, the office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the development of the office of
health equity within the executive office of health and human services
and the implementation of programming as set forth in said section
16AA of said chapter 6A, including personnel costs and an
organizational structure plan ........................................................................... $371,692
4000-0020 For the nursing and allied health workforce development initiative, to
develop and support strategies that increase the number of public
higher education faculty members and students who participate in
programs that support careers in fields related to the nursing and allied
health workforce; provided, that the amount appropriated in this item
shall be transferred to the Massachusetts Nursing and Allied Health
Workforce Development Trust Fund established in section 33 of
chapter 305 of the acts of 2008; provided further, that funds shall be
transferred to the fund according to an allotment schedule adopted by
the executive office for administration and finance; and provided
further, that not later than March 3 2026, the executive office of health
and human services shall submit a report to the joint committee on
public health, the joint committee on health care financing, the joint
committee on higher education and the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing the expenditures from the
Massachusetts Nursing and Allied Health Workforce Development
Trust Fund and short and long-term strategies to increase the number
65

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
of public and private higher education faculty and students who
participate in programs that support careers in fields related to nursing
and allied health ............................................................................................... $500,000
4000-0050 For the operation of the PCA quality home care workforce council
established in section 71 of chapter 118E of the General Laws .................. $3,359,767
4000-0250 For the executive office of health and human services, which may
expend not more than $15,000,000 from monies received from the
commonwealth health insurance connector authority for the costs of
the operation and maintenance of the health insurance exchange;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenue and related expenditures, the
executive office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ......................................................................................................... $15,000,000
4000-0300 For the operation of the office of the executive office of health and
human services, including the operation of the managed care
oversight board; provided, that funds appropriated in this item shall be
expended for administrative and contracted services related to the
implementation and operation of programs under chapter 118E of the
General Laws; provided further, that any unexpended balance in these
accounts shall revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2026; provided
further, that no expenditures, whether made by the executive office or
another commonwealth entity, shall be made that are not federally
reimbursable, including those related to Titles XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapters XIX or XXI, the
MassHealth demonstration waiver approved under subsection (a) of
section 1115 of Title XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315(a),
or the community first section 1115 demonstration waiver under said
section 1115 of said Title XI of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C 1315,
except as required for: (i) the administration of the executive office; (ii)
the equivalent of MassHealth Standard benefits for children under 21
years of age who are in the care or custody of the department of youth
services or the department of children and families; (iii) the dental
benefits provided to clients of the department of developmental
services who are 21 years of age or older; (iv) the payments related
to services delivered in institutions for mental disease for which federal
financial participation is not otherwise available; (v) cost-containment
efforts, the purposes and amounts of which shall be submitted to the
executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before
making these expenditures; or (vi) otherwise as explicitly authorized
with the prior written approval of the secretary of administration and
finance; provided further, that the executive office shall provide
technical and administrative assistance to agencies under the purview
of the secretariat receiving federal funds; provided further, that the
executive office shall ensure that any collaborative assessments for
children receiving services from multiple agencies within the
secretariat shall be performed within existing resources; provided
further, that funds appropriated in this item shall be expended for
administrative and contracted services related to the implementation
and operation of programs under chapter 118E of the General Laws;
66

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
provided further, that funds may be expended for the operation of the
office of health equity under the department of public health and the
executive office; provided further, that the office of Medicaid shall
coordinate with the health policy commission in the development of
care delivery and payment models in the MassHealth program,
including patient-centered medical homes and accountable care
organizations, in order to ensure alignment of such models with the
commission’s certification programs under sections 14 and 15 of
chapter 6D of the General Laws; provided further, that in consultation
with the center for health information and analysis, no rate increase
shall be provided to existing Medicaid provider rates without taking all
measures possible under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act,
codified at 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapter XIX, to ensure that rates
of payment to providers shall not exceed the rates that are necessary
to meet the cost of efficiently and economically operated providers in
order to provide services of adequate quality; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commissioner of mental health shall approve any prior authorization
or other restriction on medication used to treat mental illness under
written policies, procedures and regulations of the department of
mental health; provided further, that the executive office of health and
human services may continue to recover provider overpayments
made in the current and prior fiscal years through the Medicaid
management information system and these recoveries shall be
considered current fiscal year expenditure refunds; provided further,
that the executive office may collect directly from a liable third party
any amounts paid to contracted providers under said chapter 118E for
which the executive office later discovers another third party is liable
if no other course of recoupment is possible; provided further, that the
executive office and its agencies, when contracting for services on the
islands of Martha’s Vineyard and Nantucket and the town of
Provincetown, shall take into consideration the increased costs
associated with the provision of goods, services and housing in said
jurisdictions; provided further, that funds shall be expended for
interpretive services directly or indirectly related to a settlement or
resolution agreement with the office of civil rights or any other office,
group or entity; provided further, that the personal care attendant
program shall maintain the same eligibility criteria and level of services
in fiscal year 2026 as were available in fiscal year 2025; provided
further, that the executive office of health and human services shall
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means not
later than January 13, 2026 on the: (A) number of members served in
the dual eligible initiative; (B) average expenditure per member; (C)
average expenditure per member before the demonstration project;
and (D) number of clients that receive care at skilled nursing facilities;
provided further, that not later than December 19, 2025, the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means and the joint committee on health care financing
detailing utilization in fiscal year 2025 of the Health Safety Net Trust
Fund, established in section 66 of said chapter 118E, including the:
(1) number of persons whose medical expenses were billed to the
Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (2) total dollar amount billed to the
Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (3) age, income level and insurance
status of recipients using the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; (4) types
of services paid for out of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund; and (5)
amount disbursed from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to each
67

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
hospital and community health center; provided further, that not later
than March 3, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on health care financing on: (a) total spending related to
pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year 2025; (b) estimated spending
related to pharmaceutical utilization for fiscal year 2026; (c) the actual
and estimated revenue amounts, both in the form of supplemental
rebates and federal financial participation, received in fiscal year 2025
and fiscal year 2026 as a result of total pharmaceutical spending; (d)
total or projected savings amounts delivered from supplemental
rebate negotiations in fiscal year 2026; and (e) the relative impact of
price and utilization of pharmaceutical drugs added to the MassHealth
drug list within fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026; provided further,
that not later than March 3, 2026, the executive office of health and
human services, in consultation with office of Medicaid, shall submit a
report to the executive office for administration and finance, the joint
committee on health care financing and the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the review of wage payment rates
for the provision of continuous skilled nursing care, as established in
101 CMR 350.04, 101 CMR 361, and 101 CMR 453, including: (I) an
aggregated overview of the wage payment rates paid by home health
agencies to staff or contracted nurses providing continuous skilled
nursing care, including any increases in said wage rates resulting from
increases in Medicaid rates paid to home health agencies for
continuous skilled nursing care; (II) an aggregated overview of the
proportion of the Medicaid reimbursement rate paid directly as wages
and benefits to nurses providing continuous skilled nursing care
through a home health agency that contracts with MassHealth; (III) an
aggregated breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the acuity level
of patients receiving continuous skilled nursing care; (IV) an
aggregated breakdown of said wage rates as applied to the licensure
level of the providers of continuous skilled nursing care; (V) state costs
for wage rates promulgated in state fiscal years 2020 to 2025,
inclusive, by regulation, department and program; (VI) the fiscal
impact of increases in state funding versus prior fiscal year actual
costs for wage rates promulgated for state fiscal years 2020 to 2025,
inclusive, by regulation, department and program; and (VII)
recommendations on information to be included in any future reporting
by home health agencies receiving an increase of continuous skilled
nursing care rates provided by the office of Medicaid; provided further,
that home health agencies providing continuous skilled nursing care
shall provide all information and documentation requested by the
executive office of health and human services to compile the required
report; provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means and
the joint committee on health care financing summarizing the
projected total costs for the next fiscal year of pharmaceutical pipeline
drugs identified by the executive office and expected to be made
available for utilization within a 12-month period from the submission
date of the report; provided further, that said report shall not identify
the specific drugs, manufacturer identities or wholesale acquisition
costs of individual drugs identified by the department; provided further,
that the executive office shall submit monthly MassHealth caseload
reports in a searchable electronic format to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that not later than January 13,
68

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the methodology used to
project caseload and utilization in fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year
2026; provided further, that the executive office of health and human
services shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means not later August 1, 2025 and every 30 days thereafter on the
status of the implementation of the behavioral health roadmap;
provided further, that the executive office shall make a supplemental
payment not less than $3,000,000 to Franciscan Hospital for Children,
Inc. above base rates, to compensate for high-complexity pediatric
care; provided further, that not less than $300,000 shall be
expended for Health Care For All, Inc. for the costs associated with
operating its free statewide non-profit consumer assistance helpline in
order to provide health coverage eligibility, enrollment and navigation
assistance and to operate an online support platform for enrollment
assistance across the state; and provided further, that not less than
$2,000,000 shall be expended for Health Care for All, Inc. to work with
community-based organizations in high need areas of the state to
conduct health coverage enrollment assistance, as well as coordinate
and support health outreach and education efforts .................................. $157,140,881
4000-0320 For the executive office of health and human services, which may
expend not more than $225,000,000 for medical care and assistance
rendered in the current year from the monies received from recoveries
and collections of any current or prior year expenditures; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the balance
of any personal needs accounts collected from nursing and other
medical institutions upon the death of a medical assistance recipient
and held by the executive office for more than 3 years may be credited
to this item ................................................................................................. $225,000,000
4000-0321 For the executive office of health and human services, which may
expend not more than $65,000,000 for contingency fee contracts
related to pursuing federal reimbursement or avoiding costs in its
capacity as the single state agency under Titles XIX and XXI of the
federal Social Security Act and as the principal agency for all of the
agencies within the executive office and other federally assisted
programs administered by the executive office; provided, that such
contingency contracts shall not exceed 3 years except with prior
review and approval by the executive office for administration and
finance; provided further, that after providing payments due under the
terms of the contingency contracts, the executive office of health and
human services may use available funds to support special
MassHealth projects that will receive enhanced federal revenue
opportunities, including MassHealth eligibility operations and systems
enhancements that support reforms and improvements to MassHealth
programs; provided further, that any enhanced federal financial
participation received for these special projects, including the
Implementation Advanced Planning Documents or other eligibility
operations and systems enhancements that support reforms and
improvements to MassHealth shall be deposited into this item;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of revenues and payments required under
contingency contracts, the comptroller shall certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
69

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system;
provided further, that the secretary of health and human services may
negotiate contingency fees for activities and services related to
pursuing federal reimbursement or avoiding costs, and the comptroller
shall certify these fees and pay them upon the receipt of this revenue,
reimbursement or demonstration of costs avoided; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
executive office may enter into interdepartmental service agreements
with the University of Massachusetts medical school to perform
activities that the secretary of health and human services, in
consultation with the comptroller, determines to be within the scope of
the proper administration of said Title XIX of the federal Social Security
Act and other federal funding provisions to support the programs and
activities of the executive office; provided further, that said activities
may include providing: (i) administrative services including, but not
limited to, utilization management activities and eligibility
determinations based on disability and supporting case management
activities and similar initiatives; (ii) consulting services related to
quality assurance, program evaluation and development, integrity and
soundness and project management; and (iii) activities and services
to pursue federal reimbursement, avoid costs or identify third-party
liability and recoup payments made to third parties; provided further,
that federal reimbursement for any expenditure made by the University
of Massachusetts medical school for federally reimbursable services
the university provides under these interdepartmental service
agreements or other contracts with the executive office shall be
distributed to the university and recorded distinctly in the state
accounting system; provided further, that contingency fees paid to the
University of Massachusetts medical school shall not exceed
$40,000,000 for state fiscal year 2026 except for contingency fees paid
under interdepartmental service agreements for recoveries related to
special disability workload projects; and provided further, that not later
than December 19, 2025, the secretary of health and human services
shall submit a report to the executive office for administration and
finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (A) the amounts of the agreements; (B) a delineation of all
ongoing and new projects; and (C) the amount of federal
reimbursement and cost avoidance derived from the contracts for the
previous fiscal year’s activities ........................................................................... $65,000,000
4000-0322 For the executive office of health and human services, which may
expend not more than $10,000,000 for contingency fee contracts
related to revenue maximization projects pursuing additional federal
reimbursement or avoiding state costs; provided, that such
contingency contracts shall not exceed 3 years except with prior
review and approval by the executive office for administration and
finance; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures required under contingency contracts, the executive
office of health and human services shall incur expenses and the
comptroller shall certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system; and provided further, that the secretary
of health and human services may negotiate contingency fees for
activities and services related to pursuing federal reimbursement or
70

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
avoiding costs, and the comptroller shall certify these fees and pay
them upon the receipt of this revenue, reimbursement or
demonstration of costs avoided .................................................................. $10,000,000
4000-0430 For the CommonHealth program to provide primary and supplemental
medical care and assistance to disabled adults and children under
sections 9A, 16 and 16A of chapter 118E of the General Laws;
provided, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
services provided to the recipients in prior fiscal years; provided
further, that the executive office of health and human services shall
maximize federal reimbursement for state expenditures made on
behalf of those adults and children; provided further, that children shall
be determined eligible for medical care and assistance if they meet
the disability standards as defined by the executive office; provided
further, that, such standards shall be no more restrictive than those in
effect on July 1, 1996; and provided further, that the executive office
shall process a CommonHealth application within 45 days of receipt
of a completed application or within 90 days if a determination of
disability is required .................................................................................. $340,074,133
4000-0500 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients
through the executive office of health and human services’ managed
care delivery systems, including a behavioral health contractor, the
Primary Care Clinician Plan, Primary Care Accountable Care
Organizations, MassHealth managed care organizations and
Accountable Care Partnership Plans and for MassHealth benefits
provided to children, adolescents and adults under section 9 of
chapter 118E of the General Laws and clauses (a) to (d), inclusive,
and clause (h) of subsection (2) of section 9A of said chapter 118E
and section 16C of said chapter 118E; provided, that no funds shall
be expended from this item for children and adolescents under clause
(c) of said subsection (2) of said section 9A of said chapter 118E
whose household incomes, as determined by the executive office,
exceed 150 per cent of the federal poverty level; provided further, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
to recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive
office shall require that any contract or other arrangement entered into
by a managed care provider under the managed care delivery system
for the provision and administration of pharmacy benefit management
services on behalf of individuals enrolled in programs of medical
assistance under this item, including a managed care provider
participating in an accountable care partnership plan, shall include, but
not be limited to, the requirement that pharmacy benefit managers: (i)
identify all sources and amounts of income, payments and financial
benefits related to the provision and administration of pharmacy
benefit management services on behalf of the managed care provider
including, but not limited to, pricing discounts, rebates, inflationary
payments, credits, clawbacks, fees, grants, chargebacks,
reimbursements or other benefits; and (ii) disclose to MassHealth the
sources and amounts of all income, payments and financial benefits
received by the pharmacy benefit manager; provided further, that the
personal care attendant program shall maintain the same eligibility
criteria and level of services in fiscal year 2026 as were available in
fiscal year 2025; provided further, that not later than February 6, 2026,
the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (A) the total number of
71

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
members participating in the Accountable Care Organization program;
(B) disenrollment trends from the Partnership Plan, Primary Care
Accountable Care Organization and Managed Care Organization-
administered Accountable Care Organizations within the designated
plan selection; (C) the outcomes achieved by accountable care
organizations and community partners including, but not limited to,
financial performance, patient safety, patient satisfaction, quality and
aggregate and per-member reductions in spending compared to prior
cost trends; (D) the results of benchmarks on accountable care
organizations’ and community partners’ progress toward an integrated
care delivery system; and (E) a summary of spending and activities
related to traditionally non-reimbursed services to address health-
related social needs including, but not limited to, home and
community-based services, housing stabilization and support, utility
assistance, non-medical transportation, physical activity, nutrition and
sexual assault and domestic violence supports; provided further, that
said summary shall include, to the maximum extent practicable,
aggregated data on the results of preventative health care services
such as health-related social needs screening, the number of referrals
to human service providers to address such screening, the result of
such referrals and changes in health status; provided further, that such
data shall be stratified by demographic factors to support an analysis
of the impact on health disparities; provided further, that where data is
not available, a report on progress toward establishing necessary data
systems shall be provided; provided further, that said summary shall
include outcome measures for at-risk populations with chronic health
conditions; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the
executive office shall conduct a comparative analysis of the rate
differential for inpatient psychiatric and substance use hospital per
diem payments between MassHealth and its contracted health
insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations, behavioral
health management firms and third-party administrators under
contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care
clinician plan and submit such analysis to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on mental
health, substance use and recovery ...................................................... $6,013,267,263
4000-0601 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are
seniors, including those provided through the Medicare Savings
Program, and for the operation of the MassHealth senior care options
program under section 9D of chapter 118E of the General Laws;
provided, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
services provided to recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purposes of an individual's eligibility for the senior care options
program, an individual is deemed to reach the age of 65 on the first
day of the month in which their sixty-fifth birthday occurs; provided
further, that nursing facility rates effective October 1, 2025 under
section 13D of said chapter 118E shall be developed using the costs
of calendar year 2019; provided further, that funds shall be expended
from this item to maintain a personal needs allowance of $72.80 per
month for individuals residing in nursing and rest homes who are
eligible for MassHealth, emergency aid to the elderly, the disabled and
children program or supplemental security income; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for any
nursing home facility or non-acute chronic disease hospital that
72

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
provides kosher food to its residents, the executive office of health and
human services, in consultation with the center for health information
and analysis and in recognition of the special innovative program
status granted by the executive office, shall continue to make the
standard payment rates established in fiscal year 2006 to reflect the
high dietary costs incurred in providing kosher food; provided further,
that MassHealth shall reimburse nursing home facilities for up to 20
medical leave-of-absence days and shall reimburse the facilities for
up to 10 non-medical leave-of-absence days; provided further, that
medical leave-of-absence days shall include an observation stay in a
hospital in excess of 24 hours; provided further, that no nursing home
shall reassign a patient’s bed during a leave of absence that is eligible
for reimbursement under this item; provided further, that not later than
January 16, 2026, MassHealth shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing, for fiscal year 2025,
the: (i) number of nursing facility clients on a leave of absence,
delineated by the nursing facility, medical leave-of-absence days and
medical leave-of-absence days that exceeded 10 days per hospital
stay, nonmedical leave-of-absence days and the total number of days
on leave of absence unduplicated member count; (ii) monthly licensed
bed capacity level per nursing home and the monthly total number of
empty beds per nursing facility, total number of all nursing home
residents and total MassHealth nursing home residents; (iii) 6
separate MassHealth payment rates and the average payment
amount rate per nursing facility client resident; (iv) actual number of
nursing home residents for each of the 6 payment rates in clause (iii);
and (v) aggregate payment amount per nursing facility by month;
provided further, that the information in the report shall be delineated
by nursing facility, including grand totals where appropriate; provided
further, that the personal care attendant program shall maintain the
same eligibility criteria and level of services in fiscal year 2026 as were
available in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that no payment for
special provider costs shall be made from this item without the prior
written approval of the secretary of administration and finance;
provided further, that not later than February 3, 2026, the executive
office of health and human services shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of
the Medicare Savings Program expanded program eligibility for
seniors pursuant to section 25A of said chapter 118E; and provided
further, that said report shall include, but not be limited to: (A) the
number of members who are seniors whose household incomes, as
determined by the executive office, exceed 135 per cent of the federal
poverty level, that are enrolled in Medicare Savings Programs during
each month of the fiscal year; (B) total enrollment in the Qualified
Medicare Beneficiary program, Specified Low-Income Medicare
Beneficiary Program and Qualifying Individual Program; (C) total
annual spending on Medicare premiums and cost-sharing for such
members; and (D) total annual transfers from the prescription
advantage program in item 9110-1455 and Health Safety Net Trust
Fund to fund the Medicare Savings Program expansion ...................... $5,117,088,567
4000-0641 For nursing facility Medicaid rates; provided, that in fiscal year 2026,
the executive office of health and human services, in consultation with
the center for health information and analysis, shall establish rates that
cumulatively total $342,100,000 more than the annual payment rates
established under the rates in effect as of June 30, 2002; provided
73

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
further, that not less than $30,000,000 shall be expended in base rates
for additional payments over the rate established in October 2024 to
reflect nursing facility resident care and workforce costs including
wages, hiring of staff and training for nursing facility workers; provided
further, that an amount for expenses related to the collection and
administration of section 63 of chapter 118E of the General Laws shall
be transferred to the executive office; and provided further, that the
payments made under this item shall be allocated in an amount
sufficient to implement section 622 of chapter 151 of the acts of 1996
.................................................................................................................. $655,073,456
4000-0700 For health care services provided to medical assistance recipients
under the executive office of health and human services’ health care
indemnity or third-party liability plan, to medical assistance recipients
not otherwise covered under the executive office’s managed care or
senior care plans and for MassHealth benefits provided to children,
adolescents and adults under section 9 of chapter 118E of the General
Laws and clauses (a) to (d), inclusive, and clause (h) of subsection (2)
of section 9A of said chapter 118E and section 16C of said chapter
118E; provided, that funds may be expended from this item for health
care services provided to recipients in prior fiscal years; provided
further, that children who have aged out of the custody of the
department of children and families shall be eligible for benefits
through the age limit specified in MassHealth’s approved state plan;
provided further, that the executive office may reduce MassHealth
premiums or copayments or offer other incentives to encourage
enrollees to comply with wellness goals; provided further, that funds
shall be expended to eliminate pharmacy copayments for all
MassHealth members; provided further, that funds shall be expended
from this item for members who qualify for early intervention services;
provided further, that notwithstanding this item, funds may be
expended from this item for the purchase of third-party insurance
including, but not limited to, Medicare for any medical assistance
recipient; provided further, that funds may be expended from this item
for activities relating to customer service; provided further, that funds
may be expended from this item for activities relating to disability
determinations or utilization management and review, including patient
screenings and evaluations, regardless of whether such activities are
performed by a state agency, contractor, agent or provider; provided
further, that MassHealth shall expend $13,000,000 in the aggregate
for acute care hospitals that have greater than 63 per cent of their
gross patient service revenue from governmental payers and free care
as determined by the executive office; provided further, that in fiscal
year 2026, MassHealth shall maintain the same level of federally
optional chiropractic services that were in effect in fiscal year 2016
and that were included in its state plan or demonstration program in
effect on January 1, 2002 for members enrolled in the primary care
clinician program; provided further, that the personal care attendant
program shall maintain the same eligibility criteria and level of services
in fiscal year 2026 as were available in fiscal year 2025; provided
further, that MassHealth shall continue to expend funds for expanded
oral health benefits, including endodontic and prosthodontic services,
for adult members, consistent with the benefits provided beginning on
January 1, 2021; provided further, that dental services for adults shall
be covered at least to the extent they were covered as of June 30,
2025; provided further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the executive
74

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
office shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on: (i) dental coverage available to MassHealth recipients as
of January 1, 2026 as it compares to dental coverage available to
MassHealth recipients on January 1, 2010; (ii) utilization of dental
services in fiscal year 2025 and fiscal year 2026; (iii) the actual and
projected costs and revenue associated with dental coverage in fiscal
year 2025 and fiscal year 2026; and (iv) the estimated cost
effectiveness of dental coverage as a contributor to MassHealth total
cost of care; provided further, that no payments for special provider
costs shall be made from this item without the prior written approval of
the secretary of administration and finance; provided further, that
no funds shall be expended from this item for children and
adolescents under clause (c) of said subsection (2) of said section 9A
of said chapter 118E whose household incomes, as determined by the
executive office, exceed 150 per cent of the federal poverty level;
provided further, that in fiscal year 2026, the executive office shall not
fund programs relating to case management with the intention of
reducing length of stay for neonatal intensive care unit cases; provided
further, that not later than December 2, 2025, $750,000 shall be
equally distributed to the teaching community health centers with
family medicine residency programs in the cities of Worcester and
Lawrence and in the South Boston section of the city of Boston;
provided further, that the secretary of health and human services shall
designate the league of community health centers to administer the
funds and shall retain 5 per cent of the total funds; and provided
further, that the secretary shall: (A) report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the use of the funds by teaching
community health centers; and (B) audit said centers in order to
confirm the use of the funds by each center for training purposes ....... $4,231,525,812
4000-0875 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for
the provision of benefits to eligible individuals who require medical
treatment for either breast or cervical cancer under section 2 of the
federal Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Act of
2000, Public Law 106-354, codified at 42 U.S.C.
1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XVIII) and section 10D of chapter 118E of the
General Laws; provided, that the executive office of health and human
services shall provide these benefits to individuals whose incomes, as
determined by the executive office, do not exceed 250 per cent of the
federal poverty level, subject to continued federal approval; and
provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for
health care services provided to these recipients in prior fiscal years
.................................................................................................................... $18,500,000
4000-0880 For MassHealth benefits under clause (c) of subsection (2) of section
9A of chapter 118E of the General Laws and section 16C of said
chapter 118E for children and adolescents whose household incomes,
as determined by the executive office of health and human services,
exceed 150 per cent of the federal poverty level; provided, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
those children and adolescents in prior fiscal years; and provided
further, that funds may be expended from this item for health care
subsidies provided to eligible individuals under the last paragraph of
section 9 and section 16D of said chapter 118E ......................................... $576,309,407
75

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4000-0885 For the cost of health insurance subsidies paid to employees of small
businesses in the insurance reimbursement program under section 9C
of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to persons
in prior fiscal years; provided further, that funds may be expended only
for employees who are ineligible for subsidized insurance through the
commonwealth health insurance connector authority and ineligible for
any MassHealth program; provided further, that enrollment in this
program may be capped to ensure that MassHealth expenditures shall
not exceed the amount appropriated; and provided further, that funds
may be expended from this item for health care services provided to
individuals eligible under clause (j) of subsection (2) of section 9A of
said chapter 118E ....................................................................................... $34,042,020
4000-0940 For providing health care services related to the federal Patient
Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148; provided,
that funds may be expended from this item for health care services to
individuals ages 19 to 64, inclusive, whose household incomes, as
determined by the executive office of health and human services, do
not exceed 133 per cent of the federal poverty level and those who are
eligible under clauses (b) and (d) of subsection (2) of section 9A of
chapter 118E of the General Laws; and provided further, that in fiscal
year 2026, MassHealth shall maintain the same level of vision
services that were in effect in fiscal year 2025 for members enrolled
in the CarePlus program ........................................................................ $3,587,449,744
4000-0950 For administrative and program expenses associated with the
children’s behavioral health initiative to provide comprehensive,
community-based behavioral health services to children suffering from
severe emotional disturbances; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item for health care services provided to these persons in
prior fiscal years; provided further, that the executive office of health
and human services shall submit biannual reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the implementation of the
initiative; provided further, that said reports shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the results of the scheduled plan to date, including a
schedule detailing commencement of services and associated costs
by service type; (ii) an analysis of compliance with the terms of the
settlement agreement to date; (iii) a detailed itemization of services
and service utilization by service type, geographical location and the
age of the member receiving the service; (iv) data detailing the time
that elapsed between a member’s request for services and
commencement of an initial assessment for services; (v) the time to
complete the initial assessment and the time that elapsed between
initial assessment for services and commencement of services; and
(vi) a quarterly update of whether projected expenditures are likely to
exceed the amount appropriated in this item; provided further, that any
unexpended balance in this item shall revert to the General Fund on
June 30, 2026; and provided further, that funds shall not be transferred
from this item without notifying the house and senate committees on
ways and means not less than 30 days before such a transfer ............... $331,019,154
4000-0990 For the executive office of health and human services to expend for
the children’s medical security plan to provide health services for
uninsured children from birth through age 18, inclusive; provided, that
funds may be expended from this item for health care services provided
76

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
to those persons in prior fiscal years; provided further, that the
executive office shall maximize federal reimbursements for state
expenditures made on behalf of the children; provided further, that the
executive office shall expend all necessary funds from this item to
ensure the provision of the program established in section 10F of
chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided further, that the
MassHealth benefit request shall be used as a joint application to
determine the eligibility for both MassHealth and the children’s
medical security plan; provided further, that the executive office shall
prescreen enrollees and applicants for Medicaid eligibility; provided
further, that the maximum benefit levels for this program shall be made
available only to those children who have been determined by the
executive office to be ineligible for MassHealth benefits; and provided
further, that no applicant shall be enrolled in the program until the
applicant has been denied eligibility for the MassHealth program other
than MassHealth Limited............................................................................. $42,600,000
4000-1400 For the provision of MassHealth benefits to persons diagnosed
with human immunodeficiency virus with incomes that do not exceed
200 per cent of the federal poverty level; provided, that funds may be
expended from this item for health care services provided to said
persons in prior fiscal years ........................................................................ $16,555,080
4000-1420 For payment to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services in compliance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security
Act, as codified at 42 U.S.C. chapter 7, subchapter XIX......................... $704,207,262
4000-1426 For health care services provided to MassHealth members through
the following MassHealth waivers approved under section 1915(c) of
the federal Social Security Act: (i) the Acquired Brain Injury Residential
Habilitation waiver; (ii) the Acquired Brain Injury Non-Residential
Habilitation waiver; (iii) the Moving Forward Plan Residential Supports
waiver; and (iv) the Moving Forward Plan Community Living waiver;
provided, that funds may be expended from this item for administrative
and program expenses associated with the operation of said waivers;
and provided further, that funds may be expended from this item for
health care services provided to members participating in said waivers
in prior fiscal years .................................................................................... $540,321,947
4000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office of health and human services ......................................... $180,854,361
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0111 For the operation of the office for refugees and immigrants; provided,
that the office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) a list of recipients of such
funds; (ii) the amounts distributed to each recipient; and (iii) the number
of newly arrived immigrants and refugees served by each recipient ............. $1,052,320
4003-0122 For a citizenship for new Americans program to assist legal permanent
residents of the commonwealth in becoming citizens of the United
States; provided, that the office for refugees and immigrants shall
administer the program; provided further, that the program funded
under this item shall provide assistance to persons who are within 3
years of eligibility to become citizens of the United States; provided
77

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
further, that services shall include: (i) English for Speakers of Other
Languages/civics classes; (ii) citizenship application assistance; (iii)
interview preparation; and (iv) support services including, but not
limited to, interpretation and referral services; provided further, that
persons who would qualify for benefits under chapter 118A of the
General Laws but for their status as legal noncitizens shall be given
the highest priority for services; provided further, that persons who
currently receive state-funded benefits that could be replaced in
whole or in part by federally funded benefits if those persons become
citizens shall be given priority for services; provided further, that funds
may be expended for the programmatic and administrative support of
the office’s refugee and immigrant services; provided further, that not
later than January 16, 2026 the office for refugees and immigrants
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means including, but not limited to: (A) the services provided to
immigrants and refugees, including but not limited to Afghan, Haitian,
and Ukrainian refugees and immigrants in fiscal year 2024 and 2025;
(B) the number of said refugees and immigrants serviced; and (C) the
efforts taken to fully settle said refugees and immigrants and provide
them with support services to find employment, housing, health
insurance and childcare; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for the programmatic and administrative support of the
office’s refugee and immigrant services ........................................................ $1,305,255
4003-0124 For the implementation of an immigration legal services program;
provided, that funds may be expended for costs associated with
implementing the program; and provided further, that, subject to
appropriation, funds shall be distributed by the office for refugees and
immigrants to designated non-profit organizations to increase access
to legal representation for immigrants and refugees in the
commonwealth, including, but not limited to, legal assistance in a
single consultation or ongoing legal representation and all legal
advice, advocacy and related assistance ..................................................... $5,000,000
Center for Health Information and Analysis.
4100-0060 For the operation of the center for health information and analysis
established in chapter 12C of the General Laws; provided, that the
estimated costs of the center shall be assessed in the manner
prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C; and provided further, that
the center for health information and analysis shall report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means not later than January 9,
2026 on: (i) the MassHealth rates of payment for telehealth services;
(ii) the MassHealth rates of payment for comparable in-person
services; and (iii) the utilization rates of telehealth services where in
person services are available ...................................................................... $33,664,991
4100-0063 For the operation of the Betsy Lehman center for patient safety and
medical error reduction established in section 15 of chapter 12C of the
General Laws; provided, that the estimated costs of the center shall
be assessed in the manner prescribed by section 7 of said chapter 12C
...................................................................................................................... $3,174,027
OFFICE OF DISABILITIES AND COMMUNITY SERVICES.
78

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.
4110-0001 For the operation of the Massachusetts commission for the blind,
including the cost of sheltered workforce employee retirement benefits
...................................................................................................................... $1,862,462
4110-1000 For the community services program; provided, that the
Massachusetts commission for the blind shall work in collaboration
with the Massachusetts commission for the deaf and hard of hearing
to provide assistance and services to the deaf-blind community
through the deaf-blind community access network; and provided
further, that not less than $850,000 shall be expended by the
Massachusetts commission for the blind to maximize the independent
living skills of legally blind residents of the commonwealth through
rehabilitation and the provision of accessible devices, assistive
software and equipment and supportive technology training by
qualified providers in community, residential, virtual and facility-based
settings ......................................................................................................... $8,064,721
4110-2000 For the turning 22 program of the Massachusetts commission for the
blind, including deaf-blind extended supports; provided, that the
commission shall work in conjunction with the department of
developmental services to secure the maximum amount of federal
reimbursements available for the care of turning 22 program clients ......... $18,287,034
4110-3010 For vocational rehabilitation services for the blind operated in
cooperation with the federal government; provided, that no funds from
federal vocational rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall be
deducted for pensions, group health or life insurance or any other such
indirect costs of federally reimbursed state employees ................................ $2,547,485
Massachusetts Rehabilitation Commission.
4120-0200 For independent living centers; provided, that not later than April 1,
2026, MassAbility shall report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the services provided by independent living
centers, which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) total number
of consumers that request and receive services; (ii) types of services
requested and received by consumers; (iii) total number of consumers
moved from nursing homes; and (iv) total number of independent living
plans and goals set and achieved by consumers ........................................ $8,000,000
4120-1000 For the operation of MassAbility; provided, that not less than 90 days
prior to any changes to the current eligibility criteria, MassAbility shall
provide written notification to the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the commissioner shall report
quarterly to the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the secretary of administration and finance on the number of
clients served and the amount expended on each type of service;
provided further, that upon the written request of the commissioner of
revenue, MassAbility shall provide lists of individual clients to whom,
or on behalf of whom, payments have been made for the purpose of
verifying eligibility and detecting and preventing fraud, error and abuse
in the programs administered by MassAbility; and provided further,
that said lists shall include client names and social security numbers
79

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
and payee names and other identification, if different from a client’s
identification ..................................................................................................... $468,687
4120-2000 For vocational rehabilitation services operated in cooperation with the
federal government; provided, that funds from federal vocational
rehabilitation grants or state appropriations shall not be deducted for
pensions, group health or life insurance or any other indirect costs of
federally reimbursed state employees; and provided further, that the
commissioner of rehabilitation, in making referrals to service
providers, shall take into account a client’s place of residence and the
proximity of the nearest provider to said residence .................................... $28,804,358
4120-3000 For employment assistance services; provided, that vocational
evaluation and employment services shall be provided for severely
disabled adults .............................................................................................. $2,553,259
4120-4000 For community-based services, which shall include, but not be limited
to, protective services, adult support services, assistive technology
services and the annualization of funding for turning 22 program
clients who began receiving services in fiscal year 2025 under item
4120-4010 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023.............................................. $14,327,399
4120-4001 For the housing registry for people with disabilities ........................................ $150,000
4120-4010 For the turning 22 program of MassAbility ...................................................... $306,915
4120-5000 For homemaking services ............................................................................ $5,921,788
4120-6000 For services for individuals with head injuries; provided, that
MassAbility shall work with the executive office of health and human
services to maximize federal reimbursement for clients receiving head
injury services ............................................................................................. $33,127,243
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0100 For the operation of and services provided by the Massachusetts
commission for the deaf and hard of hearing ............................................. $10,616,666
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Youth Services.
4200-0010 For the administration of the department of youth services; provided,
that the department shall continue to collaborate with the department
of elementary and secondary education in order to align curriculum at
the department of youth services with the statewide curriculum
frameworks and to ease the reintegration of youth from facilities at the
department of youth services into traditional public school settings;
provided further, that the commissioner of youth services may transfer
funds between items 4200-0100, 4200-0200, 4200-0300 and 4200-
0600, as necessary, under an allocation plan which shall detail, by
object class, the distribution of the funds to be transferred and which
the commissioner shall submit to the house and senate committees
on ways and means not less than 15 days before any transfer; and
80

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
provided further, that not more than 7 per cent of any such item shall
be transferred in fiscal year 2026 ................................................................. $4,879,364
4200-0100 For supervision, counseling and other community-based services
provided to committed youths in nonresidential care programs of
the department of youth services................................................................ $22,039,732
4200-0200 For pretrial detention programs, including purchase-of-service and
state-operated programs ............................................................................ $30,941,775
4200-0300 For secure facilities, including purchase-of-service and state-operated
programs incidental to the operations of the facilities; provided, that
funds shall be expended to address the needs of the female
population; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for
suicide prevention services ...................................................................... $112,805,693
4200-0500 For enhanced salaries for teachers at the department of youth services
...................................................................................................................... $3,059,187
4200-0600 For the operation of secure facilities to detain arrested youth
before arraignment under the overnight arrest program .............................. $2,676,387
4200-0700 For the Massachusetts youth diversion program to provide evidence-
based delinquency prevention through diversion programming that
serves as an alternative to arresting or prosecuting youth through
the juvenile court .......................................................................................... $1,873,906
Department of Transitional Assistance.
4400-1000 For the central administration of the department of transitional
assistance; provided, that all costs associated with verifying disability
for all programs of the department shall be paid from this item;
provided further, that the department shall submit monthly status
reports to the house and senate committees on ways and means and
the secretary of administration and finance on program expenditures,
savings and revenues, error rate measurements and public assistance
caseloads and benefits; provided further, that the department shall
collect all out-of-court settlement restitution payments; provided
further, that the restitution payments shall include, but not be limited
to, installment and lump sum payments; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and unless
otherwise expressly provided, federal reimbursements received for
the department, including reimbursements for administrative, fringe
and overhead costs for the current fiscal year and prior fiscal years,
shall be credited to the General Fund; provided further, that an
application for assistance under chapter 118 of the General Laws shall
also be an application for assistance under chapter 118E of the
General Laws; provided further, that if the department denies
assistance under said chapter 118, the department shall transmit the
application to the executive office of health and human services for a
determination of eligibility under said chapter 118E; provided further,
that the department shall provide the caseload forecasting office with
enrollment data and any other information pertinent to caseload
forecasting that is requested by the office on a monthly basis; provided
further, that the information shall be provided in a manner that meets
all applicable federal and state privacy and security requirements;
81

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
provided further, that after April 1, 2026, the commissioner of
transitional assistance may transfer funds for identified deficiencies
between items 4403-2000, 4405-2000 and 4408-1000; provided
further, that the distribution of the funds to be transferred shall be
included in an allocation plan, which the commissioner shall submit to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means not less than 15 days before
any such transfer; and provided further, that upon approval by the
executive office for administration and finance, the commissioner may
transfer funds for identified deficiencies between this item and item
4400-1100 ................................................................................................ $107,462,031
4400-1001 For programs to increase the commonwealth’s participation rate in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other federal nutrition
programs; provided, that not less than $600,000 shall be expended for
a grant to Project Bread – The Walk for Hunger, Inc.; provided further,
that the work of employees of the department of transitional
assistance paid for from this item shall be restricted to processing
supplemental nutrition assistance program applications; provided
further, that the department shall not require supplemental nutrition
assistance program applicants to provide reverification of eligibility
factors previously verified and not subject to change; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
department shall require only 1 signature from supplemental nutrition
assistance program applicants; provided further, that the department
shall fund a unit staffed by department employees to respond to
supplemental nutrition assistance program inquiries and arrange and
conduct telephone interviews for initial supplemental nutrition
assistance program applications from this item; provided further, that
the department shall fund a system to image and catalog eligibility
documents electronically from this item; provided further, that funds
may be expended for supplemental nutrition assistance program
outreach; and provided further, that not later than February 3, 2026,
the department shall report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the status of these programs ....................................... $5,024,032
4400-1004 For the project costs of the Massachusetts healthy incentives
program; provided, that when expanding the number of participating
vendors, the department shall prioritize improving access in areas with
limited access to fresh, local produce and that are historically
underserved by the program; provided further, that the department
shall collaborate with local food coalitions and nonprofit groups to
develop community outreach strategies that ensure equitable access
to, and knowledge of, the program; and provided further, that not later
than April 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not
be limited to: (i) the number of households utilizing the program; (ii)
the number of program transactions; (iii) the number of vendors
processing program transactions; (iv) a breakdown of the total number
of program clients and vendors, by their municipality; and (v) the
department’s efforts, plans and timeline for identifying geographic
areas that are underserved by the program and increasing program
activity in those areas, including metrics and factors to be used to
make determinations for the addition and siting of vendors, prior
appropriation continued .............................................................................. $20,000,000
82

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
4400-1020 For the operation of the secure jobs connect program for employment
support, job training and job search services for homeless or
previously homeless families receiving assistance from the executive
office of housing and livable communities under items 7004-0101,
7004-0108, 7004-9024 or 7004-9316; provided, that participants
receiving assistance under said items 7004-0101 and 7004-0108 shall
receive not less than 12 months of housing stabilization services
under said items 7004-0101 and 7004-0108; provided further, that
services shall be delivered by community-based agencies that have
demonstrated experience working in partnership with regional
administering agencies including, but not limited to, Community
Teamwork Inc., Father Bill's & MainSpring, Inc., Way Finders, Inc.,
Jewish Vocational Service, Inc., SER-Jobs for Progress, Inc., South
Middlesex Opportunity Council, Inc. and Worcester Community Action
Council, Inc.; provided further, that the department shall make
available rental assistance under item 7004-9024 to ensure effective
participation in this program; provided further, that service delivery
agencies shall seek additional federal, state or private funds to ensure
the effective continuation of regional partnerships; and provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the department of transitional
assistance shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means, by type of service or program provided, on the:
(i) housing situation, including stability of housing, for program
participants; (ii) employment status, including the employment history,
of program participants; (iii) total number of program participants; and
(iv) number of program participants who are no longer receiving
assistance under said items 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or
7004-9316 .................................................................................................... $5,000,000
4400-1025 For domestic violence specialists at local area offices ................................. $2,329,397
4400-1100 For the payroll of the department of transitional assistance’s
caseworkers; provided, that only employees of bargaining unit 8 shall
be paid from this item ............................................................................... $101,262,107
4400-1979 For the department of transitional assistance to administer, in
consultation with the commonwealth corporation, an employment
counseling and job training program and the pathways to self-
sufficiency program respectively established in sections 3B and 3C of
chapter 118 of the General Laws and the full employment program
established in section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995, as
amended by section 29 of chapter 158 of the acts of 2014 ............................ $990,072
4401-1000 For employment and training services for recipients of benefits
provided under the transitional aid to families with dependent children
program; provided, that funds from this item may be expended on
former recipients of the program for up to 1 year after termination of
their benefits; provided further, that the department of transitional
assistance may expend funds on such services for the noncustodial
parents of dependent children receiving transitional aid to families with
dependent children; provided further, that the department shall
expend not less than the amounts expended in fiscal year 2025 for the
young parents program and the competitive integrated employment
services program; provided further, that not less than $170,000 shall
be expended for learning disability assessments through the
University of Massachusetts; provided further, that not less than
83

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
$1,500,000 shall be expended for the service providers with whom the
office for refugees and immigrants entered into service agreements in
fiscal year 2025 under this item; provided further, that certain parents
who have not yet reached 18 years of age, including those who are
ineligible for transitional aid to families with dependent children and
who would qualify for benefits under chapter 118 of the General Laws
but for the consideration of the grandparents’ income, shall be eligible
to receive services; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026,
the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means including, but not limited to: (i) the
number of clients served by these programs; (ii) the number of clients
who transition into employment, when applicable; (iii) the number of
clients who remain in employment after 90 days, when applicable; (iv)
the number of clients who remain in employment after 1 year, when
applicable; and (v) other quantifiable data related to client outcomes
as designed by these programs; provided further, that the department
shall examine the outcomes of these programs to determine which are
effective in transitioning clients to employment and increasing self-
sufficiency; and provided further, that the department shall consider
other programs to meet the transitional employment needs of clients ....... $18,857,862
4401-1003 For a grant program to be administered by the department of
transitional assistance for 2 generation programs to support economic
mobility among high-risk young parents between 14 and 24 years of
age, inclusive, who are eligible for assistance under the department’s
young parent program; provided, that grants shall be targeted at
young parents experiencing acute trauma, multiple systems
involvement, mental health concerns, domestic violence or abuse;
provided further, that the grant funding shall be utilized to increase
parenting and life skills, housing stability and self-sufficiency, and to
build cognitive and behavioral skills through intensive case
management and wraparound supports; provided further, that the
department shall distribute grant funds through a competitive grant
program; provided further, that grants shall be awarded to applicants
that: (i) are community-based nonprofit programs; (ii) have
demonstrated experience working with high-risk young parents and
partnering with local administering agencies; and (iii) seek additional
federal, state or private funds to ensure the effective continuation of
services and local partnerships; provided further, that the department
shall collect robust data from contracted agencies to better understand
this population, their risk factors and the services provided to them;
provided further, that the department shall award not more than 14
grants; provided further, that grants shall be awarded in communities
with high numbers of pregnant and parenting teens; provided further,
that grants shall be not less than $250,000 and not more than
$500,000; and provided further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the: (A) total number of program participants;
(B) educational attainment of program participants; (C) employment
status, including employment history, for program participants; (D)
number of program participants receiving assistance under item 4403-
2000; and (E) relevant demographic information, as determined by the
department ................................................................................................... $1,980,000
4403-2000 For a program of transitional aid to families with dependent children;
provided, that the payment standard and need standard in fiscal year
84

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2026 shall be not less than the standards in effect in fiscal year 2025;
provided further, that the need standard shall be equal to the payment
standard established under the provisions of this item; provided
further, that the payment standard and need standard for fiscal year
2026 shall be not less than the standards set forth in this item;
provided further, that the department of transitional assistance shall
notify parents under 20 years of age who are receiving benefits from
the program of the requirements of clause (2) of subsection (i) of
section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 or any successor law;
provided further, that a $40-per-month rental allowance shall be paid
to households incurring a rent or mortgage expense and not residing
in public or subsidized housing; provided further, that a nonrecurring
children’s clothing allowance of $450 shall be provided to each child
eligible under this program in September 2025; provided further, that
the children’s clothing allowance shall be included in the standard of
need for the month of September 2025; provided further, that benefits
under this program shall not be available to those families in which a
child has been removed from the household under a court order after
a care and protection hearing held under chapter 119 of the General
Laws or to adult recipients otherwise eligible for transitional aid to
families with dependent children but for the temporary removal of any
dependent children from the home by the department of children and
families under department procedures; provided further, that not less
than $779,058 shall be expended for transportation benefits for
recipients of transitional aid to families with dependent children;
provided further, that any person experiencing homelessness, who: (i)
has no established place of abode, or lives in a temporary emergency
shelter; and (ii) is otherwise eligible under this item and chapter 118
of the General Laws, shall receive the same payment rate as
recipients who incur shelter costs including, but not limited to, rent or
a mortgage; provided further, that the department of transitional
assistance shall promulgate or revise any such rules and regulations
necessary to implement the preceding provision; provided further, that
notwithstanding section 2 of said chapter 118 or any other general or
special law to the contrary, the department shall render aid to pregnant
women with no other eligible dependent children only if the pregnancy
has been medically verified, and who, if the child had been born and
was living with that parent in the month of payment, would be
categorically and financially eligible for transitional aid to families with
dependent children benefits; provided further, that certain families that
suffer a reduction in benefits due to a loss of earned income and
participation in retrospective budgeting may receive a supplemental
benefit to compensate them for the loss; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance shall, to the extent feasible
within the existing appropriation and any funding from other sources,
review its disability standards to determine the extent to which such
standards reflect the current medical and vocational criteria; provided
further, that not less than 75 days before any changes to the disability
standards are publicly proposed, the department of transitional
assistance shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities; provided further, that at the time of application and on
a semi-annual basis, the department of transitional assistance shall
provide oral and written notification to all recipients of their child care
benefits; provided further, that the notification shall include the full
range of child care options available, including center-based child
85

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
care, family-based child care and in-home, relative child care;
provided further, that the notification shall detail available child care
benefits for current and former recipients, including employment and
training benefits and transitional benefits; provided further, that the
notice shall also advise recipients of the availability of supplemental
nutrition assistance program benefits; provided further, that in
promulgating, amending or rescinding its regulations relative to
eligibility for, or levels of, benefits under the program, the department
of transitional assistance shall take into account the amounts available
to it for expenditure from this item so as not to exceed this
appropriation; provided further, that not less than $986,640 shall be
expended for cash and transportation benefits for newly-employed
transitional aid to families with dependent children clients for a period
not to exceed 12 months to assist such clients with short-term self-
sufficiency; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the department of transitional assistance
shall calculate benefits provided under this item in the same manner
as it calculated said benefits in the previous fiscal year; provided
further, that the department of transitional assistance’s calculation of
benefits shall not preclude the department of transitional assistance
from making eligibility or benefit changes that lead to an increase in
eligibility or benefits; provided further, that not less than 75 days before
adopting eligibility or benefit changes, the department of transitional
assistance shall submit a report on said changes to the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
children, families and persons with disabilities and the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate; provided further, that the report
shall include the text of, basis for and reasons for the proposed
changes; and provided further, that not later than January 1, 2026, the
department of transitional assistance shall submit a report to house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include but not
be limited to: (A) the number of participants in the program, including
available demographic information; (B) the average benefit amount,
including the methodology for determining an individual's benefit
amount; and (C) the number of participants in the program who also
receive benefits under items 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-9024 or
7004-9316 ................................................................................................ $467,416,063
4403-2007 For a nutritional benefit program for low-income workers; provided,
that benefits shall be provided only to those for whom receiving these
benefits will improve the work participation rate under the federal
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program .................................... $8,359,783
4403-2008 For participant support payments to pay for or reimburse supplemental
nutrition assistance program applicants and recipients for expenses
that are reasonably necessary and directly related to participation in
the SNAP path to work program ...................................................................... $356,537
4403-2119 For the provision of structured settings as provided under subsection
(i) of section 110 of chapter 5 of the acts of 1995 or any successor
statute, for parents under the age of 22 who are receiving benefits
under the transitional aid to families with dependent children program ..... $13,862,439
4405-2000 For the state supplement to the Supplemental Security Income
program for the aged and disabled, including a program for
emergency needs for Supplemental Security Income recipients;
86

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
provided, that the expenses of special grant recipients residing in rest
homes, as provided under section 7A of chapter 118A of the General
Laws, may be paid from this item; provided further, that the
department of transitional assistance, in collaboration with the
executive office of health and human services, may fund an optional
supplemental living arrangement category under the Supplemental
Security Income program that makes payments to persons living in
assisted living residences certified under chapter 19D of the General
Laws who meet the income and clinical eligibility criteria established
by the department and the executive office; provided further, that the
optional category of payments shall only be administered in
conjunction with the Medicaid group adult foster care benefit; and
provided further, that reimbursements to providers for services
rendered in prior fiscal years may be expended from this item................ $195,347,995
4408-1000 For a program of cash assistance to certain residents of the
commonwealth, entitled emergency aid to the elderly, disabled and
children, who are found by the department of transitional assistance
to be eligible for the aid under chapter 117A of the General Laws and
regulations promulgated by the department and subject to the
limitations of appropriation for such purpose; provided, that recipients
shall not be subject to sponsor income-deeming or related restrictions;
provided further, that in implementing the program for fiscal year 2026,
the department shall include all eligibility categories permitted in this
item and the need standard shall be not less than the standard that
was in effect in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that any person
experiencing homelessness, who: (i) has no established place of
abode, or lives in a temporary emergency shelter; and (ii) is otherwise
eligible under this item and said chapter 117A, shall receive the same
payment rate as recipients who incur shelter costs including, but not
limited to, rent or a mortgage; provided further, that the department
shall promulgate or revise any rules and regulations necessary to
implement this provision; provided further, that the department may
provide benefits to persons who are the age of 65 or older who have
applied for benefits under chapter 118A of the General Laws, to
persons suffering from a medically determinable impairment or
combination of impairments that is expected to last for a period
determined by department regulations, which substantially reduces or
eliminates such individuals’ capacity to support themselves and which
has been verified by a competent authority, to certain persons caring
for a disabled person, to otherwise eligible participants in the
vocational rehabilitation program of the Massachusetts rehabilitation
commission, to dependent children who are ineligible for benefits
under both chapter 118 of the General Laws and the separate program
under section 210 of chapter 43 of the acts of 1997 and to parents or
other caretakers of dependent children who are ineligible under said
chapter 118 and under said separate program; provided further, that
no person incarcerated in a correctional institution shall be eligible for
benefits under the program; provided further, that no funds shall be
expended from this item for the payment of expenses associated with
any medical review team, other disability screening process or costs
associated with verifying disability for this program; provided further,
that the department shall adopt emergency regulations under chapter
30A of the General Laws to implement the changes to the program
required by this item promptly and within the appropriation; provided
further, that in promulgating, amending or rescinding its regulations
87

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
with respect to eligibility or benefits, including the payment standard,
medical benefits and any other benefits under this program, the
department shall take into account the amount available to it for
expenditure by this item so as not to exceed the amount appropriated
in this item; provided further, that the department may promulgate
emergency regulations under said chapter 30A to implement these
eligibility changes, benefit changes or both; provided further, that
nothing in this item shall be construed to create any right accruing to
recipients of the former general relief program; provided further, that
reimbursements collected from the Social Security Administration on
behalf of former clients of the emergency aid to the elderly, disabled
and children program or unprocessed payments from the program that
are returned to the department shall be credited to the General Fund;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, not less than 75 days prior to adopting any eligibility or
benefit changes, the commissioner of transitional assistance shall
submit to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the
joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities and
the clerks of the house of representatives a detailed and
comprehensive report setting forth the text of and the basis and
reasons for the proposed changes; provided further, that the report
shall state exactly which components of the current benefit package
will be altered and the department’s most accurate assessment of the
effects of benefit or eligibility changes upon recipient families;
provided further, that the payment standard and need standard for
fiscal year 2026 shall be not less than the standards set forth in this
item; and provided further, that not later than January 2, 2026, the
department of transitional assistance shall submit a report to house
and senate committees on ways and means that shall include but not
be limited to: (A) the number of participants in the program, including
available demographic information; (B) the average benefit amount,
including the methodology for determining an individual's benefit
amount; and (C) the amount of those who receive benefits under this
program that also receive benefits from 7004-0101, 7004-0108, 7004-
9024 and 7004-9316 ................................................................................ $208,990,924
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Public Health.
4510-0020 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $162,229 in retained revenues collected from fees charged by
the food protection program for costs of said program; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $162,229
4510-0040 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $73,734 from fees assessed under chapter 111N of the General
Laws for the regulation of all pharmaceutical and medical device
companies that market their products in the commonwealth; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
88

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............................................ $73,734
4510-0100 For the administration and operation of the department of public
health, including the personnel support of programmatic staff within
the department, including the health statistics program, the operation
of the registry of vital records and statistics and the cancer registry
established under section 111B of chapter 111 of the General Laws;
provided, that the department shall give specific consideration to
additional monies available under the Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act of 2010, Public Law, 111-148 and the Health Care
and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Public Law 111-152 ................ $38,263,168
4510-0110 For community health center services; provided, that not less
than $500,000 shall be expended on a statewide program of technical
assistance to community health centers to be provided by a state
primary care association qualified under section 330A(f)(1) of the
Public Health Service Act, as codified at 42 U.S.C. section 254c(f)(1);
and provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended
for the establishment of a Massachusetts gender affirming care
access program to provide support to federally qualified health centers
specializing in gender affirming care .......................................................... $10,398,660
4510-0112 For the department of public health to fund postpartum depression
programs at community health centers in the cities of Holyoke, Lynn,
Worcester, Fall River and Salem and the Jamaica Plain section of the
city of Boston; provided, that should a community health center
decline funding, unexpended funds shall be split equally between
participating programs ..................................................................................... $860,000
4510-0600 For an environmental and community health hazards program,
including control of radiation and nuclear hazards, consumer products
protection, food and drugs, lead poisoning prevention under chapter
482 of the acts of 1993, lead-based paint inspections in day care
facilities, inspection of radiological facilities, licensing of x-ray
technologists and the administration of the bureau of climate and
environmental health assessment under chapter 111F of the General
Laws; provided, that the department may expend funds from this item
to monitor, survey and inspect nuclear power reactors, including those
now licensed by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; and provided
further, that not less than $292,035 shall be expended for the Argeo
Paul Cellucci Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Registry established
under section 25A of chapter 111 of the General Laws ........................... $8,748,881
4510-0615 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $2,259,189 from fees collected from licensing and inspecting
users of radioactive material within the commonwealth under licenses
presently issued by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission; provided,
that the retained revenues may be used for the costs of both programs,
including the compensation of employees; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
89

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................... $2,259,189
4510-0616 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $1,436,264 for a drug registration and monitoring program from
retained revenues collected from fees charged to registered
practitioners, including physicians, dentists, veterinarians, podiatrists
and optometrists for controlled substance registration; provided, that
funds may be expended from this item for the costs of personnel; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ........................................................................................................... $1,436,264
4510-0710 For the operation of the bureau of health care safety and quality and
the office of patient protection; provided, that services funded through
this item shall include, but not be limited to, education, training,
intervention, support, surveillance and evaluation; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for the advancement of the prescription
monitoring program and the maintenance and enhancement of
prescription drug monitoring information exchange architecture to
support interstate prescription drug monitoring data sharing; provided
further, that the division shall be responsible for assuring quality of
patient care provided by the commonwealth’s health care facilities and
services and for protecting the health and safety of patients who
receive care and services in nursing homes, rest homes, clinical
laboratories, clinics, institutions for individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities and the mentally ill, hospitals and
infirmaries, including the inspection of ambulance services; provided
further, that investigators shall conduct investigations of abuse,
neglect, mistreatment and misappropriation; provided further, that all
investigators in the division of health care quality responsible for the
investigations shall receive training by the Medicaid fraud control unit
in the office of the attorney general; provided further, that not less
than $500,000 shall be expended for South Shore Health to support
its efforts to advance health equity and improve access for
underserved communities; and provided further, that funds shall be
expended for the full registration of practitioners, physician assistants
and registered nurses authorized by the board of registration in
nursing to practice in advanced practice nursing roles under section
7A of chapter 94C of the General Laws ..................................................... $17,500,545
4510-0712 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $5,900,000 in retained revenues collected from the licensure of
health facilities and individuals applying for emergency medical
technician licensure and recertification for program costs of the bureau
of health care quality and improvement; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
90

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ..................................... $5,900,000
4510-0721 For the operation and administration of the boards of registration for
health professions licensure; provided, that funds shall be expended
for the operation and administration of the boards of registration in
nursing, pharmacy, dentistry, nursing home administrators, physician
assistants, naturopathy, perfusionists, genetic counselors, community
health workers and respiratory care ............................................................. $3,822,993
4510-0723 For the operation and administration of the board of registration
in medicine and the committee on acupuncture ............................................... $170,743
4510-0724 For the board of registration in medicine, including the physician
profiles program; provided, that the board may expend revenues not
to exceed $300,503 from new revenues associated with increased
license and renewal fees ................................................................................. $300,503
4510-0790 For regional emergency medical services; provided, that the regional
emergency medical services councils, designated under 105 C.M.R.
170.101, and the central medical emergency direction centers that
were in existence on January 1, 1992, shall remain the designated
councils and central medical emergency direction centers ............................. $500,000
4510-3010 For a grant to the Down Syndrome program at the Children’s
Medical Center at the University of Massachusetts medical center
based on the patient-centered medical home concept .................................... $150,000
4512-0103 For human immunodeficiency virus and acquired immune deficiency
syndrome, or HIV/AIDS, services, programs and related services for
persons affected by the associated conditions of viral hepatitis,
sexually transmitted infections, tuberculosis and other infections of
public health importance; provided, that funding shall be provided to
proportionately serve each of the demographic groups afflicted by
HIV/AIDS and associated conditions; provided further, that in
compliance with the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public
Law 111-148, the department of public health shall ensure that
vendors delivering HIV/AIDS community testing and screening shall
seek third-party reimbursement for said services; provided further, that
the department shall ensure that at least the same level of services
will be made available as in the previous fiscal year; and provided
further, that no funds from this item shall be expended for disease
research in fiscal year 2026........................................................................ $35,000,000
4512-0106 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $15,162,386 for the HIV Drug Assistance Program, or HDAP,
from revenues received from pharmaceutical manufacturers
participating in the section 340B rebate program of the Public Health
Service Act, as codified in 42 U.S.C. section 256b, administered by
the Health Resources and Services Administration and the Office of
Pharmacy Affairs; provided, that such services shall include activities
that would be eligible for coverage through the federal Ryan White
Comprehensive AIDS Resources Emergency Act, Public Law 101-
381, with priority given to the human immunodeficiency virus and
acquired immune deficiency syndrome drug assistance program;
provided further, that any excess rebate revenue collected beyond the
91

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
ceiling of this appropriation shall be deposited in the General Fund;
provided further, that services in an amount equivalent to the amount
deposited in the General Fund shall be funded through item 4512-0103;
and provided further, that the department may make expenditures
from the start of each fiscal year from this item in anticipation of receipt
of rebate revenues from pharmaceutical manufacturers ............................. $15,162,386
4512-0200 For the bureau of substance addiction services, including a program
to reimburse driver alcohol education programs for services provided
for court-adjudicated, indigent clients; provided, that the department of
public health shall ensure that vendors providing methadone treatment
shall seek third-party reimbursement for such services; provided
further, that in order to support and strengthen public access to
substance use disorder services, funds shall be expended to maintain
programming including, but not limited to: (i) centralized intake
capacity service under section 18 of chapter 17 of the General Laws;
(ii) the number and type of facilities that provide treatment; and (iii)
detoxification and clinical stabilization service beds in the public
system; provided further, that funds shall be expended to preserve and
expand the programs currently funded by the Massachusetts Access
to Recovery, or MA-ATR, program; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for opening 5 new recovery centers that are not currently
funded by the department; provided further, that in selecting such
centers, the department shall, to the maximum extent possible, ensure
that no fewer than 3 of said centers shall serve gateway municipalities
as defined under section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the extended release
of naltrexone program under section 158 of chapter 46 of the acts of
2015; provided further, that funds shall be expended to support
municipalities utilizing grant funds from the Massachusetts Opioid
Abuse Prevention Collaborative (MOAPC) grant program; provided
further, that under section 236 of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as
added by section 1 of chapter 332 of the acts of 2016, the department
shall enhance data-sharing capabilities and collaborate across
agencies to ensure coordination of services for newborns with
neonatal abstinence syndrome; provided further, that funds shall be
expended for a voluntary training and accreditation program for owners
and operators of alcohol and drug-free housing under section 18A of
said chapter 17; provided further, that funds shall be expended on
MassAbility through an interagency service agreement with the bureau
to support workforce development; provided further, that funds shall
be expended for outpatient and mobile services for deaf/hard of
hearing, and deaf/hard of hearing/blind individuals with substance use
disorders; provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
bureau to address the addiction treatment workforce crisis through
outreach and recruitment efforts at local and regional educational
institutions and vocational-technical high schools; provided further,
that not less than $10,000,000 shall be spent for expanding low-
threshold housing, employing a “Housing First” model, for homeless
individuals with substance use and mental health disorders at risk of
HIV; provided further, that funds shall be expended for substance use
disorder step-down recovery services, known as level-B beds and
services, and other critical recovery services with severely reduced
capacity; provided further, that said funds shall be expended in the AA
object class; provided further, that funds shall be expended for jail
diversion programs primarily for nonviolent offenders with opioid or
92

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
opiate addiction to be procured by the department of public health;
provided further, that each jail diversion program shall have not fewer
than 60 beds and shall provide clinical assessment services to the
respective courts, inpatient treatment for not more than 90 days and
ongoing case management services for not more than 1 year;
provided further, that individuals may be diverted to this or other
programs by a district attorney in conjunction with the commissioner
of probation if: (A) there is reason to believe that the individual being
diverted suffers from an addiction to opiates or another substance use
disorder; and (B) the diversion of the individual is clinically appropriate
and consistent with established clinical and public safety criteria;
provided further, that programs shall be established in separate
counties in locations deemed suitable by the department of public
health; provided further, that the department shall coordinate
operations with the sheriffs, the district attorneys, the commissioner of
probation and the department of correction; provided further, that
funds shall be used to support the ongoing treatment needs of clients
after 90 days for which there is no other payer; and provided further,
that funds shall be expended for family intervention and care
management services programs, a young adult treatment program and
early intervention services for individuals who are dependent on or
addicted to alcohol, controlled substances, or both alcohol and
controlled substances .............................................................................. $194,452,031
Marijuana Regulation Fund ................................... 81.43%
General Fund ........................................................ 18.57%
4512-0204 For the purchase, administration and training of first-responder and
bystander naloxone distribution programs; provided, that funds shall
be expended to maintain funding for first responder naloxone grants
and bystander distribution in communities with high incidence of
overdose; provided further, that the commissioner of public health may
transfer funds between this item and item 4512-0200 as necessary
under an allocation plan which shall detail the distribution of the funds
to be transferred; provided further, that not less than 30 days prior to
any such transfer, the commissioner shall submit the allocation plan
to the house and senate committees on ways and means; and
provided further, that not later than October 1, 2025, the department
of public health shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the: (i) communities included in the
program expansion; (ii) number of participants for each community;
and (iii) amount of naloxone purchased and distributed, delineated
by community ................................................................................................ $1,298,718
4512-0205 For grants and contracts with substance use programs to provide
comprehensive prevention, intervention and recovery services ..................... $100,000
4512-0206 For the department of public health to coordinate a comprehensive
statewide strategy, in partnership with municipalities, public health
harm reduction organizations and other stakeholders to promote
existing commonwealth harm reduction efforts, to foster a culture of
harm reduction and to promote community-based harm reduction
services as recommended by the harm reduction commission
established under section 100 of chapter 208 of the acts of 2018 and
to prioritize the health, safety and dignity of individuals who use
substances as recommended by the commission on
93

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
methamphetamine and other stimulant use in the commonwealth
established by section 131 of chapter 24 of the acts of 2021 ...................... $6,478,000
4512-0225 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $500,000 for a compulsive gamblers’ treatment program from
unclaimed prize money held in the State Lottery and Gaming Fund,
established in section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, for more
than 1 year from the date of the drawing when the unclaimed prize
money was won and from the proceeds of a multi-jurisdictional lottery
game under subsection (e) of section 24A of said chapter 10; provided,
that the comptroller shall transfer the amount to the General Fund; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ............................................................................................................. $500,000
4512-2022 For grants to local and regional boards of health; provided, that funds
shall be expended to support the state action for public health
excellence program established in section 27D of chapter 111 of the
General Laws; provided further, that the department of public health
shall prioritize a geographically equitable distribution; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for a statewide data collection and
reporting system, implementation of intermunicipal shared service
agreements and capacity building for local and regional boards of
health; and provided further, that not later than February 3, 2026, the
department shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing the: (i) recipients, their locations and amount per
recipient; and (ii) dates that funds were released to said recipients ........... $9,232,015
4513-0999 For a public information campaign to educate and promote awareness
to pharmacies and the public about individual’s eligibility to receive a
12-month prescription for contraceptives in the commonwealth;
provided, that information shall include availability of a 12-month
supply of contraceptives; and provided further, that the commissioner
of public health shall partner with insurers, pharmacies, relevant
advocacy organizations and employers to ensure the campaign
reaches pharmacists, clinicians and individuals eligible to receive a
12-month prescription for contraceptives in the commonwealth ...................... $500,000
4513-1001 For grants to support improvements in reproductive health access,
infrastructure and security, including grants to: (i) Tides for
Reproductive Freedom, Incorporated; (ii) Abortion Rights Fund of
Western Massachusetts, Incorporated; and (iii) Eastern
Massachusetts Abortion Fund, Incorporated; provided, that not later
than March 3, 2026, the department of public health shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (A) the grant distribution methodology; (B) a list of grants
applicants; and (C) a list of successful grants applicants, including the
amounts awarded and the projects being supported by the grants .............. $1,980,000
4513-1002 For women, infants and children, or WIC, nutrition services in addition
to funds received under the federal nutrition program; provided, that
funds from this item shall supplement federal funds to enable federally
94

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
eligible women, infants and children to be served through the WIC
program ....................................................................................................... $15,495,096
4513-1005 For the provision of family and adolescent health services including,
but not limited to, comprehensive sexual and reproductive health
services, the birth defects monitoring program and adolescent
sexuality education; provided, that not less than $14,749,060 shall be
expended for family health services; provided further, that not less
than $7,831,000 of said funds shall be expended for comprehensive
family planning services, including HIV counseling and testing,
community-based health education and outreach services provided by
agencies certified as comprehensive family planning agencies;
provided further, that not less than $6,700,000 shall be expended for
comprehensive family planning services previously funded by Title X
Family Planning funding due to restrictions applied federally; provided
further, that funds may be expended for the program’s critical
congenital heart defects screening activities; provided further, that
funds may be expended for the birth defects monitoring program;
provided further, that not less than $3,250,940 shall be expended for
teenage pregnancy prevention services; provided further, that
applications for pregnancy prevention funds shall be administered
through the department of public health upon receipt and approval of
coordinated community service plans to be evaluated under the
guidelines issued by the department; provided further, that portions of
the grants may be used for state agency purchases of designated
services identified by the community service plans; provided further,
that funding shall be expended on those communities with the highest
teen birth rates according to an annual statistical estimate conducted
by the department; provided further, that funds shall be expended on
programming directed at children under the care of the department of
children and families who are at high risk for teenage pregnancy; and
provided further, that the department shall collaborate with the
department of children and families on said programming ................ $26,319,064
4513-1012 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $28,600,000 from retained revenues received from federal cost-
containment initiatives including, but not limited to, infant formula
rebates; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ......................................................................................................... $28,600,000
4513-1020 For the early intervention program; provided, that the department of
public health shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the total number of units of service
purchased and the total expenditures for the units of service paid by
the department, the executive office of health and human services and
third-party payers for early intervention services for the following
service categories: (i) home visit; (ii) center-based individual; (iii) child-
focused group; (iv) parent-focused group; and (v) screening and
assessment; provided further, that the department shall make all
reasonable efforts to secure third-party and Medicaid reimbursements
for the services funded in this item; provided further, that funds from
95

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
this item shall be expended to provide respite services to families of
children enrolled in early intervention programs who have complex
care requirements, multiple disabilities and extensive medical and
health needs; provided further, that priority shall be given to low-
income and moderate-income families; provided further, that not later
than January 30, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the number of
families served by the program and the amount of funds appropriated
in this item granted to qualified families; provided further, that no claim
for reimbursement made on behalf of an uninsured person shall be
paid from this item until the program receives notice of a denial of
eligibility for the MassHealth program from the executive office of
health and human services; provided further, that MassHealth shall
cover the costs incurred for the transportation of MassHealth members
who participate in the early intervention program; provided further, that
nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be construed as giving
rise to, enforceable legal rights to any such services or an enforceable
entitlement to the early intervention services funded in this item;
provided further, that not less than 180 days prior to any change to
current eligibility criteria, the department shall provide written
notification to the house and senate committees on ways and means;
provided further, that no eligibility changes shall be made before April
1, 2026; provided further, that funds in this item may be used to pay
for current and prior year claims; provided further, that the department
shall provide services to eligible children through 1 service delivery
model and shall not determine eligibility for services based on family
insurance status; provided further, that not less than $12,000,000 shall
be expended from this item for early intervention staffing recovery
payments necessary to address the staffing crisis and restore early
intervention staffing and service hours through hiring, rehiring and
retention of clinical and support staff across the early intervention
system; provided further, that said funds shall be used to support
increased salaries, wages and benefits for early intervention clinicians
and support staff; provided further, that said funds may be used to
cover supervision, training, non-billable time and other on-boarding
costs directly associated with the hiring of new early intervention
clinicians and support staff; provided further, that said staffing
recovery payments shall be distributed by the department as payment
vouchers to all vendors of certified early intervention programs;
provided further, that said payments shall be made on a proportional
basis, calculated using the most recent early intervention child counts
of the department; provided further, that not later than October 3,
2025, the department of public health shall submit a report to the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities, the
secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the total funds expended to
certified early intervention vendors from said staffing recovery
payments; provided further, that not less than $1,548,522 of said
staffing recovery payments shall be designated as a health equity
allocation to provide additional targeted relief for early intervention
programs serving predominately low-income cities and towns to
address the health disparities exacerbated by the 2019 novel
coronavirus; provided further, that said health equity allocation shall
be distributed by the department to all vendors of certified early
intervention programs using a weighted formula that includes the area
median household income of the cities and towns in each of the early
96

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
intervention program catchment areas and the current early
intervention child census figure for each city or town; provided further,
that the department shall provide a higher cost per child allocation for
programs based on a weighted average income figure to ensure a
higher allocation for the early intervention programs serving the lower
income cities and towns; provided further, that the department shall
develop the health equity allocation formula in consultation with the
Massachusetts Early Intervention Consortium, Inc.; and provided
further, that not later than November 3, 2025, the commissioner of
public health shall submit a report to the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities, the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means detailing the total funds expended to certified early
intervention vendors and early intensive behavioral intervention
vendors from this item ................................................................................ $37,719,649
4513-1026 For the provision of statewide and community-based suicide
prevention, intervention, post-intervention and surveillance activities
and the implementation of a statewide suicide prevention plan;
provided, that funds shall be expended for a program to address elder
suicide behavior and attempts with the geriatric mental health services
program within the department of elder affairs; and provided further,
that funds shall be expended for a veterans-in-crisis hotline to be used
by veterans or concerned family members seeking counseling
programs operated by the executive office of veterans’ services so that
they may be directed towards the programs and services offered by
their local or regional veterans’ services office to be staffed by
counselors or outreach program personnel contracted by the
department and trained in issues of mental health counseling and
veterans’ services ....................................................................................... $14,304,687
4513-1027 For The Samaritans, Inc.; provided, that funds shall be used for suicide
prevention services ......................................................................................... $400,000
4513-1098 For the provision of statewide support services for survivors of
homicide victims, including outreach services, burial assistance, grief
counseling and other support services; provided, that funds shall be
expended as grants in the aggregate amount of not less than
$200,000 to the Louis D. Brown Peace Institute Corporation, a
community-based support organization dedicated to serving families
and communities impacted by violence; and provided further, that the
Louis D. Brown Peace Institute Corporation shall establish and
administer a process to distribute not less than $100,000 to the
Massachusetts Survivors of Homicide Victims Network
organizations throughout the commonwealth in the form of grants .................. $500,000
4513-1112 For the prevention and management of chronic diseases and their
associated risk factors, including, but not limited to, the Massachusetts
Tobacco Cessation and Prevention Program and oral health services
and programs; provided, that funds shall be provided for dental health
services; provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
comprehensive dental program for adults with developmental
disabilities; provided further, that $3,368,962 shall be expended for the
promotion of health and disease prevention including, but not limited
to: (i) breast cancer prevention; (ii) diabetes screening and outreach;
(iii) ovarian cancer screening; (iv) hepatitis C prevention and
97

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
management; (v) multiple sclerosis screening, information, education
and treatment programs and the Multiple Sclerosis Home Living
Independently Navigating Key Services program administered by the
Greater New England Chapter of the National Multiple Sclerosis
Society; (vi) colorectal cancer prevention; (vii) prostate cancer
screening, education and treatment with a particular focus on
individuals with African-American, Hispanic or Latino heritage, family
history of the disease and other individuals at high risk; (viii)
osteoporosis education; and (ix) maintenance of the statewide lupus
database; provided further, that funding shall be expended for Mass in
Motion community grants in an amount not less than the amount
expended in fiscal year 2025, contingent upon receipt of matching
federal prevention block grant funds; provided further, that not less than
$250,000 shall be expended for a grant to a statewide Alzheimer’s
disease advocacy and education organization for a public awareness
and education campaign as recommended by the federal Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention; provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for education and support of patients
diagnosed with phenylketonuria or related disorders and their families
through a grant to the New England Connection for PKU and Allied
Disorders, Inc.; and provided further, that funds shall be expended for
smoking prevention and cessation programs, including youth tobacco
use prevention and cessation programs..................................................... $12,457,534
4513-1136 For sexual assault and domestic violence services; provided, that not
less than $7,900,449 shall be expended for a statewide sexual assault
nurse examiner program and pediatric sexual assault nurse examiner
program for the care of victims of sexual assault; provided further, that
the program shall operate under specific statewide protocols and by
an on-call system of nurse examiners; provided further, that not less
than $2,500,000 shall be expended for children’s advocacy centers,
including those previously funded through item 4800-0038 in prior
fiscal years, and for services for child victims of sexual abuse and
assault; provided further, that the department shall allocate available
funding, above the amounts required to maintain not less than the prior
year funding levels for each center, among the 12 accredited centers
in a manner to promote equity in the services available to child victims
of sexual abuse, assault and trafficking across the commonwealth;
provided further, that not less than $950,000 shall be expended for the
support of the statewide delivery system of children’s advocacy
centers with funding administered by the Massachusetts Children’s
Alliance, Inc.; provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026,
the department shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the grants awarded to each center; (ii) the number of individuals
served by each center receiving funding; and (iii) recommendations
on how to improve the availability and delivery of services through
these centers; provided further, that not less than $56,084,884 shall
be expended for domestic violence and sexual assault prevention and
survivor services, including: (A) intimate partner abuse education,
formerly known as the batterers intervention services; (B) services for
immigrants and refugees; (C) rape crisis center survivor services and
prevention; and (D) intervention services and crisis housing for sexual
violence and intimate partner violence in the lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning communities; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for rape prevention and victim services,
98

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
including the statewide Spanish language hotline, community-based
domestic violence response, emergency and transitional residential
services for sexual and domestic victims and their children and
supervised visitation and trauma services for children who witness
violence and targeted services for department of children and families-
involved families; provided further, that the department of public health
shall ensure that there shall not be a disruption in survivor services and
violence prevention activities or a negative impact on program
functioning during fiscal year 2026; provided further, that not less than
$1,000,000 shall be expended for a domestic violence and sexual
assault prevention program focused on teens in high-risk
communities; provided further, that said programming shall be aimed
at promoting healthy relationships and addressing teen dating
violence for teens of all sexualities and genders; provided further, that
the department shall partner with domestic violence and sexual assault
service providers, other community-based organizations or school-
based organizations to develop evidence-based and outcomes-
focused prevention strategies; provided further, that the program shall
prioritize funding for schools and communities in which the majority of
students are eligible for free or reduced lunch; provided further, that at
least 1 program shall operate in a municipality with a population of
25,000 or less; and provided further, that said funds may be expended
for a competitive grant program .................................................................. $74,786,841
4513-2020 For funding to increase behavioral health outreach, access and
support; provided, that the department of public health, in consultation
with the department of mental health and the department of
elementary and secondary education, shall expend not less than
$3,532,000 for a program to increase student access to behavioral
telehealth services in schools; provided further, that not later than
June 30, 2026, the department of public health shall report to the joint
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery and the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing the: (i)
number of students participating in the program; (ii) frequency with
which students use the program; (iii) cost of the services provided,
including the use of support staff; and (iv) manner in which costs have
been supported by third-party reimbursement; provided further, that
the department of higher education, in consultation with the
department of mental health, shall expend not less than $500,000 for
a mental health workforce pipeline program to encourage a culturally,
ethnically and linguistically diverse behavioral health workforce
through collaboration between colleges and behavioral health
providers; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the
department of higher education shall report to the clerks of the house
of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on higher
education, the joint committee on mental health, substance use and
recovery and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing: (A) a description of the community partners in the pilot; (B)
a summary of post-program employment or continuing education of
participating students; and (C) any recommendations on ways to
further encourage a culturally, ethnically and linguistically diverse
behavioral health workforce; provided further, that not less than
$2,500,000 shall be expended to address emergency department
mental and behavioral health boarding through staffing investments
and rate incentives associated with fully operationalizing inpatient
mental health acute care beds and intensive inpatient psychiatric
99

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
beds, intensive community-based acute treatment, community-based
acute treatment and partial hospitalization capacity; provided further,
that said grants may be utilized to maintain rate incentives for beds
made operational in calendar year 2023; provided further, that priority
shall be given to grants that support services and staff needs for
children and adolescents; provided further, that staffing investments
shall include sufficient funding for culturally and linguistically
competent workforce recruitment, retention and training including, but
not limited to, loan repayment programs and hiring and retention
incentives to support the full spectrum of hospital-based behavioral
health providers including, but not limited to, psychiatrists, mental
health workers, social workers, registered nurses, certified nursing
assistants and sitters; provided further, that priority shall be given to
grants that support new beds that would be located in underserved
areas of the commonwealth; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for investments in crisis stabilization services for patients
who are boarding, including, but not limited to, de-escalation training
for clinical and ancillary staff ......................................................................... $9,291,127
4516-0263 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $1,296,253 in retained revenues from blood lead testing fees
collected from insurers and individuals for the purpose of conducting
such tests; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $1,296,253
4516-1000 For the operation of the bureau of infectious disease and laboratory
sciences, including infectious disease surveillance and the state public
health laboratory; provided, that funds shall be expended for an
eastern equine encephalitis testing program and for tuberculosis
testing and treatment services; provided further, that the department
of public health shall ensure that vendors delivering tuberculosis
clinical services and treatment shall seek third-party reimbursement for
such services; provided further, that no funds appropriated in this item
shall be expended for administrative, space or energy expenses of the
department that are not directly related to personnel or programs
funded in this item; provided further, that not less than $2,657,020
shall be expended for the operation of the universal immunization
program; provided further, that all costs related to childhood vaccines
shall be paid for through the Vaccine Purchase Trust Fund established
in section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws; and provided
further, that not later than September 16, 2025, the department shall
submit a report to the joint committee on public health and the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the current
departmental recommendations for the commonwealth's vaccine
distribution plan, including the role of local boards of health; (ii) the
current state of implementing the plan; (iii) any anticipated state
investments necessary to carry out the plan; and (iv) the department's
plan to improve vaccine distribution coordination efforts with local
boards of health .......................................................................................... $31,935,715
100

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
4516-1005 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $1,086,835 generated by fees collected from providers or
insurers for sexually transmitted infections testing performed at the
state public health laboratory; provided, that collected retained
revenues may be used to supplement the costs of the laboratory; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ........................................................................................................... $1,086,835
4516-1010 For state matching funds required by the federal Pandemic and
All-Hazards Preparedness Act, Public Law 109-417 ..................................... $1,534,191
4516-1022 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $364,592 generated by fees collected from insurers and
providers for tuberculosis tests performed at the state public health
laboratory; provided, that collected retained revenues may be used to
supplement the costs of the laboratory; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system....................................... $364,592
4516-1037 For the department of public health, which may expend for the
implementation of chapter 111O of the General Laws and rules and
regulations promulgated thereunder not more than $49,569 in retained
revenues collected from application fees for approval of mobile
integrated health care programs and renewals thereof and from fines
and penalties imposed by the department on mobile integrated health
care programs; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................... $49,569
4516-1039 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $5,500,000 in retained revenues collected from application fees
under section 25C of chapter 111 of the General Laws to support the
operations of the determination of need program and health care
facility plan review within the department; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the
purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the department may
incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................... $5,500,000
4518-0200 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $2,362,875 generated by fees collected from services provided
101

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
at the registry of vital records and statistics, including: (i) amendments
of vital records and requests for vital records not issued in person at
the registry; (ii) requests for heirloom certificates; and (iii) research
requests performed by registry staff at the registry; provided, that
collected retained revenues may be used for all program costs,
including the compensation of employees; provided further, that the
registrar of vital records and statistics shall exempt from payment of a
fee any person requesting a verification of birth to establish eligibility
for Medicaid; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $2,362,875
4590-0250 For school health services and school-based health centers in public
and nonpublic schools; provided, that not less than $3,000,000 shall
be expended for mental health services in public and nonpublic
schools; provided further, that funds shall be distributed to public and
nonpublic schools based on the percentage of students in the
commonwealth enrolled in each; provided further, that services shall
include, but not be limited to: (i) strengthening the infrastructure of
school health services in the areas of personnel and policy
development, programming and interdisciplinary collaboration; (ii)
developing linkages between school health services programs and
community health providers; (iii) incorporating health education
programs, including tobacco prevention and cessation activities, in
school curricula and in the provision of school-based health services;
and (iv) incorporating obesity prevention programs, including nutrition
and wellness programs, in school curricula, to address the nutrition
and lifestyle habits needed for healthy development; provided further,
that funds shall be expended for school nurses and school-based
health center programs; provided further, that funds shall be expended
for mental health services in public and nonpublic schools; and
provided further, that funds may be expended to address the
recommendations of the commission on lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning youth established in section 67 of
chapter 3 of the General Laws for the reduction of health disparities
for gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning youth. ..... $22,123,088
4590-0912 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $29,555,584 from reimbursements collected for western
Massachusetts hospital services, subject to the approval of the
commissioner of public health; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the Western Massachusetts
hospital shall be eligible to receive and retain full payment under the
medical assistance program administered by the executive office of
health and human services under chapter 118E of the General Laws
for all goods and services provided by the hospital under federal
requirements; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
102

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................. $29,555,584
4590-0913 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $1,548,538 for payments received for those services provided by
the Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from county
correctional facilities; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $1,548,538
4590-0915 For the maintenance and operation of Tewksbury hospital, Pappas
Rehabilitation Hospital for Children, Lemuel Shattuck hospital and the
hospital bureau, including the state office of pharmacy services;
provided, that reimbursements received for medical services provided
at the Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons from houses
of correction not managed by private health care vendors shall be
credited to item 4590-0903 of section 2B; and provided further, that
the department shall seek to obtain federal financial participation for
care provided to incarcerated persons of the department of correction
and county correctional facilities who are treated at the public health
hospitals.................................................................................................... $217,025,473
4590-0917 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $5,180,049 from payments received from the vendor managing
health services for state correctional facilities for medical services for
incarcerated persons provided by the Lemuel Shattuck hospital;
provided, that the payments may include capitation payments, fee-for-
service payments, advance payments and other compensation
arrangements established by contracts between the vendor and the
hospital; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $5,180,049
4590-0918 For the state office of pharmacy services, which may expend not more
than $39,995,927 from retained revenues collected from vendors
providing health care services to the department of correction;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department of public health may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported
in the state accounting system .................................................................... $39,995,927
4590-0924 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $2,226,357 from reimbursements collected by Tewksbury
hospital based on a revenue enhancement project to obtain Medicaid
coverage for patients whose services are not currently being
103

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
reimbursed; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $2,226,357
4590-0925 For the costs of a prostate cancer awareness, education and research
program focusing on men with African-American, Hispanic or Latino
heritage, family history of the disease and other men at high risk;
provided, that the department of public health shall oversee and
manage said program and shall grant not less than 85 per cent of
funds from this item to the AdMeTech Foundation-led Prostate Cancer
Action Council, which shall leverage existing partnerships with other
state-funded nonprofit research organizations and current and past
federally-funded, state-funded and privately-funded prostate cancer
programs aimed at saving lives, improving quality of life and reducing
health care costs ............................................................................................... $1,250,000
4590-0930 For price reductions for municipalities purchasing naloxone through
the municipal naloxone bulk purchase program ............................................ $1,404,000
4590-1503 For the provision of statewide support services for maternal, child and
family health activities to pregnant people, parents, caregivers,
infants, children and youth, including those with special health needs
to maintain the public health infrastructure necessary for promoting
racially equitable, evidence-based, data-informed and family-engaged
services and programs; provided, that not less than $296,297 shall be
expended for the universal newborn hearing screening program;
provided further, that funds appropriated in this item shall be expended
for the notification of and follow through with affected families, primary
care providers and early intervention programs upon the department
of public health's receipt of data indicative of potential hearing
disorders in newborns; provided further, that not less than $9,940,000
shall be expended for the pediatric palliative care program established
in section 24K of chapter 111 of the General Laws; provided further,
that notwithstanding said section 24K of said chapter 111, children
less than 22 years of age shall be eligible for this program; and
provided further, that funds shall be expended for universal newborn
hearing screening and perinatal-neonatal quality improvement................. $13,149,400
4590-1504 For a neighborhood-based gun and violent crime prevention pilot
program for targeted work with out-of-school youth and young adults
aged 17 to 24, inclusive, intended to prevent gun violence and other
violent crime in neighborhoods and municipalities with the highest
rates of violent crime in the commonwealth; provided, that funds shall
be awarded in consultation with the executive office of public safety
and security and the department of elementary and secondary
education; provided further, that funds shall be awarded to nonprofit,
community-based organizations located in and serving high risk youth
in eligible communities; provided further, that preference shall be
given to organizations that have: (i) demonstrated street outreach
capacity; (ii) effective partnerships with neighborhood health and
human services agencies, including mental health providers and with
schools and other local educational institutions; and (iii) clearly
104

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
outlined a comprehensive plan in support of continued or expanded
collaboration efforts with such partners, including data related to
measurable outcomes of successful partner collaboration; provided
further, that eligible expenses for such grants shall include, but not be
limited to, case workers, mental health counselors, academic supports
and other research-based practices and related support services;
provided further, that the department shall ensure that every grant
recipient establishes measurable outcomes in its comprehensive plan
and provides data related to those outcomes that demonstrate
program success; provided further, that preference shall be given to
proposals that demonstrate coordination with programs and services
funded through items 4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612;
provided further, that the department shall allocate funding to support
training and technical assistance for all grantees; provided further, that
not later than March 3, 2026, the department shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance, the joint committee
on public health, the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security, the joint committee on education and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the awarding of grants and
details of anticipated contracts by district; provided further, that the
department shall further report on the effectiveness of the program,
including but not limited to: (A) any measurable data-driven results;
(B) which strategies and collaborations have most effectively reduced
gun and other violence in the grantee neighborhoods; (C) how
spending through this item has been aligned with spending from items
4000-0005, 7061-0010 and 7061-9612 in ways that enhance public
safety while avoiding programmatic duplication; and (D) what efforts
have been taken by the nonprofit community and municipalities to
ensure the long-term viability of the reforms funded by the pilot
program; and provided further, that copies of the report shall be
provided to: (1) the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security; (2) the joint committee on public health; (3) the joint
committee on education; and (4) the house and senate committees on
ways and means not later than September 2, 2026 .................................... $10,091,186
4590-1506 For a competitive grant program to be administered by the department
of public health to support the establishment of a comprehensive
youth violence prevention program; provided, that eligibility shall be
determined by the criteria set forth in item 4590-1506 of section 2 of
chapter 182 of the acts of 2008; provided further, that no grants shall
be awarded to law enforcement agencies; and provided further,
that funds shall be considered one-time and grants shall not
annualize in fiscal year 2027 ......................................................................... $4,021,326
4590-1507 For competitively procured grants to youth at-risk programs utilizing
an evidence-based positive youth development model, including
programs that serve lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and
questioning youth ......................................................................................... $7,081,500
4590-2001 For the department of public health, which may expend not more
than $4,334,319 of payments received for services provided by
Tewksbury hospital to clients of the department of developmental
services, including for the provision of behavioral health services and
the continuation of short-term medical rehabilitation for clients of the
department of developmental services; provided, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, for the purpose of
105

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department of public health
may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......... $4,334,319
OFFICE OF CHILDREN, YOUTH AND FAMILY SERVICES.
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0015 For central and area office administration and service coordination of
the department of children and families; provided, that the associated
expenses of employees whose AA and DD object class costs are paid
from item 4800-1100 shall be paid from this item; provided further, that
the commissioner of the department of children and families may
transfer funds between items 4800-0030, 4800-0038, 4800-0040 and
4800-0041 as necessary, pursuant to an allocation plan, which shall
detail by object class the distribution of the funds to be transferred and
which the commissioner shall file with the house and senate
committees on ways and means 30 days prior to any such transfer;
provided further, that not more than 5 per cent of any item shall be
transferred in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the commissioner
may transfer funds from line item 4800-1100 into line item 4800-0015
for the purpose of maintaining appropriate staffing ratios; provided
further, that the commissioner shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means 30 days in advance of any such
transfer; provided further, that not more than 2 per cent of funds from
line item 4800-1100 shall be transferred in fiscal year 2026; provided
further, that no funds shall be expended from this item for the
compensation of unit 8 employees; provided further, that the
department of children and families shall not place a child or
adolescent referred by, or discharged from, the care of the department
of mental health until the department of mental health forwards an
assessment and recommendation as to whether the child or
adolescent may be appropriately placed in foster care or if, due
to severe emotional disturbance, such child or adolescent is more
appropriate for congregate care placement; provided further, that the
department of children and families shall assist the department of
mental health in making such assessments and recommendations;
provided further, that if the placement of a child with someone other
than a parent becomes necessary, the department of children and
families shall place the highest priority on identifying a family resource
within the child’s kinship or family circle and shall provide services and
support to partner with the family resource in meeting the child’s
needs; provided further, that unless otherwise authorized, all funds
including federal reimbursements received by the department of
children and families shall be credited to the General Fund, except for
federal reimbursement used to support revenue maximization
projects; provided further, that the department of children and families
and the department of early education and care shall provide
standards for early education and care placements made through the
supportive child care program; provided further, that the department
of children and families, in collaboration with the department of early
education and care, shall maintain a centralized list detailing the
number of children eligible for supportive child care services, the
106

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
number of supportive slots filled and the number of supportive slots
available; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, the department of children and families shall not
reduce recoupment amounts recommended by the state auditor;
provided further, that there shall not be a waiting list for the services;
provided further, that all children eligible for services under item 3000-
3060 shall receive those services; provided further, that the department
of children and families shall maintain a timely, independent and fair
administrative hearing system; provided further, that not later than
December 2, 2025, and February 27, 2026, the department of children
and families shall report to the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities on: (i) the fair hearing requests filed in fiscal year 2026,
using non-identifying information, which shall state, for each hearing
request: (A) the subject matter of the appeal; (B) the number of days
between the hearing request and the first day of the hearing; (C) the
number of days between the first day of the hearing and the hearing
officer’s decision; (D) the number of days between the hearing officer’s
decision and the agency’s final decision; (E) the number of days of
continuance granted at the appellant’s request; (F) the number of days
of continuance granted at the request of the department of children
and families or the hearing officer’s request, specifying which party
made the request; and (G) whether the department’s decision that was
the subject of the appeal was affirmed or reversed; and (ii) the fair
hearing requests filed before fiscal year 2026, which have been
pending for more than 180 days, stating the number of those cases,
how many of those cases have been heard but not decided and how
many have been decided by the hearing officer but not yet issued as a
final agency decision; provided further, that the department of children
and families shall maintain and make available to the public, during
regular business hours, a record of its fair hearings, with personal
identifying information removed, including for each hearing request: (i)
the date of the request; (ii) the date of the hearing decision; (iii) the
decision rendered by the hearing officer; and (iv) the final decision
rendered upon the commissioner of children and families’ review;
provided further, that the department shall make redacted copies of
fair hearing decisions available within 30 days of a written request;
provided further, that the department of children and families shall not
make available any information in violation of federal privacy
regulations; provided further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the
department of children and families shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee
on children, families and persons with disabilities that shall include,
but not be limited to, the: (1) number of medical and psychiatric
personnel and their level of training currently employed by or under
contract with the department; (2) number of foster care reviews
conducted by the department and the average length of time in which
each review was completed; (3) number of social workers and
supervisors who have earned a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social
work; (4) total number of social workers and the total number of social
workers holding licensure, by level; (5) number of the department’s
contracts reviewed by the state auditor and the number of corrective
action plans issued; and (6) number of corrective action plans entered
into by the department; provided further, that the department of
children and families shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on children,
107

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
families and persons with disabilities on the caseload of the
department; provided further, that the report shall include, but not be
limited to: (A) the caseloads of residential placements, congregate
care, foster care, therapeutic foster care, adoption, guardianship, 51A
reports, substantiated 51A reports, the number of children who die in
the care and custody of the department, the number of children
currently eligible for supportive child care, the number of children
presently receiving supportive child care and the number of medical
and psychiatric consultation requests made by the department’s social
workers; (B) the number of approved foster care placements; (C) the
number of children in psychiatric hospitals and community-based
acute treatment programs who remain hospitalized beyond their
medically necessary stay while awaiting placement and the number of
days each case remains in placement beyond that which is medically
necessary; (D) the number of children in the department of children and
families’ care and custody who are receiving medical or psychiatric
care provided through other publicly-funded sources; (E) the number
of children served by supervised visitation centers and the number of
those children who are reunified with their families; (F) the total
number of children served, their ages, the number of children served
in each service plan, the number of children in out-of-home
placements and the number of placements each child has had before
receiving an out-of-home placement; (G) for each area office, the
number of kinship guardianship subsidies provided in the quarters
covered by the report and the number of kinship guardianship
subsidies provided in that quarter for which federal reimbursement
was received; (H) for each area office, the total spending on services
other than case management services provided to families to keep a
child with the child’s parents or reunifying the child with the child’s
parents, spending by the type of service including, but not limited to,
the number of children and a breakdown of spending for respite care,
intensive in-home services, client financial assistance and flexible
funding, community-based after-school social and recreation program
services, family navigation services and parent aide services and the
unduplicated number of families that receive the services; (I) for each
area office, the total number of families residing in shelters paid for by
the department, a list of where the families are sheltered, the total cost
and average cost per family at those shelters and a description of how
the department determines who qualifies or does not qualify for a
shelter; (J) for each area office, the number of requests for voluntary
services, broken down by type of service requested, whether the
request was approved or denied, the number of families that were
denied voluntary services and received a 51A report, the reasons for
denying such services and what, if any, referrals were made for
services by other agencies or entities; (K) the number of families
receiving multiple 51A reports within a 10-month period, the number
of cases reopened within 6 months of being closed and the number of
children who return home and then reenter an out-of-home placement
within 6 months; (L) the number of children and families served by the
family resource centers, by area; and (M) the number of children in the
care and custody of the department whose whereabouts are unknown;
provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the department
of children and families shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on children,
families and persons with disabilities that details any changes to the
rules, regulations or guidelines established by the department in the
108

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
previous fiscal year to carry out its duties under chapter 119 of the
General Laws including, but not limited to: (I) criteria used to determine
whether a child has been abused or neglected; (II) guidelines for
removal of a child from the home; and (III) standards to determine
what reasonable efforts are being made to keep a child in the home;
provided further, that on a monthly basis, the department of children
and families shall provide the caseload forecasting office with data on
children receiving services, young adults receiving services as defined
in section 21 of said chapter 119, who continue to receive services as
set forth in subsection (f) of section 23 of said chapter 119 and other
pertinent data related to items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041 that is
requested by the office; provided further, that the report shall also
contain the number of children and families served by the family
resource centers, by area, and an evaluation of the services provided
and their effectiveness; provided further, that to the extent feasible
within existing appropriations, the department of children and families
shall maintain existing services for the aging-out population; provided
further, that the commissioner of children and families may transfer
funds from item 4800-1100 into item 4800-0015 for the purpose of
maintaining appropriate staffing ratios under the memorandum of
agreement between the commonwealth and the Alliance/Local 509,
SEIU signed on March 25, 2013; provided further, that not less than 15
days in advance of any such transfer, the commissioner shall notify
the house and senate committees on ways and means; provided
further, that not more than 2 per cent of said funds from item 4800-
1100 shall be transferred in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the
commissioner may transfer funds between items 4800-0030, 4800-
0038, 4800-0040 and 4800-0041 for services only and, as necessary,
under an allocation plan, which shall detail, by object class, the
distribution of the funds to be transferred; provided further, that
transfers shall not be made for administrative costs; provided further,
that not less than 15 days in advance of any such transfer, the
commissioner shall notify the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that not more than 5 per cent of any item
shall be transferred in fiscal year 2026; and provided further, that funds
shall be expended for a unit to help identify at-risk youth and provide
preventative services and to implement a missing or absent youth
recovery response policy .......................................................................... $157,866,916
4800-0016 For the department of children and families, which may expend for the
operation of the transitional employment program not more
than $2,000,000 from retained revenues collected from various state,
county and municipal government entities and state authorities for the
costs related to the provision of services by the participants and the
overhead costs and expenses incurred by the not-for-profit managing
agent selected by the commissioner of children and families for
administering the program; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, the commissioner may enter into a
contract with Roca, Inc. to manage the transitional employment
program and to provide services to participants from the aging out
population, parolees, probationers, youth service releasees and other
community residents considered to have employment needs ....................... $2,000,000
4800-0025 For foster care review services ..................................................................... $5,533,263
109

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4800-0030 For the continuation of local and regional administration and
coordination of services provided by lead agencies through purchase-
of-service contracts, including flex services ............................................. $11,089,960
4800-0036 For a sexual abuse intervention network program to be administered
in conjunction with the district attorneys ........................................................... $991,584
4800-0038 For guardianship, foster care, adoption, family preservation and
kinship services provided by the department of children and families;
provided, that services funded through this item shall include shelter
services, substance use treatment, young parent programs, parent
aides, education and counseling services, foster care, adoption and
guardianship subsidies, tiered reimbursements used to promote the
foster care placement of children with special medical and social
needs, assessment of the appropriateness of adoption for children in
the care of the department for more than 12 months, protective
services provided by partnership agencies, targeted recruitment and
retention of foster families, respite care services, post-adoption
services and support services for foster, kinship and adoptive families
and juvenile fire setter programs and services for people at risk of
domestic violence, including payroll costs; provided further, that funds
may be expended on programs that received funding in fiscal year
2013; provided further, that funds may be expended to support
reforms at the department to improve foster care and placement
stability and to ensure positive permanency outcomes for children;
and provided further, that the department may contract with provider
agencies for the coordination and management of services, including
flex services .............................................................................................. $347,457,804
4800-0040 For family preservation, reunification and service coordination;
provided, that services shall include family support and
stabilization services provided by the department of children and
families ...................................................................................................... $125,486,736
4800-0041 For congregate care services; provided, that funds may be expended
from this item to provide community based services, including in-home
support and stabilization services to children who would otherwise be
placed in congregate settings; and provided further, that the
department of children and families shall oversee area review teams
that shall evaluate the feasibility of maintaining the child in the
community in this manner whenever possible before recommending
placement in a congregate care setting .................................................... $463,750,089
4800-0058 For the support of a foster care campaign to recruit new foster parents;
provided, that not later than April 1, 2026, the department of children
and families shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the joint committee on children, families and
persons with disabilities that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i)
number of new foster care parents as a result of the foster care
campaign; and (ii) methods in which the department is recruiting foster
care parents ..................................................................................................... $975,000
4800-0091 For the department of children and families, which may expend not
more than $5,035,427 in federal reimbursements received under Title
IV-E of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 670 et. seq. during fiscal
year 2026 to develop a training institute for professional development
110

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
at the department; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system; and provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, federal reimbursements
received in excess of $5,035,427 shall be credited to the General Fund
...................................................................................................................... $5,035,427
4800-0200 For the support and maintenance of family resource centers
throughout the commonwealth ................................................................... $28,221,665
4800-1100 For the AA and DD object class costs of the department of children
and families’ social workers; provided, that funds shall mitigate social
worker caseloads in those area offices furthest above the statewide
weighted caseload standard and towards achieving a social worker
caseload ratio of 15 to 1 statewide; and provided further, that only
employees of bargaining unit 8, as identified in the Massachusetts
personnel administrative reporting and information system, shall be
paid from this item .................................................................................... $327,075,076
OFFICE OF HEALTH SERVICES.
Department of Mental Health.
5011-0100 For the operation of the department of mental health ................................ $36,270,883
5042-5000 For child and adolescent services, including the costs of psychiatric
and related services provided to children and adolescents determined
to be medically-ready for discharge from acute hospital units or mental
health facilities and who are experiencing unnecessary delays in being
discharged due to the lack of more appropriate settings; provided, that
to fund said services, the commissioner of mental health may allocate
funds from the amount appropriated in this item to other departments
within the executive office of health and human services; provided
further, that the department of mental health shall not refer or
discharge a child or adolescent to the custody or care of the
department of children and families until the department of mental
health forwards its assessment and recommendation as to whether the
child or adolescent is appropriate for foster care or, due to severe
emotional disturbance, is more appropriate for group care; provided
further, that not less than $9,800,000 shall be expended for an
intensive residential treatment program; provided further, that not less
than $5,200,000 shall be expended for a flexible support services
program; provided further, that not less than $4,500,000 shall be
expended for a program to provide assertive community treatment for
individuals under the age of 22 who exhibit symptoms of serious
emotional disturbance, demonstrate an inability to consistently use
less intensive levels of care in the community and have functional
impairment and a history of difficulty in functioning safely and
successfully in community, school, home or workplace settings;
provided further, that the program shall: (A) include a team-based
approach to service delivery that tailors services to the specific needs
111

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
and acuity of each individual; (B) provide mental health services and
social service assistance through a person-centered approach, which
may include, but shall not be limited to, clinical assessment and
outreach, medication treatment and outreach, care coordination
including primary care, symptom management, harm reduction, family
services, housing support and needs that arise in carrying out the acts
of daily living; (C) be consistent, to the maximum extent possible, with
the evidence-based practice standards for assertive community
treatment as found in the Substance Abuse and Mental Health
Services Administration’s assertive community treatment evidence-
based practices kit; and (D) not limit program services to a specific
physical location; provided further, that the department of mental
health shall expend not less than $3,825,000 for the Massachusetts
Child Psychiatry Access Project or MCPAP; provided further, that not
less than $675,000 of that amount shall be expended for MCPAP for
Moms statewide to address mental health concerns in pregnant and
postpartum people and to expand support for pregnant and
postpartum people by adding substance use disorder-specific
education, training, consultation and care coordination to the project’s
existing capacity; provided further, that amounts expended from this
item for MCPAP that are related to services provided on behalf of
commercially-insured clients shall be assessed by the commissioner
on surcharge payors, as defined in section 64 of chapter 118E of the
General Laws, and shall be collected in a manner consistent with the
department’s regulations; provided further, that not later than March
13, 2026, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on: (i) an overview of MCPAP care
coordination efforts; (ii) the number of psychiatric consultations, face-
to-face consultations and referrals made to specialists on behalf of
children with behavioral health needs in fiscal year 2025 and fiscal
year 2026; and (iii) recommendations to: (A) increase the number of
specialists receiving referrals through MCPAP; (B) increase access to
MCPAP in regions currently underutilizing the project; and (C) improve
care coordination efforts to identify specialists available and accepting
new child and adolescent patients, with priority to those children and
adolescents who exhibit complex conditions and experience long wait
lists for specialty psychiatry; and provided further, that not later than
April 1, 2026, the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on: (1) the distribution of funds,
delineated by initiative; (2) the number of individuals served; (3) the
outcomes measured; and (4) recommendations for expanding cost-
effective and evidence-based early mental health identification and
prevention programming for children and adolescents in fiscal year
2026 and fiscal year 2027, prior appropriation continued ........................ $128,586,476
5046-0000 For adult mental health and support services; provided, that the
department of mental health may allocate not more than $5,000,000
from item 5095-0015 to this item, as necessary, under allocation plans
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means
not less than 30 days before any such transfer, for residential and day
services for clients formerly receiving care at department facilities;
provided further, that not later than February 5, 2026, the department
shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
on the distribution of funds per adult and child planning population and
the types of services received in each region in fiscal year 2026;
provided further, that the department shall maintain in fiscal year 2026
112

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
the same amount of community-based placements as in the previous
3 fiscal years; provided further, that in fiscal year 2026, the department
shall expend on clubhouses not less than the amount expended on
clubhouses in fiscal year 2025; provided further, funds shall be
expended for jail diversion programs in municipalities that provide
equal matching funds from other public or private sources; provided
further, that not later than December 16, 2025, the department shall
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
regarding the: (i) number of crisis intervention team and jail diversion
efforts; (ii) amount of funding per grant, delineated by city, town or
provider; (iii) potential savings achieved; (iv) recommendations for
expansion; and (v) outcomes measured; and provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be expended on the expansion of low
threshold, safe haven housing for mentally ill men and women who
have been chronically homeless and are currently living in emergency
shelters or on the streets in Boston, prior appropriation continued .......... $661,933,895
5046-2000 For homelessness services ........................................................................ $26,709,879
5046-4000 For the department of mental health, which may expend not more
than $125,000 in retained revenues collected from occupancy fees
charged to the tenants in the creative housing option in community
environments, or CHOICE program under chapter 167 of the acts of
1987; provided, that all fees collected under said CHOICE program
shall be expended for the routine maintenance and repair of facilities
in said CHOICE program .................................................................................. $125,000
5047-0001 For emergency service programs and acute inpatient mental health
care services; provided, that the department of mental health shall
require a performance specification to be developed for safe aftercare
options for adults upon release from acute inpatient mental health care
services; and provided further, that the emergency service programs
shall take all reasonable steps to identify and invoice the third-party
insurer of all persons serviced by the programs ......................................... $22,231,296
Behavioral Health Outreach, Access and
Support Trust Fund ............................................... 52.24%
General Fund ........................................................ 47.76%
5055-0000 For forensic services provided by the department of mental health;
provided, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for juvenile
court clinics ................................................................................................. $18,962,960
5095-0015 For the operation of hospital facilities and community-based mental
health services; provided, that in order to comply with the decision in
Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance
care for clients, the department of mental health shall discharge clients
residing in inpatient facilities to residential services in the community if
the following criteria are met: (i) the client is deemed clinically suited
for a more integrated setting; (ii) the community residential service
capacity and resources available are sufficient to provide each client
with an equal or improved level of service; and (iii) the cost to the
commonwealth of serving the client in the community is less than or
equal to the cost of serving the client in inpatient care; provided further,
that any client transferred to another inpatient facility as the result of a
facility closure shall receive a level of care that is equal to or greater
113

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
than the care that had been provided at the closed facility; provided
further, that the department may allocate funds of not more than
$5,000,000 from this item to item 5046-0000, as necessary, under
allocation plans submitted to the house and senate committees on
ways and means not less than 30 days before any transfer for
residential and day services for clients formerly receiving inpatient care
at the centers and facilities; provided further, that the department shall
maintain not less than 671 inpatient beds in its system in fiscal year
2026; provided further, that of said 671 beds, 45 beds shall be
continuing care inpatient beds on the campus of Taunton state
hospital; and provided further, that within the existing appropriation,
the department may operate more beds at Taunton state hospital ........... $376,149,057
5095-0017 For the purposes of a loan forgiveness program for clinical behavioral
health workers across the department of mental health; provided, that
the department shall create a loan forgiveness and tuition
reimbursement program for clinical behavioral health workers,
including but not limited to nurse practitioners, psychologists,
psychiatrists, peer counselors and behavioral health navigators; and
provided further, that not later than September 30, 2025, the
department of mental health shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the framework and
eligibility criteria of the program; (ii) the number of participants in the
program; and (iii) the average amount forgiven per person in the
program ........................................................................................................ $5,000,000
Department of Developmental Services.
5911-1003 For the administration and operation of the department of
developmental services; provided, that the department shall not
charge user fees for transportation or community day services;
provided further, that the department shall not charge fees for eligibility
determination for services provided by the department or for
applications or requests for transfer of guardianship; provided further,
that regional employment collaboratives shall be funded at not less
than the amount funded in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that the
department shall issue a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means not later than February 20, 2026 detailing: (i)
significant expense increases incurred by the department; (ii)
measures implemented by the department to reduce costs; and (iii)
improved outcomes in programs and services funded by the
department; provided further, that the commissioner of developmental
services may transfer funds between items 5920-2025, 5920-2000,
5911-2000 and 5920-3000; provided further, that the commissioner
shall notify the house and senate committees on ways and means not
less than 30 days before any such transfer; provided further, that not
less than $200,000 shall be expended for the Massachusetts Down
Syndrome Congress, Inc.; and provided further, that not less than
$50,000 shall be expended for the Center for Autism and
Neurodevelopmental Disorders at the University of Massachusetts
memorial medical center and the University of Massachusetts medical
school based on the patient-centered medical home concept .................. $105,945,417
5911-2000 For transportation costs associated with community-based day and
work programs; provided, that the department shall provide
transportation, which shall be prioritized by need; and provided
114

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
further, that not more than $7,000,000 of additional funds provided in
fiscal year 2026 shall be expended by the department on
transportation related to the new day and service components
developed through item 5920-2025 and on preparation for any
increased service need that may occur during the fiscal year in
response to increased vaccinations and any improvement in the
public health emergency ............................................................................. $47,172,062
5920-2000 For vendor-operated, community-based residential adult services,
including intensive individual supports; provided, that annualized
funding shall be expended for turning 22 clients who began receiving
services in fiscal year 2024 under item 5920-5000 of section 2 of
chapter 126 of the acts of 2022; provided further, that not later than
February 27, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the use of
shared-living services in the commonwealth, which shall include, but
not be limited to, the: (i) number of clients living in shared-living
placements, broken down by age and location; (ii) average cost of
shared-living services; (iii) number of clients living in a shared-living
placement with individuals they knew prior to the arrangement; (iv)
department’s oversight of the application and placement process; (v)
safeguards in place for clients receiving these services; and (vi)
potential for growth of the program; provided further, that the
commissioner of developmental services may transfer funds from this
item to item 5920-2010, as necessary, under an allocation plan that
shall detail, by object class, the distribution of the funds to be
transferred and that shall be submitted to the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before any such
transfer; and provided further, that not more than $5,000,000 shall be
transferred from this item in fiscal year 2026 ........................................ $2,018,989,676
5920-2003 For supportive technology and remote services for individuals served
by the department of developmental services ............................................... $5,280,717
5920-2010 For state-operated, community-based residential services for
adults, including community-based health services ................................. $347,233,269
5920-2025 For community-based day and work programs and associated
transportation costs for adults; provided, that the department of
developmental services shall provide transportation, which shall be
prioritized by need; provided further, that the department shall support
individuals with disabilities who transitioned from employment
services offered at sheltered workshops to community-based
employment as part of the commonwealth’s employment first initiative;
provided further, that any public-private partnerships with employers
and nonprofits shall encourage the highest level of independence
among individuals with disabilities and shall provide options to
maximize community involvement and participation; provided further,
that not later than April 1, 2026, the department shall issue a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities detailing:
(i) the number of eligible individuals employed in community-based
employment in fiscal year 2025 and the number estimated for fiscal
year 2026; (ii) the number and types of community-based employment
partners; (iii) the outcomes measured; and (iv) recommendations for
expansion; provided further, that the commissioner of developmental
115

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
services may transfer such funds from this item to items 5920-2000,
5911-2000, 5920-3000, 5920-5000 and 5930-1000; and provided
further, that the commissioner shall notify the house and senate
committees on ways and means not less than 30 days before any such
transfer ...................................................................................................... $287,388,656
5920-3000 For respite services and intensive family supports.................................... $123,925,257
5920-3010 For contracted support services for families of children with autism
through the autism division at the department of developmental
services; provided, that the department shall expend not less than
$5,500,000 to provide services under the children’s autism spectrum
disorder waiver under section 1915 of the Social Security Act;
provided further, that the waiver shall include children with autism
spectrum disorder ages 0 to 8, inclusive, including children with autism
spectrum disorder ages 0 to 3, inclusive, who are receiving services
through the department of public health’s early intervention program;
provided further, that the department of developmental services shall
take all steps necessary to ensure that the waiver program is fully
enrolled and that eligible children with autism immediately begin to
receive services under said waiver; provided further, that the
department shall immediately file any waiver amendment necessary
with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to comply
with the requirements of this item; provided further, that not later than
January 16, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
education and the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities on: (i) the number of contracted support services
provided for families with children with autism under this item; (ii) the
costs associated with such services; (iii) the services provided by the
children’s autism spectrum disorder waiver, with information regarding
the number of children enrolled in the waiver and receiving services;
(iv) the linguistic and cultural diversity, age, gender and geographic
representation of the applicants and the children enrolled in the
program; (v) the department’s plans to continue to assess the demand
for waiver services; (vi) any plans by the executive office of health and
human services to expand the waiver for children on the autism
spectrum of all ages in the future; and (vii) other information
determined relevant by the department; and provided further, that the
department shall submit copies of amended waivers to the house and
senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on
education and the joint committee on children, families and persons
with disabilities upon submission of the amendment ................................... $7,928,034
5920-3020 For the implementation of chapter 226 of the acts of 2014, including
services and supports for individuals with a developmental disability
attributable to autism spectrum disorder, Smith-Magenis syndrome or
Prader-Willi syndrome; provided, that the department shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the: (i) number of individuals eligible for services; (ii)
number of eligible individuals served; (iii) type of services provided; (iv)
cost per service; and (v) cost of services per individual; and provided
further, that not less than $300,000 shall be expended for the
commission on autism established in section 217 of chapter 6 of the
General Laws ............................................................................................. $77,926,359
116

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
5920-3025 For funding to support initiatives to address the needs of individuals
with developmental disabilities who are aging including, but not limited
to, individuals with Down Syndrome and Alzheimer’s disease, through
the identification of best practices for services for affected individuals,
including: (i) medical care coordination models that address conditions
common to individuals with developmental disabilities who are aging;
(ii) training for direct care and other staff in the identification of
dementia or other age-related conditions; and (iii) the collection of data
regarding the effectiveness of the initiatives included in this item;
provided, that not later than April 1, 2026, the department of
developmental services shall submit a report to the executive office for
administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the status of these initiatives including, but not
limited to: (A) the number of participants served by each initiative; (B)
the participant outcomes, including impacts on the physical and
cognitive health of participants; (C) the cost of each initiative and the
cost per participant; (D) the implementation plans for these initiatives
in fiscal years 2027 and 2028; and (E) recommendations for
enhancing the care of individuals with developmental disabilities who
are aging ............................................................................................................ $99,000
5920-5000 For services to clients of the department who turn 22 years of age
during fiscal years 2025 and 2026; provided, that not later than
January 2, 2026 the department shall report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means on the use of any funds encumbered
or expended from this item including, but not limited to, the number
of clients served in each region and the types of services purchased
in each region ........................................................................................... $110,653,566
5930-1000 For the operation of facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities;
provided, that in order to comply with the decision in Olmstead v. L.C.
ex rel. Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999) and to enhance care for clients,
the department of developmental services shall discharge clients
residing in intermediate care facilities for individuals with intellectual
disabilities, or an ICF/IID, to residential services in the community if: (i)
the client is deemed clinically suited for a more integrated setting; (ii)
community residential service capacity and resources available are
sufficient to provide each client with an equal or improved level of
service; and (iii) the cost to the commonwealth of serving the client in
the community is less than or equal to the cost of serving the client in
an ICF/IID; provided further, that any client transferred to another
ICF/IID as the result of a facility closure shall receive a level of care
that is equal to or greater than the level of care that had been provided
at the closed ICF/IID; provided further, that the department may
allocate funds from this item to items 5920-2000, 5920-2010 and
5920-2025, as necessary, under allocation plans that shall be
submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and means
not less than 30 days before any transfer for residential and day
services for clients formerly receiving inpatient care at an ICF/IID; and
provided further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the department
shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and means,
on: (A) all efforts to comply with the decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel.
Zimring, 527 U.S. 581 (1999); (B) the enhancement of care within
available resources to clients served by the department; and (C) the
steps taken to consolidate or close an ICF/IID ......................................... $131,050,113
117

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9101 For the operation of the board of library commissioners ............................... $2,073,664
7000-9401 For state aid to regional public libraries; provided, that the board of
library commissioners may provide quarterly advances of funds as it
deems appropriate under clauses (1) and (3) of section 19C of chapter
78 of the General Laws to regional public library systems throughout
each fiscal year, in compliance with the office of the comptroller’s
regulations on state grants pursuant to 815 C.M.R. 2.00; provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
in calculating the fiscal year 2026 distribution of funds appropriated in
this item, the board shall employ the population figures used to
calculate the fiscal year 2025 distribution; provided further, that the
board shall provide funds for the continued operation of a single
regional library system to serve the different geographic regions of the
commonwealth; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the library for the commonwealth shall
receive not less than 47.5 cents for each resident of the
commonwealth; and provided further, that said amount shall not
exceed 25 per cent of the amount appropriated under this item ................ $19,000,000
7000-9402 For the talking book library at the Worcester public library .............................. $711,942
7000-9406 For the Perkins Braille and Talking Book Library in the city known as
the town of Watertown, including the operation of the machine lending
agency .......................................................................................................... $4,053,441
7000-9501 For state aid to public libraries; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, no city or town shall receive
funds from this item in any year when the appropriation of the city or
town for free public library service is below an amount equal to 102.5
per cent of the average of the appropriations for free public library
services for the 3 years immediately preceding; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the board
of library commissioners may grant waivers in excess of the waiver
limit set forth under the second paragraph of section 19A of chapter 78
of the General Laws for fiscal year 2026 for not more than 1 year;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, of the amount by which this item exceeds the amount
appropriated under item 7000-9501 of section 2 of chapter 194 of the
acts of 1998, funds shall be distributed under the guidelines of the
municipal equalization grant program, the library incentive grant
program and the nonresident circulation offset program; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
any payment made under this item shall be deposited with the
treasurer of the city or town and held in a separate account and shall
be expended by the public library of that city or town without
appropriation ............................................................................................... $20,000,000
7000-9506 For the technology and automated resource sharing networks .................... $6,172,690
7000-9508 For the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc., chartered as the
Commonwealth Affiliate of the Center for the Book in the Library of
118

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Congress; provided, that the Massachusetts Center for the Book, Inc.
shall continue its work as a public-private partnership ..................................... $420,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1091 For the development and operation of career technical institutes in
vocational-technical schools in partnership with industry and
community stakeholders; provided, that career technical institutes
shall build out industry recognized credentialing pathways for adult
learners in technical and trade fields to retrain and grow the workforce;
provided further, that at the direction of the secretary of labor and
workforce development, development funds may be transferred to the
Workforce Competitiveness Trust Fund established in section 2WWW
of chapter 29 of the General Laws to issue competitive grants to
support the start-up and educational costs of career technical institutes
...................................................................................................................... $8,985,600
7003-0100 For the operation of the executive office of labor and workforce
development; provided, that not later than February 23, 2026, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means including, but not limited to: (i) sector by sector
barriers to workers returning to work during the 2019 novel coronavirus
pandemic, including the retail sector; and (ii) current programs that
may be utilized to target the workforce in each sector ................................ $2,334,937
7003-0101 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the
executive office of labor and workforce development; provided, that
common functions that may be designated core administrative
functions include, without limitation, human resources, financial
management, information technology, legal, procurement and asset
management; provided further, that the executive office shall, in
consultation with the comptroller, develop a detailed plan for the
expenditure of said funds, and for increasing efficiency and reducing
costs through shared services; provided further, that not later than
January 30, 2026, the secretary of labor and workforce development
and the comptroller shall jointly submit the plan to the joint committee
on labor and workforce development and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; and provided further, that the
General Fund shall be reimbursed the amount appropriated in this
item attributed to the department of industrial accidents based on rates
approved by the office of the comptroller and for associated indirect
and direct fringe benefit costs from assessments levied under section
65 of chapter 152 of the General Laws ...................................................... $20,871,772
7003-0150 For the operation of a re-entry workforce development and supportive
services program for formerly incarcerated individuals transitioning
from a house of correction or the department of correction to a steady
job or career; provided, that funds shall be used for: (i) job training for
formerly incarcerated individuals in order to facilitate job placement;
(ii) wage subsidies to facilitate private sector employment and
professional development; and (iii) support services and programs for
court-involved youths; provided further, that the executive office of
labor and workforce development shall take all necessary steps to
119

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
secure private sector funding for this program; provided further, that
the executive office shall coordinate with a local public or private
nonprofit university to examine and develop a longitudinal evaluation
framework to assess the efficacy and efficiency of the program;
provided further, that not less than $250,000 shall be expended for
New England Culinary Arts Training; and provided further, that not
later than April 1, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to
the executive office for administration and finance and the house and
senate committees on ways and means describing the administrative
functions of the program, client outcomes and plans for the longitudinal
evaluation framework .................................................................................... $2,725,000
7003-0151 For the purposes of expanding and diversifying registered
apprenticeships including, but not limited to, in the priority
manufacturing, health care and information technology industries ............... $3,315,140
Department of Economic Research.
7003-0105 For the operation of the department of economic research ............................. $891,496
Department of Labor Standards.
7003-0200 For the operation of the department of labor standards ................................ $4,737,805
7003-0201 For the department of labor standards, which may expend not more
than $451,076 received from fees collected under section 3A of
chapter 23 of the General Laws and civil fines issued under section
197B of chapter 111 of the General Laws, section 46R of chapter 140
of the General Laws and section 6F½ of chapter 149 of the General
Laws ................................................................................................................. $451,076
7003-0152 For the operation of the division of apprenticeship standards ......................... $350,000
Department of Labor Relations.
7003-0900 For the operation of the department of labor relations .................................. $3,699,131
Department of Career Services.
7003-0902 For the operation of the Joint Labor Management Committee for
Municipal Police and Fire ................................................................................. $350,000
7002-0012 For a youth-at-risk program targeting high-risk areas; provided, that
these funds may be expended for the development and
implementation of a year-round employment program for youth-at-risk
and existing year-round employment programs, including programs
that serve youth who are not more than 25 years of age, including
lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning youth,
youth of color, youth of all abilities, national origins and religions and
low-income youth, including single income households, youth who are
experiencing housing insecurity and other youth determined to be
eligible by the Commonwealth Corporation; and provided further, that
funds shall be available for expenditure through September 1, 2026,
prior appropriation continued ...................................................................... $15,240,000
120

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Gaming Economic Development Fund ..................... 100%
7003-0606 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts
Manufacturing Extension Partnership, Inc. to maintain and promote
manufacturing as an integral part of the economy, and for programs
designed to assist small and mid-sized manufacturing companies ............. $2,000,000
7003-0607 For the Commonwealth Corporation for an employment training
program for unemployed young adults with disabilities; provided, that
funds shall be awarded competitively by the Commonwealth
Corporation to community-based organizations with recognized
success in creating strong collaborations with employers to consider
young adults with disabilities; and provided further, that a community-
based organization that receives funding under this item shall provide
extensive training and internship programming and ongoing post-
placement support for participants and employers ..................................... $1,000,000
7003-0608 For the 1199SEIU Training and Upgrading Fund to deliver innovative
worker training for eligible health care workers that will better the lives
of health care workers, reduce costs and improve the quality of health
care provided by MassHealth personal care attendants and provided at
nursing homes, community health centers, hospitals and health
systems ......................................................................................................... $1,000,000
7003-0800 For the operation of the MassHire department of career services;
provided, that funds may be expended for the MassHire Workforce
System .......................................................................................................... $2,135,327
7003-0803 For the operation of the MassHire career centers, including workforce
development services for priority populations and emergency
assistance shelter clients; provided, that the career centers, in
coordination with the executive office of labor and workforce
development, shall establish parameters for regular data reporting ............ $8,253,620
7003-1206 For the Massachusetts Service Alliance, Inc., to administer state
service corps grants and provide training and support to volunteer
and service organizations ............................................................................. $1,386,000
7003-1207 For the operation of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO Workforce
Development Programs, Inc. to provide dislocated worker assistance,
layoff aversion and job training with a focus on pathways to quality
careers through traditional and non-traditional apprenticeship and
pre-apprenticeship training ............................................................................... $150,000
Department of Industrial Accidents.
7003-0500 For the operation and administrative expenses of the department of
industrial accidents; provided, that not later than January 30, 2026, the
department shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing the scope, objective and results of grant
recipients’ safety training program; and provided further, that the
General Fund shall be reimbursed the amount appropriated in this
item and for associated indirect and direct fringe benefit costs from
assessments levied under section 65 of chapter 152 of the General
Laws ........................................................................................................... $23,555,618
121

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
7004-0001 For the operation of the commission on Indian affairs ..................................... $155,964
7004-0099 For the operation of the executive office of housing and livable
communities; provided, that the executive office may make
expenditures against federal grants for certain direct and indirect costs
under a cost overhead allocation plan approved by the comptroller;
provided further, that the comptroller shall maintain an account on the
state accounting and reporting system to make these expenditures;
provided further, that expenditures made against the account shall not
be subject to appropriation and may include the cost of personnel;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the executive office may conduct annual verifications of
household income levels based upon state tax returns to administer
the state and federal housing subsidy programs funded by items
7004-0108, 7004-9005, 7004-9024, 7004-9030, 7004-9033 and
7004-9316 of this section and items 7004-9009, 7004-9014, and 7004-
9019 of section 2D; provided further, that as a condition of eligibility or
continued occupancy by an applicant or tenant, the executive office
may require disclosure of the social security numbers of the applicant
or tenant and members of the applicant’s or tenant’s household solely
for use in verification of income eligibility; provided further, that the
executive office may deny or terminate participation in subsidy
programs for failure by an applicant or tenant to provide a social
security number for use in verification of income eligibility; provided
further, that the executive office may consult with the department of
revenue, the department of transitional assistance or any other state
or federal agency to conduct said income verification; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, these
state agencies shall consult and cooperate with the executive office
and furnish any information in the possession of the agencies including,
but not limited to, tax returns and applications for public assistance or
financial aid; provided further, that in conducting income verifications,
the executive office may enter into an interdepartmental service
agreement with the department of revenue to utilize the department of
revenue’s wage reporting and bank match system to verify the income
and eligibility of participants in federally-assisted housing programs
and that of members of the participants’ households; provided further,
that notwithstanding section 12 of chapter 490 of the acts of 1980, the
executive office may authorize neighborhood housing services
corporations to retain, reassign and reloan funds received in
repayment of loans made under the neighborhood housing services
rehabilitation program; provided further, that not later than September
16, 2025, the executive office shall promulgate and uniformly enforce
regulations clarifying that a household that otherwise qualifies for any
preference or priority for state-subsidized housing based on homeless
or at-risk status shall retain that preference or priority notwithstanding
receipt of assistance that is intended to be temporary including, but
not limited to, any temporary or bridge subsidies provided with state
or federal funds, which shall include households receiving assistance
under item said 7004-0108 after July 1, 2013; provided further, that
the executive office shall operate local offices in the 10 cities and
towns in which the executive office maintained office locations as of
January 1, 2025 in order to continue to accept in-person applications
122

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
and provide other services related to the emergency assistance
housing program funded by item 7004-0101; provided further, that the
offices shall have sufficient staffing to determine eligibility promptly
and provide other program services to families; provided further, that
the executive office may operate additional local offices in other
municipalities that are geographically convenient to those families who
are experiencing homelessness or are at risk of homelessness;
provided further, that not later than September 2, 2025, the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, for each local
office: (i) the municipality in which each office is located; (ii) the ways
in which applicants can submit applications and connect with staff,
including, if available, in-person, by telephone and online; (iii) the daily
business hours of in-person and telephonic operation of each office;
(iv) the number of full-time equivalent staff assigned to each office; (v)
the average wait time for direct communication with a staff member
whether in-person or by telephone; and (vi) any steps the executive
office plans to take to increase accessibility to intake services related
to emergency assistance housing programs across the
commonwealth; provided further, that at least annually, the executive
office shall conduct staff trainings that shall include, but not be limited
to, notice of changes in laws related to items of appropriation under
the administration of the executive office; provided further, that the
executive office shall provide the caseload forecasting office with
enrollment data and any other information pertinent to caseload
forecasting that is requested by the office on a monthly basis; and
provided further, that such information shall be provided in a manner
that meets all applicable federal and state privacy and security
requirements ................................................................................................. $15,573,388
7004-0100 For the operations of the homeless shelter and services unit, including
the compensation of caseworkers and support personnel; provided,
that the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
take steps to extend intake hours for families seeking assistance from
item 7004-0101 ........................................................................................... $18,432,568
7004-0101 For certain expenses of the emergency housing assistance program
under section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, including
homelessness prevention, diversion and strategic rehousing and
contracted family shelters; provided, that eligibility shall be limited to
families with incomes at or below 115 per cent of the 2025 or a later-
issued higher federal poverty level; provided further, that any family
whose income exceeds 200 per cent of the federal poverty level for a
sustained and consecutive period of 120 days while the family is
receiving assistance funded by this item shall become ineligible for
assistance; provided further, that families who are eligible for
assistance through a temporary emergency family shelter shall
include families who: (i) are at risk of domestic abuse in their current
housing situation or are homeless because they fled domestic
violence and have not had access to safe, permanent housing since
leaving the housing situation that they fled; (ii) through no fault of their
own, are homeless due to fire, flood or natural disaster; (iii) through no
fault of their own, have been subject to eviction from their most recent
housing due to: (A) foreclosure; (B) condemnation; (C) conduct by a
guest or former household member who is not part of the household
seeking emergency shelter and over whose conduct the remaining
123

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
household members had no control; or (D) nonpayment of rent caused
by a documented medical condition or diagnosed disability or caused
by a documented loss of income within the last 12 months directly as
a result of a change in household composition or a loss of income
source through no fault of the family; or (iv) are in a housing situation
where they are not the primary leaseholder or are in a housing situation
not meant for human habitation and where there is a substantial health
and safety risk to the family that is likely to result in significant harm
should the family remain in the housing situation; provided further, that
benefits under this item shall only be provided to families consisting
entirely of residents of the commonwealth who are citizens of the
United States or persons lawfully admitted for permanent residence or
otherwise permanently residing under the color of law in the United
States, except in cases where a child in the family is a citizen of the
United States, a person lawfully admitted for permanent residence or
a person permanently residing under color of law in the United States;
provided further, that temporary emergency assistance shall be
provided to families who, on the date of application for emergency
assistance, have no other feasible alternative housing as defined
under 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b), whether in the commonwealth or
elsewhere, and who, but for not having spent 1 night in a public or
private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping
accommodation for human beings including, but not limited to, a car,
park, abandoned building, medical facility, bus or train station, airport
or campground would be eligible for emergency assistance under
clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive; provided further, that the executive office
of housing and livable communities shall submit quarterly reports,
broken down by month, to the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing expenditures under the preceding proviso,
including: (1) the number of families who received emergency
assistance under the preceding proviso; (2) the number of families
entering the emergency assistance system after having already
stayed in a place not meant for human habitation; (3) the number of
families entering the emergency assistance system having stayed in
a place not meant for human habitation after having requested
services provided for in this item within the preceding 6 months and
within the preceding week; (4) the number of families described under
clause (3) who received a written denial of their request for services
prior to staying in a place not meant for human habitation and the
number who neither entered the emergency shelter system nor
received a written denial on the day of their request; and (5) available
data on the race and ethnicity of the families described under clauses
(1) to (4), inclusive; provided further, that nothing contained in this item
shall require that emergency assistance be provided to a family that,
on the date of application for emergency assistance, has other
feasible housing as defined under said 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b), whether
in the commonwealth or elsewhere, and that said housing adequately
accommodates the size and disabilities of the family; provided further,
that not less than annually, the executive office shall provide training
to relevant staff to ensure compliance with legal requirements related
to eligibility for the emergency housing assistance program, including
eligibility based on a family having no other feasible alternative
housing as defined under said 760 CMR 67.06(1)(b); provided further,
that the executive office shall collaborate with the executive office of
health and human services, the Massachusetts interagency council on
housing and homelessness and family homelessness service
124

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
providers on strategies and best practices for the prevention of family
homelessness; provided further, that the health and safety risk shall
be determined by the department of children and families or a
department-approved entity through risk assessments; provided
further, that a family who receives emergency housing assistance due
to domestic abuse shall be connected to the appropriate social service
agency; provided further, that temporary assistance under this item
shall be terminated upon the offer of available housing or other
assistance sufficient to maintain or stabilize housing; provided further,
that a family may not decline an offer for available housing if the offer
adequately accommodates the size and disabilities of the family and
the new housing placement would not result in a job loss for the client;
provided further, that any family who declines an adequate offer of
available housing or other assistance sufficient to maintain or stabilize
housing shall become ineligible for assistance from this item; provided
further, that families receiving benefits under this item shall have 30
per cent of their income set aside in a savings account, subject to
reasonable exceptions as set forth under executive office regulations
in effect in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that the amount saved
shall be exempt from otherwise applicable asset limits; provided
further, that the family may withdraw the amount placed in savings
upon transition to permanent housing or losing eligibility for shelter
services; provided further, that families receiving emergency
assistance shall receive housing search assistance that attempts to
facilitate a sustainable housing placement within 4 weeks of entry into
the emergency assistance shelter, motel or hotel; provided further,
that families receiving assistance for longer than 32 weeks shall have
an executable shelter exit plan that facilitates a housing placement in
a new sustainable tenancy or a safe residence including, but not
limited to, a placement for which the family is not the primary
leaseholder, as soon as possible; provided further, that funds may be
advanced to contracted service providers to cover 1-time upfront
costs needed to operate shelters; provided further, that as part of
executive office efforts to prevent abuse of the emergency assistance
program, the executive office shall enter into a wage match agreement
with the department of revenue; provided further, that eligibility for
shelter by an otherwise eligible family shall not be impaired by prior
receipt of any nonshelter benefit; provided further, that an eligible
household that is approved for shelter placement shall be placed in a
shelter as close as possible to the household’s home community,
unless a household requests otherwise; provided further, that if the
closest available placement is not within 20 miles of the household’s
home community, the executive office shall, to the extent practicable,
make best efforts to transfer the household to an appropriate shelter
within 20 miles of its home community at the earliest possible date,
unless the household requests otherwise; provided further, that the
executive office shall notify local school departments of the placement
of a family in its district within 5 days of placement; provided further,
that the executive office shall make every effort to ensure that children
receiving services from this item shall continue attending school in the
community in which they lived before receiving services funded from
this item; provided further, that the executive office shall use its best
efforts to ensure that a family placed by the emergency housing
assistance program shall be provided with access to refrigeration and
basic cooking facilities; provided further, that if a family with a child
under the age of 3 is placed in a hotel or motel, the executive office
125

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
shall ensure that the hotel or motel provides a crib that meets all state
and federal safety codes for each child under the age of 3; provided
further, that the executive office shall verify, through third-party
verification or otherwise, prior to placement in an emergency shelter,
for each emergency housing assistance applicant, their: (A) identity;
(B) Massachusetts residency; (C) relationship status; (D) pregnancy
status; and (E) other eligibility requirements in this item and pursuant
to 760 CMR 67.00 or any successor regulations; provided, however,
that the executive office shall not be required to provide shelter to
families who are unable to provide required verifications pursuant to
the previous proviso prior to placement; provided, further, that the
executive office may offer a case-specific waiver for exigent
circumstances and at the discretion of the executive office pursuant to
regulations promulgated by the executive office including case-
specific waivers for: (i) an imminent threat of domestic violence; (ii)
families with a family member who has a documented disability; (iii) a
qualified veteran under clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 of
the General Laws who is not enrolled in services specifically tailored
to veterans including, but not limited to, those administered by the
executive office of veterans services; and (iv) families with a family
member who has a high-risk pregnancy or who has recently given
birth; provided further, that the executive office shall require each
applicant for emergency housing assistance program benefits to
establish residency in the commonwealth; provided, however, that an
applicant shall be required to show an intent to remain in in the
commonwealth, which may be shown through sources of verification
accepted by the executive office pursuant to regulations, including
documentation showing a person receives MassHealth,
documentation showing a person receives public benefits in the
commonwealth, a bill or other insurance documentation with an
address, email, letter or statement from a licensed health care worker
on office letterhead or office email stating that the person lives in the
commonwealth or a photo identification issued by the commonwealth;
provided further, that families receiving shelter benefits who are found
ineligible for continuing shelter benefits shall be eligible for aid pending
a timely appeal under said chapter 23B; provided further, that this item
shall be subject to appropriation and in the event of a deficiency,
nothing in this item shall give rise to or shall be construed as giving
rise to any enforceable right or entitlement to services in excess of the
amounts appropriated in this item; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not less
than 90 days before promulgating or amending any regulations,
administrative practices or policies that would alter eligibility for or the
level of benefits under this program, other than that which would benefit
the clients, the executive office shall submit a report to the joint
committee on children, families and persons with disabilities, the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of
the house of representatives and the senate setting forth justification
for such changes including, but not limited to, any determination by
the secretary of housing and livable communities that available
appropriations will be insufficient to meet projected expenses and the
projected savings from any proposed changes; provided further, that
no funds from this item shall be expended for personnel or
administrative costs; provided further, that the executive office shall
submit quarterly reports, broken down by month, to the house and
senate committees on ways and means detailing emergency
126

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
assistance system capacity; provided further, that the executive office
shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on
ways and means, broken down by month, with the most recently
available monthly data, including data on the race and ethnicity of all
families where available and applicable expressed as a percentage of
the total, on: (A) applications for services provided for in this item and
in item 7004-0108 and requests for services under this item and item
7008-0108, with a request for services defined as any point at which
the household seeking services provides information to the executive
office as part of any enrollment, triage, or eligibility determination,
regardless of whether a formal application is completed and
regardless of whether the contact is by telephone, by office visit, or by
other means; (B) front-door entries into the emergency assistance
system; (C) applications and requests for services provided for in this
item and in said item 7004-0108 that are denied and the bases of all
such denials expressed as a percentage of the total; (D) applications
and requests for services provided for in this item and in said item
7004-0108 that do not result in a formal denial, a front-door entry into
the emergency assistance system or verified diversion as a result of
HomeBASE household assistance expressed as a percentage of the
total; (E) the number of households submitting multiple applications or
making multiple requests for services within the previous 1-month
period and the previous 6-month period; (F) diversions as a result of
HomeBASE household assistance; (G) exits from the emergency
assistance system, delineated by reason for exit, including at-fault
terminations, exits because the household is no longer income
eligible, exits through HomeBASE household assistance with no other
subsidy and exits to affordable, subsidized or otherwise assisted
housing; (H) the number of applications and requests that do not result
in the household entering emergency assistance shelter within 48
hours and for which such non-entry is attributable to each of the
following: written denial, pending documentation or verifications, no
imminent homelessness or household withdrawal of the application; (I)
the average, minimum and maximum cost per family of emergency
assistance under this item; (J) the number of families served under
this item who required further assistance under this item or under said
item 7004-0108 at a later date; (K) the type of assistance later required
and provided; (L) the total number of families receiving assistance
under item 7004-0101 that have received assistance under this item or
said item 7004-0108 during each of the previous 1, 2 and 3 years; (M)
the number of children served under this item broken down by age; (N)
the number of applications and requests from households that
became homeless within 12 months of depleting their HomeBASE
household assistance under said item 7004-0108; (O) the reasons for
homelessness in the applications and requests received under clause
(N) and the number of applications and requests received under said
clause (N) that are denied; and (P) the average and maximum length
of stay for families currently staying in an emergency assistance
shelter placement; provided further, that said quarterly reports shall
also include the following information from the department of children
and families: (I) the number of families assessed for a health and
safety risk in the previous quarter; (II) the number of families
determined to be at a substantial health and safety risk; (III) the
number of families receiving multiple health and safety assessments
within the previous 6-month period; and (IV) the standards used to
determine a substantial health and safety risk; provided further, that
127

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
said quarterly reports shall also include: (i) the number of families that
applied for a transfer from their current shelter placement to a unit that
can accommodate their disability-related needs, delineated by reason
for the application; (ii) the number of families whose applications for
reasonable accommodation have been approved but that are waiting
for transfer due to lack of available units able to accommodate their
disability-related needs, delineated by category of accommodation
including, but not limited to, access to cooking facilities, first-floor or
elevator access, non-carpeted unit, physical modification to unit,
scattered site unit, geographic proximity to service providers and
wheelchair accessibility; (iii) the number of families currently in shelter
units located more than 20 miles away from their home community;
(iv) the number of families with at least 1 child who attends a school
other than the child’s school of origin as a result of placement in a
shelter unit outside of their home community; (v) both the average and
maximum number of days that families spend in placements under the
circumstances described in clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, prior to being
transferred to a shelter unit for which none of the circumstances in
said clauses (ii) to (iv), inclusive, apply; (vi) the percentage of
applications for a transfer that were approved; and (vii) the average
number of days and the maximum number of days between the
application submission and the approval; provided further, that funds
shall be expended on shelter units suitable to meet the needs of
households with disabilities requiring reasonable accommodation;
and provided further, that funds shall be expended for expenses
incurred as a result of families being housed in hotels due to the
unavailability of contracted shelter beds ................................................... $275,271,903
7004-0102 For the homelessness program to assist individuals who are homeless
or in danger of becoming homeless, including assistance to
organizations that provide shelter, transitional housing and services
that help individuals avoid entry into shelters or successfully exit
shelters; provided, that no organization providing services to the
homeless shall receive less than an average per bed, per night rate of
$25; provided further, that no funds shall be expended for costs
associated with the homeless management information system;
provided further, that the executive office shall submit quarterly reports
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
contracts awarded to service providers; provided further, that the
reports shall include, but not be limited to: (i) each contracted service
provider; (ii) the amount of the contracts; (iii) a description of the
services to be provided; (iv) the length of said contract; and (v) the
date upon which each contract was executed; provided further, that
not less than $95,000,000 appropriated in this item shall be allocated
to contracted service providers of homeless individuals in fiscal year
2020; and provided further, that programs currently providing shelter
may renegotiate how to use said program's shelter fund, with the
agreement of the executive office and the host municipality, to provide
alternative services proven to be effective, including housing first
models, transitional housing and diversion away from shelters ................ $115,752,398
7004-0104 For the home and healthy for good program operated by the
Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. to reduce the
incidence of chronic and long-term homelessness in the
commonwealth; provided, that not less than $250,000 shall be
expended to continue a supportive housing initiative for
128

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
unaccompanied homeless young adults who identify as lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer or questioning; provided further, that the
Massachusetts Housing and Shelter Alliance, Inc. shall be solely
responsible for the administration of this program; and provided
further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the Massachusetts Housing
and Shelter Alliance, Inc. shall submit a report to the executive office
of housing and livable communities, the joint committee on housing,
the house and senate committees on ways and means and the clerks
of the house of representatives and the senate, detailing: (i) the
number of people served, including available demographic
information; (ii) the average cost per participant; (iii) whether
participants have previously received services from the executive
office; and (iv) any projected cost-savings to the commonwealth
associated with this program ........................................................................ $8,390,000
7004-0105 For permanent supportive housing units to house individuals
experiencing homelessness and mitigate overcrowding in homeless
shelters; provided, that not less than $2,100,000 may be expended to
sustain low-threshold sponsor-based leasing that had been previously
linked to the pay-for-success projects funded through the Social
Innovation Financing Trust Fund established under section 35VV of
chapter 10 of the General Laws; provided further, that the executive
office of housing and livable communities shall prioritize geographic
equity when expending funds from this item; provided further, that the
executive office may contract directly with the organizations that
received Social Innovation Financing vouchers funded under item
7004-9024 in fiscal year 2022; and provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the distribution
methodology and locations of units supported by this item ........................ $11,922,875
7004-0106 For the continued implementation and evaluation of the homeless
family preference in private multi-family housing program established
by New Lease for Homeless Families, Inc. ..................................................... $250,000
7004-0107 For the administration of local housing programs ........................................... $100,000
7004-0108 For a program of short-term housing assistance to help families eligible
for temporary emergency shelter under item 7004-0101 in addressing
obstacles to maintaining or securing housing; provided, that the
assistance shall include not less than 12 months of housing
stabilization and economic self-sufficiency case management services
for each family receiving benefits under this item; provided further, that
a family shall not receive more than $30,000 in a 24-month period from
this item; provided further, the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall provide household assistance in an amount up to
$15,000, or a higher cap established in item 7004-0108, for a
subsequent 12-month period to eligible families; provided further, that
not more than $2,500,000 shall be made available to administering
agencies for circumstances in which the administering agency
believes an award greater than $30,000 in a 24-month period is
essential to resolve a housing crisis, in accordance with guidance from
the executive office of housing and livable communities; provided
further, that so long as a family meets the requirements of its housing
stabilization plan, a family that received household assistance under
this item whose income increases shall not become ineligible for
129

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
assistance due to exceeding the income limit for the first 12 months
from the date their income initially increased; provided further, that a
family shall not be deemed ineligible as a result of any single violation
of a self-sufficiency plan; provided further, that the executive office of
housing and livable communities shall take all steps necessary to
enforce regulations to prevent abuse in the short-term housing
transition program, including a wage match agreement with the
department of revenue; provided further, that a family that was
terminated from the program or did not make a good faith effort to
follow its housing stabilization plan during the term of its assistance
shall be ineligible for benefits under said item 7004-0101 and this item
for 12 months from the last date the family received financial
assistance under said item 7004-0101 and this item; provided further,
that a family’s housing stabilization plan shall adequately
accommodate the ages and disabilities of the family members;
provided further, that families receiving benefits under this program
who are found ineligible for continuing benefits shall be eligible for aid
pending a timely appeal under chapter 23B of the General Laws;
provided further, that families who are denied assistance under this
item may appeal that denial under said chapter 23B, including
subsection (F) of section 30 of said chapter 23B and regulations
adopted to implement said chapter 23B; provided further, that the
executive office, as a condition of continued eligibility for assistance
under this program, may require disclosure of social security numbers
by all members of a family receiving assistance under this item for use
in verification of income with other agencies, departments and
executive offices; provided further, that if a family member fails to
provide a social security number for use in verifying the family's
income and eligibility, then the family shall no longer be eligible to
receive benefits from this program; provided further, that the executive
office shall administer this program through the following agencies,
unless administering agencies are otherwise procured by the
executive office: Hearthway, Inc; Central Massachusetts Housing
Alliance, Inc.; Community Teamwork Inc.; the Housing Assistance
Corporation; the Franklin County regional housing and redevelopment
authority; Way Finders, Inc.; Metro Housing Boston; the Lynn housing
authority and neighborhood development; the South Middlesex
Opportunity Council, Inc.; NeighborWorks Soma Realty, Inc. housing
solutions; and RCAP Solutions, Inc.; provided further, that the
executive office shall reallocate funding based on performance-based
statistics from underperforming service providers to above average
service providers in order to move as many families from hotels,
motels or shelters into more sustainable housing; provided further,
that the executive office shall use funds provided under this program
for stabilization workers to focus efforts on housing retention and to
link households to supports, including job training, education, job
search and child care opportunities available, and may enter into
agreements with other public and private agencies for the provision of
such services; provided further, that a stabilization worker shall be
assigned to each household; provided further, that funds shall be used
to more rapidly transition families served by the program into
temporary or permanent sustainable housing; provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not less
than 90 days before promulgating or amending any regulation,
administrative practice or policy that would alter eligibility for or the level
of benefits under this program to less than the benefit level available
130

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
on June 30, 2025, the executive office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the clerks of
the house of representatives and the senate setting forth the
justification for such changes including, but not limited to, any
determination by the secretary of housing and livable communities
that available appropriations will be insufficient to meet projected
expenses; provided further, that the executive office shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, which shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
families served, including available demographic information, as well
as the number of children served under this item broken down by age;
(ii) type of assistance given; (iii) average, minimum and maximum cost
per family of said assistance; (iv) total number of families receiving
benefits under said item 7004-0101 that have received assistance
under said item 7004-0108 during the previous 1, 2 and 3 years,
including available demographic information; (v) the amount of shelter
exits created by this line item; and (vi) the amount of families diverted
from emergency assistance shelters; provided further, that the
executive office shall expend funds under said item 7004-0108 on
families residing in temporary emergency shelters and family
residential treatment or sober living programs under item 4512-0200
if said families otherwise meet all eligibility requirements applicable to
emergency shelter under said item 7004-0101, except that, solely for
the purposes of this item, the fact that a family is in a family residential
treatment or sober living program under said item 4512-0200 shall not
preclude said family from receiving assistance; provided further, that
this item shall be subject to appropriation and, in the event of a
deficiency, nothing in this item shall give rise to, or shall be construed
as giving rise to, any enforceable right or entitlement to services in
excess of the amounts appropriated in this item; provided further, the
executive office of housing and livable communities shall submit
quarterly reports to the house and senate committees on ways and
means, which shall include, but not be limited to, efforts made to work
in collaboration with the office for refugees and immigrants and
resettlement agencies; and provided further, that household
assistance funds shall be advanced to the administering agencies at
the end of each month and before the next month's disbursement, the
amount of which shall be estimated based on the prior month’s
expenditure with a reconciliation not less than annually ............................. $57,322,002
7004-0109 For the shelter workforce development initiative, to provide pathways
to careers in fields related to housing and homelessness; provided,
that funds shall be expended to address barriers to obtaining and
sustaining shelter employment including, but not limited to,
transportation, loan repayment, tuition or certification fee
reimbursement and child care; provided further, that, not less than
$5,000,000 be made available to shelters contracted through item
7004-0101; provided further, that not less than $5,000,000 be made
available to shelters contracted through item 7004-0102; and provided
further, that the secretary of housing and livable communities shall
submit a report to the joint committee on housing and the house and
senate committees on ways and means not later than March 3, 2026,
detailing the expenditures and hiring outcomes of the program ............ $10,000,000
7004-0202 For the rapid transition of homeless individuals into sustainable
permanent housing; provided, that programs under this item shall be
131

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
administered by direct service providers contracted under item 7004-
0102; provided further, that these programs may include, but shall not
be limited to, vocational training, temporary assistance and permanent
supportive housing; and provided further, that not later than February
3, 2026, the executive office of housing and livable communities shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the: (i) total number of people served; (ii) total number of
people transitioned into permanent housing; (iii) types of programs
implemented; (iv) vocational training programs, delineated by job type;
(v) number of people participating in said training programs; (vi) the
number of people who transitioned from said training programs into full
time employment; (vii) the number of people exiting the shelter system
as a result of full time employment; and (viii) the number of people
diverted from the shelter system ................................................................. $5,000,000
7004-3036 For housing services and counseling; provided, that funds shall be
expended as grants to 9 regional housing consumer education centers
operated by the regional nonprofit housing authorities; provided
further, that the grants shall be awarded through a competitive
application process under criteria established by the executive office
of housing and livable communities; provided further, that the
executive office shall submit annual reports to the secretary of
administration and finance, the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the joint committee on housing detailing all
expenditures of the program, including each regional housing
consumer education center, the total number of persons who received
information and referral services, the costs for such services rendered
per consumer and the identification of consumer issues and trends;
provided further, that not later than January 4, 2026, the executive
office shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on possible savings and efficiencies that may be
realized through the consolidation of said services; and provided
further, that not less than $200,000 shall be made available to the
Regional Housing Network of Massachusetts, Inc. for coordination
and information technology .......................................................................... $5,200,000
7004-4314 For the expenses of a service coordinators program established by
the executive office of housing and livable communities to assist
tenants residing in housing developed under sections 39 and 40 of
chapter 121B of the General Laws ............................................................... $6,500,000
7004-9005 For subsidies to housing authorities and nonprofit organizations,
including funds for deficiencies caused by certain reduced rentals in
housing for the elderly, handicapped, veterans, families and relocated
persons under sections 32 and 40 of chapter 121B of the General
Laws; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, all housing authorities operating elderly public housing shall
offer first preference for elderly public housing units that are vacant on
the effective date of this act, and thereafter, to those persons 60 years
of age or older as of June 30, 2025 receiving rental assistance from
the Massachusetts rental voucher program; provided further, that the
executive office of housing and livable communities may expend funds
appropriated under this item for deficiencies caused by certain
reduced rentals that may be anticipated in the operation of housing
authorities for the first quarter of the subsequent fiscal year; provided
further, that no funds shall be expended from this item to reimburse
132

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
the debt service reserve included in the budgets of housing
authorities; provided further, that no funds shall be expended from this
item in the AA object class for the compensation of state employees;
provided further, that the amount appropriated in this item shall be
considered to meet all obligations under said sections 32 and 40 of said
chapter 121B; provided further, that new reduced rental units
developed in fiscal year 2026 eligible for subsidies under this item
shall not cause any annualization that results in an amount exceeding
the amount appropriated in this item; provided further, that all funds in
excess of normal utilities, operations and maintenance costs may be
expended for capital repairs; and provided further, that the
administration shall make every attempt to direct efforts toward
rehabilitating housing authority family units requiring $10,000 or less
in repairs ................................................................................................... $115,500,000
General Fund ......................................................... 86.62%
Local Projects Fund..................................................... 13.38%
7004-9007 For costs associated with the implementation of the duties of the
executive office of housing and livable communities under chapter 235
of the acts of 2014; provided, that in conjunction with said duties, funds
may be expended on the creation and implementation of an
information technology platform for state-aided public housing to be
administered by the executive office; and provided further, that the
executive office, in making changes to said information technology
platform, shall collaborate and coordinate with housing authorities to
ensure equitable and effective systems ...................................................... $1,312,500
7004-9024 For the Massachusetts rental voucher program to provide rental
assistance for low-income families and elderly persons through mobile
and project-based vouchers; provided, that the income of eligible
households shall not exceed 80 per cent of the area median income;
provided further, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities may require that not less than 75 per cent of newly
issued vouchers be targeted to households whose income at initial
occupancy does not exceed 30 per cent of the area median income;
provided further, that the executive office may award mobile vouchers
to eligible households currently occupying project-based units that
shall expire due to the non-renewal of project-based rental assistance
contracts; provided further, that the executive office, as a condition
of continued eligibility for vouchers and voucher payments, may
require disclosure of social security numbers by participants and
members of a participant’s household in the Massachusetts rental
voucher program for use in verification of income with other agencies,
departments and executive offices; provided further, that if a
participant or member of a participant’s household fails to provide a
social security number for use in verifying the household’s income and
eligibility, then that household shall no longer be eligible for a voucher
or to receive benefits from the voucher program; provided further, that
until the implementation of a payment standard by the executive office
for all voucher holders, each household shall pay not less than 30 per
cent of its monthly adjusted income but not more than 40 per cent of
its monthly adjusted income for rent at initial occupancy; provided
further, that until the implementation of such payment standard, the
monthly dollar amount of each voucher shall be the executive office-
approved monthly rent of the unit less the monthly amount paid for rent
133

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
by the household; provided further, that any household that is proven
to have caused intentional damage to its rental unit in an amount
exceeding 2 months of rent during any 1-year period shall be
terminated from the program; provided further, that if the use of a
mobile voucher is or has been discontinued, then the mobile voucher
shall be reassigned; provided further, that the executive office shall
pay regional administering agencies not less than $50 per voucher per
month for the costs of administering the program; provided further, that
subsidies shall not be reduced due to the cost of inspections; provided
further, that the executive office shall provide assistance using a
payment standard so that the required household payment for a
household choosing a unit with gross rent less than or equal to the
payment standard shall be not more than 30 per cent of the
household’s monthly adjusted income, with gross rent defined as the
contract rent plus an amount allowed by the executive office for tenant-
paid utilities; provided further, that the payment standard shall be set,
at the discretion of the executive office, at either 110 per cent of the
current area-wide fair market rent or 110 per cent of the current small
area fair market rent, both as established by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development for the same size of
dwelling unit in the same region, except as necessary as a reasonable
accommodation for a household member with a disability or as
otherwise directed by the executive office, except that a reduction by
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development in
such fair market rental shall not reduce the payment standard applied
to a household continuing to reside in a unit without a change in
voucher size for which the household was receiving assistance at the
time the fair market rent or small area fair market rent was reduced;
provided further, that if the gross rent for the unit does not exceed the
applicable payment standard, the monthly assistance payment for the
household for both project-based and tenant-based assistance shall
be equal to the gross rent less the required household payment, except
that the required household payment in any project-based unit that is
subsidized under another federal or state subsidy or public housing
program shall be subject to applicable limits on tenant-paid rent under
such federal or state program; provided further, that for a household
receiving tenant-based assistance under this section, if the household
chooses a unit with a gross rent that exceeds the applicable payment
standard, the monthly assistance payment for the household shall be
limited to the amount by which the applicable payment standard
exceeds 30 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the household;
provided further, that even if a household with tenant-based
assistance chooses a unit with gross rent exceeding the
payment standard, at the time the household initially receives tenant-
based assistance with respect to any dwelling, the total amount that
the household may be required to pay for gross rent, including the
amount by which the gross rent exceeds the payment standard, shall
not exceed 40 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the
household at the time the household initially receives tenant-based
assistance with respect to any dwelling; provided further, that
households receiving tenant-based assistance under this section may
pay more than 40 per cent of the monthly adjusted income of the
household, at their option; provided further, that the executive office
shall establish the amounts of the mobile and project-based vouchers
so that the appropriation in this item shall not be exceeded by
payments for rental assistance and administration; provided further,
134

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
that the executive office shall not enter into commitments that shall
cause it to exceed the appropriation set forth in this item; provided
further, that participating local housing authorities may take all steps
necessary to enable them to transfer mobile voucher program
participants from the Massachusetts rental voucher program into
another housing subsidy program; provided further, that the executive
office’s approved monthly rent limits for mobile vouchers issued or
leased on or after July 1, 2025 shall be equal to 110 per cent of the
area-wide or small area fair market rent, except as necessary as a
reasonable accommodation for a household member with a disability,
as determined by the executive office, based on unit size as
established annually by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development; provided further, that the requested rent level for
mobile vouchers shall be determined reasonable by the administering
agency; provided further, that for mobile vouchers currently leased, the
new rent limit shall not begin until the anniversary date of the lease;
provided further, that the executive office may assist housing
authorities at their written request, in the immediate implementation of
a homeless prevention program utilizing alternative housing resources
available to them for low-income families and the elderly by
designating participants in the Massachusetts rental voucher program
as at risk of displacement by public action through no fault of their own;
provided further, that not later than December 2, 2025, the executive
office of housing and livable communities shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on housing on the utilization of rental vouchers during the
last 3 fiscal years under this item and item 7004-9030; provided further,
that the report shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number and
average value of rental vouchers currently distributed in the
commonwealth in each county and in each municipality; (ii) average
number of days that it takes for a household to utilize a voucher after
receiving it from the administering agency; (iii) number of households
that reach the date by which they must lease up their voucher without
having found an available unit; (iv) number of households that apply
for an extension by the deadline to lease up their voucher and the
number of extensions granted; (v) actions taken by the executive
office to reduce the wait time for households to lease up their voucher;
(vi) number of distributed vouchers available to be utilized; (vii)
number and type of new vouchers issued after July 1, 2025, including
the costs associated with each type of new voucher; (viii) number of
families on a waitlist for an available rental voucher; (ix) average
number of days that it takes for project-based vouchers awarded by
the executive office to be utilized after the award is made; (x) number
of new project based vouchers delineated by project, including the: (A)
type of housing; and (B) number of affordable units including area
median income levels and total rental cost to the household; and (xi)
obstacles faced by the department in its efforts to provide the
information detailed in the preceding provisos, if applicable; provided
further, that the report shall comply with state and federal privacy
standards; and provided further, that the executive office may expend
funds from this item for costs related to the completion of the voucher
management system, prior appropriation continued ................................ $258,111,840
7004-9030 For the rental assistance program established in section 16 of chapter
179 of the acts of 1995; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, assistance may be provided in the form of
135

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
either mobile vouchers or project-based vouchers; provided further,
that the vouchers shall be in varying dollar amounts set by the
executive office of housing and livable communities based on
considerations including, but not limited to, household size,
composition, household income and geographic location; provided
further, that the executive office’s approved monthly rent limits for
vouchers newly issued or leased after a date set by the executive office,
but not later than June 30, 2026, shall be set, at the discretion of the
executive office, at either up to 110 per cent of the current area-wide
fair market rent or up to 110 per cent of the current small area fair
market rent, except as necessary as a reasonable accommodation for
a household member with a disability or as otherwise directed by the
executive office, both based on unit size as established annually by
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
the same size of dwelling unit in the same region; provided further,
that the requested rent level for vouchers shall be determined
reasonable by the administering agency; provided further, that for
vouchers currently leased, the new rent limit shall not begin until the
anniversary date of the lease; provided further, that any household
that is proven to have caused intentional damage to its rental unit in
an amount exceeding 2 months of rent during any 1-year period shall
be terminated from the program; provided further, that notwithstanding
any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be no maximum
percentage applicable to the amount of income paid for rent by each
household holding a mobile voucher; provided further, that each
household shall be required to pay not less than 25 per cent of its net
income as defined under regulations promulgated by the executive
office for units if payment of utilities is not provided by the unit owner
or not less than 30 per cent of its income for units if payment of utilities
is provided by the unit owner; provided further, that payments for the
rental assistance program may be provided in advance; provided
further, that the executive office shall establish the amounts of the
mobile vouchers so that the appropriation in this item is not exceeded
by payments for rental assistance and administration; provided
further, that the executive office shall not enter into commitments that
shall cause it to exceed the appropriation set forth in this item; provided
further, that the amount of a rental assistance voucher payment for an
eligible household shall not exceed the rent less the household’s
minimum rent obligation; and provided further, that not later than
December 16, 2025, the executive office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means detailing: (i)
expenditures from this item; (ii) the number of outstanding rental
vouchers; and (iii) the number and types of units leased, prior
appropriation continued .............................................................................. $19,461,214
7004-9033 For rental subsidies to eligible clients of the department of mental
health; provided, that the executive office of housing and livable
communities shall establish the amounts of such subsidies so that
payment of the rental subsidies and of any other commitments from
this item shall not exceed the amount appropriated in this item ................. $16,548,125
7004-9034 For a housing assistance for re-entry transition pilot program;
provided, that the program shall be administered by the executive
office of housing and livable communities in consultation with the
executive office of public safety and security; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for rental subsidies to participants in re-entry
136

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
programs funded under items 8000-0655 and 8900-1100; provided
further, that the executive office of housing and livable communities
shall establish the amount of said subsidies so that executive office
spending does not exceed the amount appropriated; and provided
further, that not later than October 2, 2025, the executive office shall
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
program design and implementation, including the: (i) amount
proposed for said subsidies; (ii) estimated number of individuals who
would qualify for said subsidies, including the methodology for
determining said subsidy amounts; (iii) number of individuals who
qualify for said subsidies, including available demographic
information; (iv) planned distribution of funds; (v) other reentry
services and programs available to said participants; and (vi) amount
of average subsidy in fiscal year 2026 compared to the preceding
two fiscal years, prior appropriation continued ............................................. $3,000,000
7004-9315 For the executive office of housing and livable communities, which
may expend for the administration and monitoring of the low-income
housing tax credit and local administration programs not more than
$3,571,512 from fees collected under these programs; provided, that
funds may be expended for the costs of administering and monitoring
the programs, including the costs of personnel, subject to the approval
of the secretary of housing and livable communities; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies between the
receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the executive
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent
revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ...................... $3,571,512
7004-9316 For a program to provide assistance in addressing obstacles to
maintaining or securing housing for families with a household income:
(i) not more than 30 per cent of area median income who are homeless
and moving into subsidized or private housing or are at risk of
becoming homeless; or (ii) more than 30 per cent but not more than
50 per cent of area median income who are homeless and moving into
subsidized or private housing or are at risk of becoming homeless due
to a significant reduction of income or increased expenses; provided,
that assistance shall be administered by the executive office of
housing and livable communities through contracts with the regional
HomeBASE agencies; provided further, that not less than 50 per cent
of the funds shall be provided to households with an income not more
than 30 per cent of area median income, subject to the executive
office’s discretion based on data reflecting program demand and
usage; provided further, that in distributing 50 per cent of the funds, the
executive office shall prioritize those families most likely to otherwise
require shelter services under item 7004-0101; provided further, that
the amount of financial assistance shall not exceed $7,000 in any 12-
month period; provided further, that residential assistance payments
may be made through direct vendor payments according to standards
to be established by the executive office; provided further, that the
agencies shall establish a system for referring families approved for
residential assistance payments, who the agencies determine would
benefit from these services, to existing community-based programs
that provide additional housing stabilization supports, including
assistance in obtaining housing subsidies and locating alternative
137

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
housing that is safe and affordable for any such families; provided
further, that the program shall be administered under guidelines
established by the executive office; provided further, that income
verification shall be conducted by using: (A) documentation provided
by the household, requiring the same documentation and process
used to conduct income verification under this item in fiscal year 2025
or fewer documents as directed by the executive office; (B) third-party
income verification; or (C) validated receipt of certain MassHealth or
department of transitional assistance benefits demonstrating that the
household earns less than 50 per cent of area median income;
provided further, that the manner in which income verification is
conducted shall be at the discretion of the executive office but that the
executive office shall not discontinue the use of said options for
income verification listed in the preceding proviso; provided further,
that the executive office shall allow a short, simple application
requiring minimal processing time; provided further, that the executive
office shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing the: (1) number of families
who applied for assistance; (2) number of families approved for
assistance; (3) minimum, median and average amount of financial
assistance awarded; (4) total amount of assistance awarded to date,
including a breakdown by income category; and (5) number of families
falling into each income category; provided further, that the executive
office shall track a family’s reason for assistance by the same
categories used in said item 7004-0101; provided further, that not less
than $3,000,000 shall be expended to provide assistance to
households of all sizes and configurations including, but not limited to,
elders, persons with disabilities and unaccompanied youths; provided
further, that household assistance funds shall be advanced to the
administering agencies at the end of each month and prior to the next
month’s disbursement, the amount of which shall be estimated based
on the prior month’s expenditure with a reconciliation not less than
annually; provided further, that notwithstanding clauses (i) and (ii),
funds shall be expended to families and individuals who are at risk of
injury or harm due to domestic violence in their current housing
situation and whose household income is not more than 60 per cent of
the area median income; provided further, that families and individuals
that are at risk of injury or harm from domestic violence who meet the
qualifications of enrollment in the address confidentiality program shall
be afforded the opportunity to register with and become enrolled in the
address confidentiality program as offered by the secretary of the
commonwealth; and provided further, that the executive office shall
distribute funds under this item as well as said federal sources and
other public and private sources of short-term rental and mortgage
assistance in a manner that prioritizes geographic equity ........................ $207,477,715
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0010 For the operation of the office of the secretary of economic
development, including the operation of the Massachusetts permit
regulatory office and the operation of the office of the director of
wireless and broadband affairs; provided, that agencies within the
executive office may, with the prior approval of the secretary,
138

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
streamline and improve administrative operations pursuant to
interdepartmental service agreements; and provided further, that not
less than $250,000 shall be expended to the Massachusetts LGBT
Chamber of Commerce, Inc. ........................................................................ $5,608,084
7002-0017 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office of economic development .................................................... $2,093,580
7002-0025 For operational support grants to community action agencies;
provided, that criteria for the distribution of the grants, including
minimum or maximum grant size, eligible uses and any relevant
reporting and accountability measures shall be developed jointly with
the Massachusetts Association for Community Action, Inc. or
MASSCAP; and provided further, that the grants shall be used to
assist the agencies in their mission to assist residents of the
commonwealth living with low incomes to stabilize their lives and
achieve economic prosperity, and in creating and expanding
opportunity for those residents in the neighborhoods and
municipalities where they live and work ....................................................... $5,000,000
7002-0036 For a competitive grant program to work with urban entrepreneurs to
promote small businesses, create new jobs and support workforce
development and training initiatives in urban communities; provided,
that the program shall be administered by the executive office of
economic development; and provided further, that funds may be used
for planning grants to local housing authorities and municipalities in
urban areas to develop new affordable rental or homeownership
housing .............................................................................................................. $1,000,000
7002-0040 For a transfer to Massachusetts development finance agency for a
small business technical assistance grant program to be administered
by said agency’s growth capital division; provided, that grants shall be
disbursed to community development corporations certified under
chapter 40H of the General Laws, nonprofit community development
financial institutions certified by the United States Department of the
Treasury or nonprofit community-based organizations to provide
technical assistance or training programs to businesses with not more
than 20 employees; and provided further, that priority shall be given to
those organizations that focus on reaching underserved markets and
to worker cooperatives and businesses governed by employee stock
ownership plans ............................................................................................ $7,500,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund ..................... 100%
7002-1502 For the Transformative Development Fund established in section 46
of chapter 23G of the General Laws; provided, that the initiative shall
be developed in consultation with the Massachusetts Association of
Community Development Corporations and the Massachusetts
Institute for a New Commonwealth, Inc. and shall focus on identifying
and implementing strategies for reclaiming vacant, abandoned and
blighted properties and restoring them to productive use as
homeownership opportunities or rental housing, as well as on
capacity-building at the local level to address this need ................................... $250,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund .................. 61.76%
General Fund ............................................................... 38.24%
139

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7002-1509 For an entrepreneur-in-residence program to be administered by the
Massachusetts Technology Development Corporation doing business
as MassVentures, or an affiliated not-for-profit entity, to encourage the
part-time employment by institutions of higher education or their
nonprofit affiliates of entrepreneurs who are not citizens of the United
States and who desire to move to or remain in the commonwealth on
a nonimmigrant status following a period of study for a masters or
doctorate degree in the sciences, technological fields, engineering,
mathematics, accounting, finance, economics, business or business
administration; provided, that the program shall support entrepreneurs
who have established, or who have the skills and demonstrate the
intention to create, a new business venture in the commonwealth; and
provided further, that the program shall support entrepreneurs and
part-time employers who commit to apply for a nonimmigrant H-1B
visa under § 101(a)(15)(h)(i)(b) of the federal Immigration and
Nationality Act of 1965 ..................................................................................... $500,000
Office of Consumer Affairs and Business Regulation.
7006-0000 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation,
including expenses of an administrative services unit .................................. $1,770,468
7006-0043 For the office of consumer affairs and business regulation, which may
expend not more than $995,452 from fees collected from the
registration and renewal of home improvement contractor registrations
under section 11 of chapter 142A of the General Laws for the
administration and enforcement of the home improvement contractor
registration program; provided, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................. $995,452
Division of Banks.
7006-0010 For the operation of the division of banks; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the division
shall assess 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in this item and
the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item
upon financial institutions that the division currently regulates under
section 2 of chapter 167 of the General Laws ............................................ $26,543,261
7006-0011 For the costs incurred by the division of banks associated with
licensure of loan originators under chapter 255F of the General Laws;
provided, that the division may expend revenues of not more than
$1,500,000 from the revenue received from administrative fees
associated with the licensure fees and from civil administrative
penalties collected under said chapter 255F; provided further, that
funds shall be expended by the commissioner of banks as grants for
the operation of a program for best lending practices, first-time
homeowner counseling for nontraditional loans and not less than 10
foreclosure education centers under section 16 of chapter 206 of the
acts of 2007 and that the grants shall be awarded through a
140

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
competitive application process using criteria established by the
division; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $1,500,000
Division of Insurance.
7006-0020 For the operation of the division of insurance, including the expenses
of the board of appeal on motor vehicle policies and bonds, the
associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this item,
certain other costs of supervising motor vehicle liability insurance and
the expenses of the fraudulent claims board; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent
of the amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe
benefit costs for personnel paid from this item shall be assessed upon
the institutions which the division currently regulates under general or
special laws or regulations, except for licensed business entity
producers; and provided further, that the assessment shall be in
addition to any assessments currently assessed upon those
institutions ................................................................................................... $16,990,405
7006-0029 For the operation of the health care access bureau under the division
of insurance; provided, that the full amount appropriated in this item
and the associated fringe benefit costs for personnel paid from this
item shall be assessed upon the carriers licensed under chapters 175,
176A, 176B, 176E and 176G of the General Laws, as provided in
section 7A of chapter 26 of the General Laws .............................................. $1,085,781
Division of Occupational Licensure.
7006-0040 For the operation and administration of the division of
occupational licensure ................................................................................. $12,286,344
7006-0142 For the administration of the office of public safety and inspections
under the division of occupational licensure, which may expend not
more than $19,916,561 in revenues collected from fees or fines for
annual elevator inspections, building inspections, amusement park
ride inspections, state building code trainings and courses of
instruction, licensing of pipefitters and hoisting equipment operators,
all licensing programs administered by the office of public safety and
inspections, revenues from fines collected under section 65 of chapter
143 of the General Laws and fees for appeals of civil fines issued under
section 22 of chapter 22 of the General Laws and said section 65 of
said chapter 143; provided, that funds shall be expended for the
administration of the office of public safety and inspections including,
but not limited to: (i) inspectional services; (ii) licensing services; (iii)
the architectural access board; (iv) elevator inspections; (v) building
inspections; and (vi) amusement device inspections; provided further,
that the division shall employ not less than 70 full-time equivalent
elevator inspectors, including an additional engineer, and that funds
shall be expended to address the existing elevator inspection backlog
and to defray the costs associated with performing overtime elevator
141

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
inspections; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate ................................... $19,916,561
Division of Standards.
7006-0060 For the operation of the division of standards ............................................... $1,804,487
7006-0064 For the division of standards' oversight of motor vehicle repair shops ............. $320,000
7006-0065 For the division of standards, which may retain not more than
$875,432 from registration fees and fines collected under sections
184B to 184E, inclusive, of chapter 94 of the General Laws and
section 56D of chapter 98 of the General Laws to support its
enforcement activities as provided under subsection (h) of section
184D of said chapter 94 and from revenues received from item-pricing
violations collected through municipal inspection efforts and from
weights and measures fees and fines collected from cities and towns
for enforcement of weights and measures laws; provided, that
notwithstanding said subsection (h) of said section 184D of said
chapter 94, the division shall not fund the municipal grant program as
provided under said subsection (h) of said section 184D of said
chapter 94; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the division may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................. $875,432
7006-0066 For the support of municipal inspection efforts at the division of
standards; provided, that not more than 15 per cent of the amount
appropriated in this item shall be expended for administrative costs of
the division ....................................................................................................... $160,372
Department of Telecommunications and Cable.
7006-0071 For the operation of the department of telecommunications and cable;
provided, that notwithstanding the second sentence of section 7 of
chapter 25C of the General Laws, the assessments levied for fiscal year
2026 shall be made at a rate sufficient to produce 100 per cent of the
amount appropriated in this item and the associated fringe benefit
costs for personnel paid from this item ........................................................ $3,477,895
Massachusetts Office of Business Development.
7007-0150 For the Massachusetts office of business development for contracts
with regional economic development organizations under the program
established under sections 3J and 3K of chapter 23A of the General
Laws ............................................................................................................. $1,000,000
142

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
7007-0300 For the operation of the Massachusetts office of business
development, including the operation of the Massachusetts
international trade office and for marketing and promoting the
commonwealth to attract and retain targeted businesses and
industries ...................................................................................................... $1,600,071
7007-0500 For the operation and maintenance of the Massachusetts Biomedical
Initiatives, Inc. for the commercialization of new, academic-based
research and development and raising the scientific awareness of the
communities of the commonwealth; provided, that the institute, in
collaboration with the office of business development, shall expend
not less than $250,000 for initiatives to increase diversity in the fields
of life sciences and biotechnology in the commonwealth; provided
further, that such initiatives may include, but shall not be limited to: (i)
investments in minority-owned businesses; (ii) grants to school
districts with significant minority student populations for the
development of curricula, purchase of equipment and the provision of
internships; (iii) planning and implementation of strategies to recruit,
develop and retain a diverse workforce in the fields of life sciences
and biotechnology; and (iv) identifying structural and cultural obstacles
to the full inclusion of diverse population in the life sciences and
biotechnology field, along with recommendations for removing those
obstacles; provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the
institute shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the development, implementation and success of
these initiatives, including the disbursement of funds to specific
entities as defined in this item; and provided further, that the institute
shall seek out private funds necessary to match contributions equal to
$1 for every $1 contributed by this item ............................................................ $750,000
7007-0800 For a state matching grant for the small business development center;
provided, that no funds shall be expended from this item until the
United States Small Business Administration has made a payment or
has executed a contract to pay the University of Massachusetts at
Amherst for the operation of the center; provided further, that the funds
expended from this item shall not exceed 25 per cent of the gross
operating cost of the center; provided further, that not more than
$300,000 from this item shall be expended for federal procurement
technical assistance services within the center; provided further, that
such services shall include, but not be limited to, assisting businesses
in securing federal contracts, obtaining contract financing, generating
responses to requests for proposals, interpreting bid documents,
providing educational workshops and seminars and for the electronic
identification and tracking of federal bid opportunities; and provided
further, that funds expended for federal procurement technical
assistance services within the center shall be subject to the receipt of
matching funds from federal or private sources, including the United
States Department of Defense ...................................................................... $1,426,222
7007-0952 For the operation of the Commonwealth Zoological Corporation
established in chapter 92B of the General Laws; provided, that funds
appropriated in this item shall be expended to promote private
fundraising, achieve self-sufficiency and serve as a catalyst for urban
economic development and job opportunities for local residents;
provided further, that the corporation shall take all steps necessary to
increase the amount of private funding available for the operation of
143

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
the zoos; provided further, that funding in this item shall not be
transferred through interdepartmental service agreements; provided
further, that not later than February 2, 2026, the corporation shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the status of, and amounts collected from, the private
fundraising and enhanced revenue efforts identified in the draft
Massachusetts zoos business and operations plan dated December
1996; and provided further, that funds may be expended on a
matching program to encourage private and corporate donations to
support the Franklin Park zoo and the Walter D. Stone Memorial
zoo ................................................................................................................ $5,750,000
Massachusetts Marketing Partnership.
7008-0900 For the operation and administration of the office of travel and tourism;
provided, that the office shall be the commonwealth’s official and lead
agency to facilitate and attract: (i) major sports events and
championships; and (ii) motion picture production and development;
and provided further, that not later than March 6, 2026 the office shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to: (A) an overview of the
tourism industry in the commonwealth; (B) the economic impact of
domestic and international travelers to the commonwealth; (C) a
breakdown of the regional tourism council grant allocations; and (D)
initiatives undertaken to promote travel and tourism in the
commonwealth ................................................................................................ $283,203
7008-1116 For the commonwealth’s local economic development projects ..................... $100,000
7008-1300 For the operation of the Massachusetts international trade office .................... $152,565
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1700 For the operation of information technology services within the
executive office of education ...................................................................... $25,916,703
7009-6379 For the operation of the office of the secretary of education ........................ $3,206,848
7009-6600 For the development and initial implementation of high-quality early
college programs; provided, that such programs shall incorporate the
guiding principles of designated early college pathways, as developed
jointly by the department of higher education and the department of
elementary and secondary education; provided further, that priority
shall be given to programs that serve students who are currently
underrepresented in college; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months ................... $14,205,894
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
7010-0005 For the operation of the department of elementary and secondary
education; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 66A of the General
Laws, the department of elementary and secondary education, the
department of early education and care, the department of children
144

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
and families and the disabled persons protection commission may
share with each other personal data regarding students who receive
services in special education programs approved, licensed, monitored
or regulated by the department of elementary and secondary
education and the department of early education and care to carry out
their respective responsibilities under state and federal law; and
provided further, that the department of elementary and secondary
education may fund direct support to teachers and administrators who
are providing services to assist in state education initiatives ..................... $13,321,738
7010-0012 For grants to cities, towns and regional school districts for payments
of certain costs and related expenses for the program to eliminate
racial imbalance, established under section 12A of chapter 76 of the
General Laws; provided, that funds shall be made available for
payment for services rendered by the Metropolitan Council for
Educational Opportunity (METCO), Inc. and Springfield public
schools; provided further, that all grant applications submitted to and
approved by the department of elementary and secondary education
shall include a detailed line item budget specifying how such funds
shall be allocated and expended; provided further, that not later than
January 2, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the impact of the grant program on student
outcomes, the expenditure of funds by districts and the extent to which
the services rendered by METCO support the goals of the grant
program; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item for
fiscal year 2026 shall not revert to the General Fund but shall be
available until December 31, 2026 ............................................................. $29,908,286
7010-0033 For literacy and early literacy grant programs; provided, that literacy
and early literacy programs receiving funding through this item shall
submit ongoing evaluations and documentation of outcomes to the
department of elementary and secondary education; provided further,
that said evaluations shall be compared to measurable goals and
benchmarks developed by the department; provided further, that not
less than $440,000 shall be expended for HILL for Literacy, Inc.;
provided further, that funds provided to HILL for Literacy, Inc. in fiscal
year 2026, may be expended through June 30, 2027; and provided
further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities during
the summer months ...................................................................................... $5,716,683
7010-1192 For grants to cities, towns, school districts and nonprofit entities for
educational improvement projects; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, no funds shall be transferred
from this item to any other item of appropriation; and provided further,
that funds shall be expended fully and, on a schedule, consistent with
the provisions of section 9B of chapter 29 of the General Laws ..................... $100,000
7010-1193 For grants to support civics education programs; provided, that not
less than $500,000 shall be expended for the implementation of a
program to support civics education learning opportunities in
coordination with the John Fitzgerald Kennedy Library Foundation,
Incorporated, that focuses on underserved communities and other
communities, across the commonwealth; and provided further, that
not less than $500,000 shall be expended for the Edward M. Kennedy
145

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Institute for the United States Senate, Inc. to expand civics education
programs, including investments in curriculum and technology ................... $1,000,000
7010-1196 For programs and services offered by Smart from the Start, Inc. to
promote the healthy development of young children and their families
living in underserved communities in the city of Boston through
trauma-informed, multi-generational family support and community
engagement ..................................................................................................... $600,000
7027-0019 For school-to-career connecting activities; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the board
of elementary and secondary education, in cooperation with the
executive office of labor and workforce development and the state
workforce investment board, may establish and support a public-
private partnership to link high school students with economic and
learning opportunities on the job as part of the school-to-career
transition program; provided further, that this program may include the
award of matching grants to workforce investment boards or other local
public-private partnerships involving local community job
commitments and worksite learning opportunities for students;
provided further, that the grants shall require at least a 200 per cent
match in wages for the students from private sector participants;
provided further, that the program shall include, but not be limited to,
a provision that business leaders commit resources to pay salaries, to
provide mentoring and instruction on the job and to work closely with
teachers; provided further, that public funds shall pay for the costs of
connecting schools and businesses to ensure that students serve
productively on the job; and provided further, that the program shall
partner with the YouthWorks program at the Commonwealth
Corporation to develop appropriate connections between the 2
programs....................................................................................................... $6,531,266
7027-0020 For the implementation, operation and expansion of innovation
pathway programs; provided, that such programs shall incorporate the
guiding principles of innovation pathway programs, as developed
jointly by the department of elementary and secondary education and
the department of higher education; and provided further, that
preference shall be given to programs that encourage career
opportunities in high demand industries .................................................. $4,808,927
7027-1004 For services that improve outcomes for English language learners,
including, but not limited to, English language acquisition professional
development to improve the academic performance of English
language learners; provided, that funds shall be expended to
implement the programs under chapter 71A of the General Laws;
provided further, that funds may be expended for the professional
development of vocational-technical educators who educate English
language learners; provided further, that funds may be expended to
administer the requirements under chapter 138 of the acts of 2017;
provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended
on grants to high-quality, intensive English language learning
programs in districts serving gateway municipalities as defined under
section 3A of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for districts to provide support for middle and
high school students deemed to be at risk of dropping out of school as
a result of language barriers or challenges in English language
146

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
acquisition; and provided further, that funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months .................................. $3,696,331
7028-0031 For the expenses of school-age children in institutional schools under
section 12 of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the
department of elementary and secondary education may provide
special education services to eligible incarcerated persons in houses
of correction; and provided further, that the department of elementary
and secondary education shall continue to collaborate with the
department of youth services to align curriculum at the department of
youth services with the statewide curriculum frameworks and to
support the reintegration of youth from facilities at the department of
youth services into regular public school settings ......................................... $8,760,943
7035-0001 For a program to be run by the department of elementary and
secondary education for planning grants and implementation grants
for regional and local partnerships to expand existing and develop new
career and technical education programs; provided, that preference
shall be given in awarding planning and implementation grants to
vocational schools with demonstrable waitlists for admission ...................... $3,118,500
7035-0002 For the provision and improvement of adult basic education services;
provided, that grants shall be distributed to a diverse network of
organizations that have demonstrated a commitment and an
effectiveness in the provision of such services and that are selected
competitively by the department of elementary and secondary
education; provided further, that such grants shall support the
successful transition of students from other adult basic education
programs to community college certificate and degree-granting
programs; provided further, that the grants shall be contingent upon
satisfactory levels of performance as defined and determined by the
department; provided further, that preference in awarding grants shall
be given to organizations providing services to high percentages of
parents of infants, toddlers and preschool and school-age children;
provided further, that funds shall be expended to reduce the waitlist of
students for English language learning services; provided further, that
grants shall not be considered an entitlement to a grant recipient;
provided further, that the department shall consult with community
colleges and other service providers in supporting and implementing
content, performance and professional standards for adult basic
education programs and services; provided further, that the
department shall fund a professional development system to provide
training and support for adult basic education programs and services;
provided further, that funds shall be expended on phase two pay-for-
performance contracts based on outcomes-based contract measuring
and funding services that result in employment and wage gains and
that require bridge funding while final performance results are
analyzed; and provided further, that efforts shall be taken to reduce
the wait list .................................................................................................. $58,923,560
7035-0006 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation
of pupils; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, the commonwealth’s obligation shall not exceed the
amount appropriated in this item ................................................................ $57,119,862
147

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7035-0008 For reimbursements to cities, towns and regional school districts for
the cost of transportation of nonresident pupils as required by the
federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, Public Law 100-
77, as amended; provided, that not later than February 18, 2026, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit to the
house and senate committees on ways and means a preliminary
estimate of the costs eligible for reimbursement under this item in fiscal
year 2027; and provided further, that the commonwealth’s obligation
shall not exceed the amount appropriated in this item ............................... $28,671,815
7035-0035 For a competitively bid, statewide, performance-based integrated
program to increase participation and performance in advanced
placement courses, particularly among underserved populations, to
prepare students for college and career success in science,
technology, engineering, mathematics and English; provided, that
funds shall support all of the following program elements for each
school: (i) open access to courses; (ii) identifying underserved
students and increasing their rates of participation in advanced
placement courses; (iii) equipment and supplies for new and expanded
advanced placement courses; (iv) support for the costs of advanced
placement exams; and (v) support for student study sessions;
provided further, that these funds may support teacher professional
development, including a College Board-endorsed advanced
placement summer institute for math, science and English advanced
placement teachers; provided further, that said program shall provide
a matching amount of not less than $1,000,000 in private funding for
direct support of educators; provided further, that funds shall be
disbursed by the beginning of the 2025-2026 school year to cover costs
expended between August 1, 2025 and July 31, 2026, inclusive;
provided further, that this program shall work in conjunction with an
existing, separately funded, statewide pre-advanced placement
program; and provided further, that funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months ..................................... $2,000,320
7053-1909 For reimbursements to cities and towns for partial assistance in the
furnishing of lunches to school children, including partial assistance in
the furnishing of lunches to school children under section 6 of chapter
548 of the acts of 1948, as inserted by chapter 538 of the acts of
1951, and for supplementing funds allocated for the special milk
program; provided, that authorized payments in the aggregate for
partial assistance in the furnishing of lunches to school children shall
not exceed the required state revenue match contained in the federal
National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as amended, and
implementing regulations; and provided further, that all cities and
towns shall publish and disseminate meal charge policies in
accordance with the United States Department of Agriculture
guidance memorandum SP 46-2016, issued July 8, 2016, in a format
that is easily accessible and, if possible, made available for parents
and guardians before the start of the 2025-2026 school year, but not
later than September 30, 2025 ..................................................................... $5,314,176
7053-1925 For the school breakfast program for public and nonpublic schools and
for grants to improve summer food programs during the summer
school vacation period; provided, that within the summer food
program, priority shall be given to extending such programs for the full
summer vacation period and promoting increased participation in such
148

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
programs; provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall solicit proposals from returning sponsors
and school food authorities in time for implementation of such grant
program during the summer of 2026; provided further, that such grants
shall only be awarded to sponsors who can demonstrate their intent
to offer full summer programs or increase participation; provided
further, that the department shall require sufficient reporting from each
grantee to measure the success of such grant program; provided
further, that not later than April 1, 2026, the department shall select
grantees for the program authorized by this item; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for the universal school breakfast program
through which all children in schools receiving funds under such
program shall be provided free, nutritious breakfast; provided further,
that subject to regulations by the board of education that specify time
and learning standards, breakfast shall be served during regular school
hours; provided further, that participation shall be limited to those
elementary schools mandated to serve breakfast under section 1C of
chapter 69 of the General Laws where not less than 60 per cent of the
students are eligible for free or reduced price meals under the
federally-funded school meals program; provided further, that not later
than November 14, 2025, the department shall select school sites for
programs authorized by this item and shall report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the preliminary results of
these grants not later than February 6, 2026; provided further, that
kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, public schools that are required to
serve breakfast under said section 1C of said chapter 69 and where
not less than 60 per cent of students are eligible for free or reduced
price meals shall offer school breakfast after the instructional day has
begun and the tardy bell rings; provided further, that not later than
September 4, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means on the status of school
district compliance with this requirement including, but not limited to,
all data regarding breakfast-delivery models utilized and participation
rates; and provided further, that not less than $700,000 shall be
expended for a grant with Project Bread-The Walk for Hunger, Inc., to
enhance and expand the summer food service outreach program and
the school breakfast outreach program, prior appropriation continued ........ $4,467,639
7061-0008 For school aid to cities, towns, regional school districts, counties
maintaining agricultural schools, independent vocational schools and
independent agricultural and technical schools to be distributed
under chapters 70 and 76 of the General Laws and section 3 .............. $7,121,968,717
General Fund ......................................................... 96.41%
Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund .................. 2.91%
Education Fund ............................................................. 0.68%
7061-0012 For the reimbursement of extraordinary special education costs under
section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws; provided, that the
approved costs threshold for fiscal year 2026 shall be as defined in
said section 5A of said chapter 71B and the program shall reimburse
municipalities for both the eligible instructional costs and for the cost
of required out-of-district transportation associated with implementing
individual education plans of students receiving special education
services in a manner consistent with said section 5A of said chapter
71B; provided further, that notwithstanding section 27 of chapter 132
149

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
of the acts of 2019, the program shall reimburse 75 per cent of all
required out-of-district transportation costs eligible for reimbursement
in fiscal year 2026; provided further, that reimbursements shall be
prorated as necessary so that the expenses of this item shall not
exceed the amount appropriated in this item; provided further, that
upon receipt by the department of elementary and secondary
education of required special education cost reports from school
districts, the department of elementary and secondary education shall
reimburse districts based on fiscal year 2025 claims; provided further,
that the department of elementary and secondary education may
expend funds to continue and expand voluntary residential placement
prevention programs between the department of elementary and
secondary education and other departments within the executive office
of health and human services that develop community-based support
services for children and their families; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall provide not
less than $2,000,000 to the department of developmental services for
the voluntary residential placement prevention program; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall fully cooperate in providing information and assistance
necessary for the department of developmental services to maximize
federal reimbursement and to effectively serve students in less
restrictive settings; provided further, that not less than $750,000 shall
be expended for students with intellectual disabilities through the
Massachusetts chapter of Best Buddies International, Inc.; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall expend not less than $200,000: (i) to provide books in accessible
synthetic audio format that are made available through the federal
National Instructional Materials Access Center repository; and (ii) for
outreach to and training of teachers and students on the use of National
Instructional Materials Accessibility Standard format and the use of
human speech audio digital textbooks; provided further, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall expend
funds for the costs of borrowing audio textbooks by special education
students; provided further, that funds may be expended for the
monitoring and follow-up activities of the department of elementary and
secondary education’s complaint management system, review and
approval of local educational authority applications and local school
districts’ compliance with the requirements of part B of the federal
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, as amended in 2004, by the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of
2004, Public Law 108-446, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., in the provision of
special education and related services to children with disabilities;
provided further, that funds may be expended to administer the
reimbursements funded in this item; provided further, that funds may
be expended to reimburse districts for extraordinary increases in costs
incurred during fiscal year 2026 that would be reimbursable under said
section 5A of said chapter 71B; provided further, that reimbursements
for current year costs shall be limited to school districts that experience
increases of greater than 25 per cent from costs reimbursable under
said section 5A of said chapter 71B and incurred during fiscal year
2025 to costs reimbursable under said section 5A of said chapter 71B
and incurred during fiscal year 2026 or other cases of extraordinary
hardship where special education costs increase in relationship to total
district costs as the department of elementary and secondary
education may define through regulations or guidelines; provided
150

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
further, that reimbursements for current year costs shall be allocated
as 1-time grants and shall not decrease reimbursements in the
following fiscal year; provided further, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall conduct audits of fiscal
year 2025 claims; provided further, that if the fiscal year 2025 claims
are found to be inaccurate, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall recalculate the fiscal year 2026
reimbursement amount and adjust the third and fourth quarter
payments to the districts to reflect the new reimbursement amount;
provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the department
of elementary and secondary education shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on the results of the
audit; and provided further, that not later than February 27, 2026, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit to the
house and senate committees on ways and means a preliminary
estimate of the costs eligible for reimbursement through this item in
fiscal year 2027, prior appropriation continued ........................................ $484,677,484
7061-0029 For the office of school and district accountability established under
section 55A of chapter 15 of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding said section 55A of said chapter 15, the office
shall perform not less than 20 school district audits for fiscal year 2026
...................................................................................................................... $1,590,112
7061-0033 For a reserve to assist towns negatively impacted by shortfalls in
federal impact aid for the education of children in families employed by
the federal government on military reservations located within a town’s
limits; provided, that any grants provided under this item shall be
expended by a school committee without further appropriation ................... $1,285,500
7061-9010 For fiscal year 2026 reimbursements to certain cities, towns and
regional school districts of charter school tuition and the per-pupil
capital facilities component included in the charter school tuition
amount for commonwealth charter schools, as calculated under
subsections (ff) and (gg) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the General
Laws; provided, that notwithstanding said subsection (ff) of said
section 89 of said chapter 71 or any other general or special law to the
contrary, the per-pupil capital facilities component of the
commonwealth charter school tuition rate for fiscal year 2026 shall be
$1,188; provided further, that under section 25 of chapter 132 of the
acts of 2019, the department shall provide under this appropriation not
less than 100 per cent of the total eligible state obligation in fiscal year
2026; and provided further, that if the amount appropriated is
insufficient to fully fund all reimbursements required by said section 89
of said chapter 71, the department shall fund the reimbursements in
accordance with the following priorities: (i) the payment of the first year
tuition for students previously enrolled in a private or parochial school
or students who are homeschooled; (ii) the payment of tuition for
siblings where required by subsection (i) of said section 89 of said
chapter 71; (iii) the per-pupil capital facilities component; (iv) the 100
per cent increase reimbursement; and (v) the remaining increase
reimbursements, beginning with the most recent year ............................. $198,988,065
7061-9200 For the department’s education data analysis and support for local
districts .......................................................................................................... $1,254,297
151

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7061-9400 For student and school assessment, including the administration of
the Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment System exam
established by the board of elementary and secondary education
under sections 1D and 1I of chapter 69 of the General Laws and for
grants to school districts to develop portfolio assessments for use in
individual classrooms as an enhancement to student assessment;
provided, that the portfolio assessments shall not replace the
statewide standardized assessment based on the curriculum
frameworks; provided further, that funds may be expended for any
further exams approved by the board under said sections; provided
further, that funds may also be expended on the development and
implementation of related curriculum standards and instructional
support; provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall expend funds for school and student
assessment in accordance with the determination made by the board
of elementary and secondary education as to the method of
assessment in the 2025-2026 school year; provided further, that
funding may be expended for the development of new high school
assessments and assessments in history and social science; and
provided further, that all school assessments shall center on the
academic standards embodied in the curriculum frameworks and shall
involve gauges which shall be relevant and meaningful to students,
parents, teachers, administrators and taxpayers under the first
paragraph of said section 1I of said chapter 69 ......................................... $41,141,280
7061-9406 For a statewide college and career readiness program implemented
by JFYNetWorks, a nonprofit corporation, to: (i) provide online
instructional curricula to help students meet the Massachusetts
State Standards at each grade level and reduce learning loss and
achievement gaps; and (ii) prepare students for required assessments
and college placement tests in middle and high schools ................................ $875,000
7061-9408 For targeted assistance and support to schools and districts at risk of
or determined to be underperforming or chronically underperforming
under sections 1J and 1K of chapter 69 of the General Laws, including
schools and districts that have been identified as in need of “focused
support/targeted support” or “broad/comprehensive support” within
the state’s framework for accountability and assistance under
departmental regulations and guidelines; provided, that no funds shall
be expended in any school or district that fails to file a comprehensive
school or district plan under section 1I of said chapter 69; provided
further, that the department shall only approve reform plans with
proven, replicable results in improving student performance, using
research-based effective practices for turnaround to build multi-tiered
systems of support; provided further, that the department shall only
prioritize funding for turnaround efforts which are based on the
turnaround practices identified by the department as key focus areas
for successful school turnaround including, but not limited to: (i)
leadership, shared responsibility and professional collaboration; (ii)
intentional practices for improving student instruction; (iii) student
specific supports and instruction provided to all students; and (iv)
school climate and culture that provide a safe, orderly and respectful
environment for students and families; provided further, that in carrying
out this item, the department may contract with school support
specialists, turnaround partners and such other external assistance as
necessary in the expert opinion of the commissioner of elementary
152

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
and secondary education to successfully turn around failing school
and district performance; provided further, that no funds shall be
expended on targeted assistance unless the department has
approved, as part of the comprehensive district improvement plan, a
professional development plan that addresses the needs of the district
as determined by the department; provided further, that grants made
under this item shall be awarded in coordination with the departments
of early education and care and higher education; provided further, that
funds shall be available for the establishment of a new school
leadership initiative through cohort-based training and coaching;
provided further, that funds may be expended for the purchase of
instructional materials under section 57 of chapter 15 of the General
Laws; provided further, that no funds shall be expended on
instructional materials except where the purchase of such materials is
part of a comprehensive plan to align the school or district curriculum
with the Massachusetts curriculum frameworks; provided further, that
preference in distributing funds shall be given to proposals that
coordinate reform efforts within all schools in a district in order to
prevent conflicts between multiple reforms and interventions among
the schools, and which demonstrate innovative approaches that have
improved student performance including, but not limited to,
partnerships between community-based organizations and school
districts; provided further, that not later than January 15, 2026, the
department shall submit a report describing and analyzing all targeted
assistance efforts funded by this item; provided further, that the report
shall be submitted to the secretary of administration and finance, the
senate president, the speaker of the house, the house and senate
committees on ways and means and the joint committee on education;
provided further, that no funds shall be expended on recurring school
or school district expenditures unless the department and school
district have developed a long-term plan to fund such expenditures
from the district’s operational budget; provided further, that for the
purposes of this item, appropriated funds may be expended for
programs or activities during the summer months; and provided further,
that any funds distributed from this item to a city, town or regional
school district shall be deposited with the treasurer of such city, town
or regional school district and held in a separate account and shall be
expended by the school committee of such city, town or regional
school district without further appropriation, notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary ......................................................... $16,454,430
7061-9601 For the department of elementary and secondary education; provided,
that the department shall expend not more than $2,724,542 for teacher
preparation and certification services from fees related to such
services; and provided further, that for the purpose of accommodating
timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and
related expenditures, the department may incur expenses and the
comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower
of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in
the state accounting system.......................................................................... $2,724,542
7061-9607 For the administrative and programmatic costs of recovery high
schools; provided, that the department of elementary and secondary
education shall work collaboratively with the bureau of substance
addiction services for the successful transition and continued
operation of the recovery high schools model; provided further, that
153

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
not later than April 1, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include,
but not be limited to, the: (i) number of youths served per high school;
(ii) outcomes measured for youths; and (iii) recommendations for new
recovery high schools in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; and
provided further, that not less than $100,000 shall be expended for the
implementation of recovery high schools .................................................... $2,900,289
7061-9611 For grants or subsidies for after-school and out-of-school programs;
provided, that preference shall be given to after-school proposals
developed collaboratively and that support quality enhancements and
increased access to after-school and summer learning programs by
public and nonpublic schools and private community-based programs;
provided further, that the department of elementary and secondary
education shall fund only those applications which contain
accountability systems and measurable outcomes, under guidelines
to be determined by the department in consultation with the
department of early education and care; provided further, that
applicants shall detail funds received from all public sources for
existing after-school and out-of-school programs and the types of
programs and students served by the funds; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for services that actively include children with
disabilities in after-school programs that also serve nondisabled
children, and services that include children for whom English is a
second language and children identified as low-income; provided
further, that the department of elementary and secondary education
shall consult with the executive office of health and human services
and the department of early education and care to maximize the
provision of wrap-around services and to coordinate programs and
services for children and youths during after-school and out-of-school
programs; provided further, that not later than September 30, 2025,
the department of elementary and secondary education shall select
the grant recipients and shall report on the preliminary results of said
grants not later than January 9, 2026 to the secretary of administration
and finance, the joint committee on education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that funds
may be expended for programs or activities during the summer
months; provided further, that funds shall be expended to convene
regional networks to work with the department of elementary and
secondary education and the department of early education and care
to support the implementation of school and community partnerships;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the continued
operation of a pilot data-sharing program designed to provide school
districts with funds to partner with local community-based
organizations and share identifiable student data to the extent allowed
by law; and provided further, that not later than June 30, 2026, the
grantee shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means on the effects of the pilot program on students
participating in the programs partnered with the school districts ............. $7,272,449
7061-9612 For the implementation of subsection (f) of section 1P of chapter 69 of
the General Laws to create safe and supportive school environments;
provided, that funds shall be expended for the safe and supportive
schools grant program and for a full-time staff member devoted to
carrying out the responsibilities under said subsection (f) of said section
1P of said chapter 69; provided further, that funds shall be expended
154

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
for: (i) an annual statewide safe and supportive schools conference
that shall highlight the grant program, include presentations by
grantee schools and districts about their work, teach attendees about
the safe and supportive schools framework and self-assessment tool,
include presentations about the grant application process and
emphasize best practices for incorporating developmentally
appropriate input from students into safe and supportive schools grant
applications and school-wide action plans; (ii) expert technological
assistance in upgrading the usability of the online self-assessment
tool; and (iii) an evaluation of the grant program; provided further, that
funds shall be expended for leadership development sessions to
inform superintendents and principals and other school leaders about
the grant program and promising practices for leading the work to
create safe and supportive school and district cultures; provided
further, that grants shall be awarded to schools and school district
teams that create schoolwide action plans based on all the elements
of the safe and supportive schools framework and self-assessment
tool; provided further, that grant awards shall be prioritized for
applications that include a process for developmentally appropriate
input from students who are reflective of the school population; provided
further, that schools receiving continuation grants to implement
schoolwide action plans shall incorporate such action plans into their
school improvement plans developed under section 1I of said chapter
69; provided further, that the safe and supportive schools commission
shall conduct an analysis of such school-wide action plans and school
improvement plans, which the department shall provide to the
commission, and shall include in its annual report the results of such
analysis and any recommendations, including any recommendations
related to improving the framework or the self-assessment tool;
provided further, that not later than November 3, 2025, grant awards
under this item shall be allocated by the department of elementary and
secondary education to schools and school districts; provided further,
that districts shall create district plans that support recipient schools;
and provided further, that any unexpended funds in this item shall
not revert to the General Fund but shall be made available for this
item until June 30, 2027 .................................................................................. $670,086
7061-9619 For the Benjamin Franklin Cummings Institute of Technology;
provided, that the institute shall have access to the Massachusetts
education computer system; and provided further, that the institute
may join the state buying consortium ......................................................................... $1
7061-9624 For the School of Excellence program at the Worcester Polytechnic
Institute; provided, that every effort shall be made to recruit and serve
equal numbers of male and female students; provided further, that
sending districts of students attending the Institute shall not be
required to expend any funds for the cost of these students while in
attendance at the Institute; and provided further, that the
Massachusetts Academy of Math and Science at the Worcester
Polytechnic Institute shall provide professional development activities
at the academy, including salary and benefits for teachers and visiting
scholars ......................................................................................................... $2,000,000
7061-9626 For grants to the members of the Massachusetts YouthBuild
Coalition, Inc., for the purpose of providing comprehensive education,
workforce training and skills development to youth ...................................... $1,750,000
155

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7061-9634 For the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc., which shall be responsible
for administering a competitive statewide grant program for public and
private agencies to start or expand youth mentoring programs
according to current best practices and for purposes including
advancing academic performance, self-esteem, social competence
and workforce development; provided, that the department of
elementary and secondary education shall transfer the amount
appropriated in this item to the Mass Mentoring Partnership, Inc., for
these grants; provided further, that in order to be eligible to receive
funds from this item, each public or private agency shall provide a
matching amount equal to $1 for every $1 disbursed from this item;
and provided further, that not later than March 13, 2026, the Mass
Mentoring Partnership, Inc. shall submit a report to the department
detailing the impact of the grants, expenditure of funds and the
amount and source of matching funds raised............................................... $1,500,000
7061-9650 For the Supporting Healthy Alliances Reinforcing Education
(SHARE) grant program to provide an integrated student wellness
grant program to assist schools with addressing non-academic
barriers to student success; provided, that grants shall be used to
support school districts establishing an infrastructure to facilitate
integrated coordination of school and community-based resources
including, but not limited to, social services, mental health and
behavioral health resources; provided further, that not less than
$500,000 shall be awarded by the department to schools and school
districts serving high percentages of low-income students; provided
further, that said supports may include funding to assist public school
districts in contracting with licensed community-based health care
service providers, including mental and behavioral health providers;
provided further, that said program shall be administered by the
department of elementary and secondary education in coordination
with the executive office of health and human services; provided
further, that the department shall prioritize applications for such
services that are submitted by school districts whose applications are
consistent with infrastructure and coordination efforts linking schools
to community-based resources in accordance with item 7061-9612 of
section 2 of chapter 154 of the acts of 2018; provided further, that such
support grants may be expended to assist school districts in
connecting students with community-based services to maximize
coordination with service providers and establish more
comprehensive continuums of care; provided further, that such grants
may also be expended to support increased professional development
opportunities for public school employees to identify students in need
of mental and behavioral health support; provided further, that not later
than December 30, 2025, the department shall issue a report outlining
all student support efforts funded by this item; provided further, that
the report shall be provided to the senate president, the speaker of the
house, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on education; provided further, that for the purposes of
this item, appropriated funds may be expended for programs or
activities during the summer months; provided further, that any
unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall be made
available for the purposes of this item until August 28, 2026; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, any funds distributed from this item to a city, town or regional
156

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
school district shall be deposited with the treasurer of such city, town
or regional school district and held in a separate account and shall be
expended by the school committee of such city, town or regional
school district without further appropriation, notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary ........................................................... $1,000,000
7061-9813 For rural school aid to eligible towns and regional school districts,
excluding vocational schools, independent agricultural, technical
schools and charter schools; provided, that a school district shall be
eligible for rural school aid if a school district has a student density of
not more than 35 students per square mile and an average annual per
capita income of not more than the average annual per capita income
for the commonwealth for the same period; provided further, that rural
school aid shall be allocated equitably in the following priority order: (i)
school districts serving less than 11 students per square mile; (ii)
school districts serving not more than 21 students per square mile; and
(iii) school districts serving not more than 35 students per square mile;
provided further, that not later than December 1, 2025, the department
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing: (a) its recommendations for additional adjustments
to the rural school aid calculation for fiscal year 2027 to improve the
accuracy and equity of the student density component and the per
capita income component; and (b) the calculation and planned
distribution of funds to school districts; provided further, that not later
than January 30, 2026, any district receiving funds under this item
shall submit a plan to the department of elementary and secondary
education outlining steps the district will take to increase regional
collaboration, consolidation or other efficiencies over the next 3 fiscal
years; provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026, that the
department of elementary and secondary education shall submit a
report to the joint committee on education and the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing steps that participating
districts have taken in regionalization and consolidation; and provided
further, that funds distributed from this item shall not be considered
chapter 70 aid for the calculation of the minimum required local
contribution for fiscal year 2027 ................................................................... $7,500,000
7061-9814 For a competitive grant program to support the development and
expansion of high-quality, comprehensive summer learning
opportunities for students in districts with high concentrations of low-
income students; provided, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop the criteria for grants; provided
further, that grants shall be awarded to programs that: (i) include not
less than 150 hours of programming with a focus on academic and
college and career readiness skills, including critical thinking,
collaboration and perseverance; (ii) are research-based summer
programs; and (iii) engage with a variety of organizations and leverage
cost-sharing partnerships with local districts, private funders and
nonprofit institutions; provided further, that in awarding grants, the
department may consider the amount of federal Elementary and
Secondary School Emergency Relief funding received by a district;
provided further, that, for districts that the department determines
have received substantial federal Elementary and Secondary School
Emergency Relief funding, preference in awarding grants may be
given to those districts that commit to not less than a 100 per cent
match in federal Elementary and Secondary School Emergency Relief
157

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
funds; provided further, that grant awards shall not be contingent upon
a match in federal funding for those districts that the department
determines have not received substantial federal Elementary and
Secondary School Emergency Relief funding; and provided further,
that funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
summer months ............................................................................................ $2,970,000
7061-9815 For a grant program administered by the department of elementary
and secondary education in coordination with the executive office of
public safety and security for the prevention of hate crimes, as defined
under section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws, and incidences
of bias in public schools; provided, that grants shall be used for
education, professional development, prevention or community
outreach; and provided further, that the department of elementary and
secondary education shall develop guidelines for grant distribution
including, but not limited to, prioritizing schools that have
experienced hate crimes or incidences of bias within the last 2 years
......................................................................................................................... $400,000
Department of Higher Education.
7066-0000 For the operation of the department of higher education; provided, that
the department shall recommend savings proposals that permit public
institutions of higher education to achieve administrative and program
cost reductions, resource reallocation and program reassessment and
to utilize resources otherwise available to such institutions; provided
further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be expended for the state
university internship incentive program established in item 7066-0000 of
section 2 of chapter 139 of the acts of 2012; provided further, that the
commonwealth shall contribute funds to each institution in an amount
necessary to match private contributions in the current fiscal year to
the institution's internship incentive program; provided further, that the
commonwealth's contribution shall be equal to $1 for every $1
privately contributed to each university's board of trustees or
foundation; provided further, that the maximum total contributions from
the commonwealth shall be not more than the amount appropriated in
this item; provided further, that funds from this program shall not result
in a direct or an indirect reduction in the commonwealth's
appropriations to the institutions for operations, scholarships, financial
aid or any state appropriation and the department shall promulgate
regulations and criteria for the program; provided further, that in order
to meet the estimated costs of employee fringe benefits provided by
the commonwealth on account of employees of the Massachusetts
State College Building Authority and the University of Massachusetts
Building Authority and in order to meet the estimated cost of heat, light,
power and other services, if any, to be furnished by the commonwealth
to projects of these authorities, the boards of trustees of the
community colleges, state universities and the University of
Massachusetts shall transfer to the General Fund, from the funds
received from the operations of the projects, the costs, if any, as shall
be incurred by the commonwealth for these purposes in the current
fiscal year as determined by the appropriate building authority, verified
by the commissioner of higher education and approved by the
secretary of administration and finance; provided further, that not less
than $150,000 shall be expended for a campus violence prevention
administrator and such other activities as are needed to fund the full
158

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
implementation of chapter 337 of the acts of 2020 to advance
statewide campus safety initiatives, including sexual violence
prevention; and provided further, that funds shall be expended to meet
existing statutory requirements and provide orientation, professional
development and support for the boards of trustees in areas including,
but not limited to, recruitment, training and accountability .......................... $4,200,965
7066-0009 For the New England Board of Higher Education ............................................ $374,740
7066-0015 For the community college workforce training incentive grant program
established under section 15F of chapter 15A of the General Laws;
provided, that eligible incentive revenues under this program may also
include workforce training contracts administered or paid through
public agencies, municipalities, public grants, nonprofit organizations
or private gifts ............................................................................................... $1,344,842
7066-0016 For a program of financial aid to support the matriculation at public
and private institutions of higher education of persons in the custody
of the department of children and families under a care and protection
petition upon reaching the age of 18 or persons in the custody of the
department matriculating at such an institution at an earlier age;
provided, that no such person shall be required to remain in the
custody of the department beyond the age of 18 to qualify for such aid;
provided further, that said aid shall not exceed $6,000 per recipient
per year; and provided further, that said aid shall only be granted
after exhausting all other sources of financial support ................................ $1,470,150
7066-0019 For the department of higher education to support the dual enrollment
program allowing qualified high school students to take college
courses; provided, that public and private institutions of higher
education may offer courses in high schools in addition to courses
offered at the institutions or online if the number of students is
sufficient; provided further, that preference in awarding grants for early
college programs shall be given to public institutions of higher
education; and provided further, that appropriated funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months ................ $13,100,000
7066-0021 For reimbursements to public institutions of higher education for foster
and adopted child fee waivers under section 19 of chapter 15A of the
General Laws; provided, that reimbursements to public institutions of
higher education for fee waivers granted in prior fiscal years may be
expended from this item ............................................................................... $7,221,962
7066-0025 For the Performance Management Set Aside incentive program for the
University of Massachusetts, the state universities and the community
colleges; provided, that funds shall be distributed by the commissioner
of higher education to public institutions of higher education through a
competitive grant process based on priorities determined by the board
of higher education in pursuit of operational efficiency and strategic
goals; provided further, that priorities may include support of workforce
programs that train students for high-quality employment and for
outreach programs that engage surrounding communities with high-
quality educational programs, and programs that focus on timely or
accelerated student completion of associate and bachelor’s degree
programs with lower and more predictable student costs; provided
further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the department of higher
159

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
education shall submit a report to the house and senate committees
on ways and means detailing campuses receiving funds through this
item and the criteria used to award funds; and provided further, that
funds may be expended for programs or activities during the summer
months .......................................................................................................... $2,552,156
7066-0036 For science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM)
Starter Academy programs to be implemented through the department
of higher education at the Massachusetts community colleges to
benefit student populations identified by the department as having
expressed a high level of interest in STEM majors and STEM careers
and yet are underperforming on STEM academic assessments;
provided, that the STEM Starter Academy program shall incorporate
best practice design elements from established STEM career
pathways initiatives including, but not limited to, those recognized by
the Massachusetts' Plan for Excellence in STEM Education and any
subsequent STEM plans recognized by the department; provided
further, that the STEM Starter Academy shall incorporate employer
and industry collaboration to address workforce needs in high-demand
fields, industry contextualized STEM curriculum, embedded
mathematics and English language remediation and student supports
and other STEM education research-based strategies that promote
enrollment, enhance retention and increase post-secondary
graduation rates and pathways to job placement or transfer to 4-year
degree programs; provided further, that appropriated funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months; and
provided further, that not later than September 30, 2025, the
department of higher education shall submit to the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the joint committee on higher
education and the joint committee on education an evaluation of this
program and its impact ................................................................................. $2,045,282
7066-0040 For adult college transition services focused on low-income and entry-
level workers; provided, that funds shall be awarded competitively by
the board of higher education to adult basic education providers,
including local education agencies, community-based organizations,
community colleges and correctional facilities with recognized success
in bridging academic gaps of underserved populations and resulting
in college entrance, retention and completion; provided further, that
not less than $250,000 shall be expended for Jewish Vocational
Service, Inc. with a targeted focus on academic and coaching support
for immigrants and refugees; provided further, that not later than
February 13, 2026, program awardees shall report to the department
of higher education on attendees’ successful transition to college and
that the department of higher education shall deliver to the joint
committee on education and the house and senate committees on
ways and means an evaluation of the program and its impact on
student achievement, particularly as it relates to closing achievement
gaps; and provided further, that appropriated funds may be expended
for programs or activities during the summer months ..................................... $500,000
7066-1400 For additional operational funding for state universities; provided, that
funds from this item shall be distributed in accordance with the funding
formula in line item 7066-1400 of section 2 of chapter 165 of the acts
of 2014; provided further, that funding from this item shall be contingent
upon approval of a funding formula that incorporates equity by the
160

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
board of higher education; provided further, that not later than March
3, 2026, the state universities shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the total balance in all
budgeted and off-budget funds; and provided further, that the
allocation of funds shall be approved by the board of higher education
.................................................................................................................... $11,216,729
Education Fund ................................................... 100.00%
7066-9600 For a discretionary grant program to provide funds to school districts
and public institutions of higher education partnering together to offer
inclusive concurrent enrollment programs for school age children with
disabilities, as defined in section 1 of chapter 71B of the General Laws,
who are between the ages of 18 and 22, inclusive; provided, that the
grant program shall be limited to students who are considered to have
severe disabilities and, in the case of students age 18 or 19, shall be
limited to students with severe disabilities who have been unable to
achieve the competency determination necessary to pass the
Massachusetts Comprehensive Assessment System exam; provided
further, that on a discretionary basis, public institutions of higher
education may choose to additionally include students with severe
developmental disabilities over the age of 21 through said grant
program; provided further, that such students with disabilities shall be
offered enrollment in credit and noncredit courses that include
students without disabilities, including enrollment in noncredit and
credit-bearing courses in audit status for students who may not meet
course prerequisites and requirements; provided further, that the
partnering school districts shall provide supports, services and
accommodations necessary to facilitate a student’s enrollment;
provided further, that the department of higher education shall develop
guidelines to ensure that the grant program promotes civic
engagement and mentoring of faculty in public institutions of higher
education and supports college success, work success, participation
in student life of the college community and provision of a free
appropriate public education in the least restrictive environment;
provided further, that the department shall develop strategies and
procedures to help sustain and replicate the existing inclusive
concurrent enrollment programs initiated through the grant program
including, but not limited to: (i) providing funds to retain employment
specialists; (ii) assisting students in meeting integrated competitive
employment and other transition-related goals; (iii) adopting
procedures and funding mechanisms to ensure that new partnerships
of public institutions of higher education and school districts providing
inclusive concurrent enrollment programs fully utilize the models and
expertise developed in existing partnerships; and (iv) conducting
evaluations and research to further identify student outcomes and best
practices; provided further, that the department shall develop a
mechanism to encourage existing and new partnerships to expand the
capacity to respond to individual parents and schools in underserved
areas that request an opportunity for their children to participate in the
inclusive concurrent enrollment initiative; provided further, that tuition
for courses shall be waived by the state institutions of higher education
for students enrolled through this grant program; provided further, that
the department shall maintain the position of inclusive concurrent
enrollment coordinator who shall be responsible for administering the
grant program, coordinating the advisory committee, developing new
161

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
partnerships, assisting existing partnerships in creating self-sustaining
models and overseeing the development of videos and informational
materials as well as evaluation and research through the institute for
community inclusion to assist new colleges and school districts;
provided further, that not later than July 15, 2025, the department shall
select grant recipients and shall distribute a request for grant
proposals subject to future appropriation not later than May 30, 2026;
provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the department
of higher education, in consultation with the department of elementary
and secondary education, shall report on student outcomes in
programs funded under this item to the house and senate committees
on ways and means, the joint committee on education, and the joint
committee on higher education; and provided further, that funds may
be expended for programs or activities during the summer months ............ $4,000,000
7070-0065 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any approved public or independent college, university,
school of nursing or any other approved institution furnishing a program
of higher education; provided, that funds from this item may be
expended on the administration of said scholarship program; provided
further, that the commissioner of higher education, in coordination with
the Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall follow adopted
guidelines governing the eligibility for and the awarding of financial
assistance; provided further, that funds from this item shall be made
available for the MASSGrant or MASSGrant Plus programs in an
amount not less than the amount made available in fiscal year 2025;
provided further, that not less than $22,000,000 shall be made
available for the Massachusetts Gilbert Matching Student Grant
Program (GMSGP); provided further, that not less than $430,000 shall
be made available for One Family, Inc. for any costs in connection with
the One Family Scholars program; provided further, that not less
than $3,600,000 shall be made available for early educator
scholarships, prior appropriation continued .............................................. $175,188,311
General Fund ......................................................... 98.68%
Youth Development & Achievement Fund .................. 1.32%
7077-0023 For the Cummings School of Veterinary Medicine at Tufts University;
provided, that funds shall be expended under a resident veterinary
tuition remission plan as approved by the commissioner of higher
education for supportive veterinary services provided to the
commonwealth; provided further, that funds from this item may
support collaborative arrangements that may include teaching
partnerships, articulation agreements or both with community colleges
and vocational-technical schools that offer veterinary technician
programs, veterinary health care programs or both approved by the
board of higher education; provided further, that the school may work
in consultation with the Norfolk county agricultural high school on
veterinary programs; provided further, that the school may work in
consultation with the Bristol county agricultural high school on
veterinary programs; and provided further, that funds appropriated in
this item shall support bioterrorism prevention research conducted in
consultation with emergency authorities in the commonwealth relative
to diseases that can be transmitted from animals to humans ...................... $5,500,000
162

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
7100-4000 For funding to community college campuses; provided, that funds shall
be expended for the continued implementation of community college
reform, for continued initiatives to strengthen the connections between
the colleges, local businesses and regional workforce investment
boards and to improve workforce training at the colleges; provided
further, that funding shall be allocated among the campuses using a
formula that incorporates equity, developed by the commissioner of
higher education in consultation with the secretaries of education,
labor and workforce development and economic development; and
provided further, that the allocation of funds shall be approved by the
board of higher education ........................................................................... $11,450,395
Education Fund ................................................... 100.00%
7100-4002 For Supporting Urgent Community College Equity through Student
Services (SUCCESS) grants to community colleges to provide
wraparound supports and services to improve outcomes for their most
vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, low-income, first-
generation, minority and disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning students; provided, that funds
shall be disbursed based on a formula and criteria developed in
consultation with the Massachusetts Association of Community
Colleges; provided further, that eligible wraparound support activities
shall include, but not be limited to, peer mentors, academic skills
workshops, field trips to 4-year schools and targeted academic, career,
transfer and scholarship advising; provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months;
provided further, that all funds distributed may be spent solely on
personnel costs at the discretion of the college; and provided further,
that not later than April 1, 2026, the department shall report to the joint
committee on higher education and the house and senate committees
on ways and means on the progress made on implementing and
funding this program, including any regulations, guidelines or criteria
used to distribute the funds, and on the final distribution of funds to
campuses, prior appropriation continued .................................................. $14,000,000
Marijuana Regulation Fund .................................. 100.00%
7518-0120 For state university and community college collaboration and
efficiency efforts through the Partnership to Advance Collaboration
and Efficiencies initiative .................................................................................. $300,000
7520-0424 For a health and welfare reserve for eligible personnel employed at
the community colleges and state universities ............................................. $7,131,153
University of Massachusetts.
7100-0200 For the operation of the University of Massachusetts; provided, that
not later than January 30, 2026, the university shall meet with the chairs
of the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
chairs of the joint committee on higher education to review: (i) the 5-
year projected spending plan for academic years 2025 through
2030, including anticipated cost savings initiatives and efforts to
reduce student tuition and fees; and (ii) a comprehensive report on
spending over the previous academic year; provided further, that the
report shall include, but not be limited to: (a) personnel costs,
163

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
delineated by staff type and type of pay, including, but not limited to,
base pay and bonus pay; (b) the number of full-time equivalent
employees, delineated by staff type; (c) non-instructional
administrative costs; (d) costs related to asset management and
acquisition; (e) annual enrollment growth; (f) annual tuition and fee
growth; (g) fee structure; (h) expenditures on direct student financial
aid; and (i) average financial aid award per financial aid recipient;
provided further, that funding for each center and institute at the
University of Massachusetts at Boston shall be provided at an amount
not less than in fiscal year 2018; provided further, that if, as a result of
extraordinary or unforeseen circumstances, the university deems it
necessary to reduce funding to any of said institutions, the university
shall submit a report detailing: (1) the reasons for such reductions; (2)
all steps taken to avoid such reductions including, but not limited to,
the identification of other sources of existing funds, raising of new
revenues and the pursuit of savings initiatives and efficiencies; and (3)
a mitigation plan to ameliorate the effects on students and university
staff of such reductions, for which input from students and university
staff shall be solicited; provided further, that the report shall be
submitted to the joint committee on higher education and the house
and senate committees on ways and means not less than 120 days
prior to any such funding reduction or institutional closure; provided
further, that not later than January 2, 2026, the University of
Massachusetts at Boston shall submit a report to the joint committee
on higher education and the house and senate committees on ways
and means detailing the progress made implementing the April 2019
taskforce on centers and institutes' recommendations; provided
further, that the university shall expend funds for the University of
Massachusetts at Amherst Cranberry Station; provided further, that
the university shall expend funds for the operation of the
Massachusetts office of public collaboration at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston; provided further, that not less than
$15,000 shall be expended for the University of Massachusetts at
Amherst health services to support access to women's health care;
and provided further, that not less than $4,000,000 shall be expended
by the university on student behavioral health services including, but
not limited to, crisis services, therapy, the assessment of learning
disorders, responses to sexual assault, substance use disorder
services and assistance to students struggling with stress, anxiety or
other mental health needs ........................................................................ $835,000,000
General Fund ......................................................... 99.51%
Education Fund ....................................................... 0.49%
7100-0700 For the operation of the community mediation center grant program
administered by the office of public collaboration at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston under section 47 of chapter 75 of the
General Laws; provided, that funding from this item shall be made
available for pre-court mediation services to promote housing
stabilization; and provided further, that not less than $200,000 shall be
expended for the Massachusetts prisoner re-entry mediation
program, prior appropriation continued ........................................................ $3,213,465
7100-0702 For the Institute for Asian American Studies at the University of
Massachusetts at Boston to study the history and experiences of
anti-Asian racism in the United States and in the commonwealth .................. $300,000
164

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
7100-0903 For the University of Massachusetts SUCCESS grant program to
provide wraparound supports and services to improve outcomes for
their most vulnerable populations, including, but not limited to, low-
income, first-generation, minority and disabled students and lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning students; provided
further, that eligible wraparound support activities shall include, but not
be limited to, peer mentors, academic skills workshops, and targeted
academic, career, transfer and scholarship advising; provided further,
that funds may be expended for programs or activities during the
summer months; and provided further, that not later than April 1, 2026,
the university shall report to the joint committee on higher education
and the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
progress made on implementing and funding this program, including
any regulations, guidelines or criteria used to distribute the funds, and
on the final distribution of funds to campuses ............................................ $10,000,000
State Universities.
7109-0100 For Bridgewater State University ................................................................ $69,694,667
7110-0100 For Fitchburg State University ..................................................................... $42,958,315
7112-0100 For Framingham State University ............................................................... $42,090,534
7113-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts ............................................ $23,435,787
7114-0100 For Salem State University ......................................................................... $64,051,675
7115-0100 For Westfield State University ..................................................................... $40,384,332
7116-0100 For Worcester State University ................................................................... $39,993,390
7117-0100 For the Massachusetts College of Art and Design ...................................... $26,409,532
7118-0100 For the Massachusetts Maritime Academy ................................................. $24,872,741
Community Colleges.
7502-0100 For Berkshire Community College .............................................................. $15,120,176
7503-0100 For Bristol Community College ................................................................... $31,198,494
7504-0100 For Cape Cod Community College ............................................................. $16,941,124
7505-0100 For Greenfield Community College ............................................................. $14,861,810
7506-0100 For Holyoke Community College ............................................................. $27,569,822
7507-0100 For Massachusetts Bay Community College ............................................. $22,335,358
7508-0100 For Massasoit Community College ............................................................. $29,446,844
7509-0100 For Mount Wachusett Community College ................................................. $20,670,329
165

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7509-0101 For the Senator Stephen M. Brewer Center for Civic Learning and
Community Engagement at Mount Wachusett Community College to
increase service learning and volunteerism in the north central
Massachusetts region of the commonwealth, to support the
development of a food pantry and other emergency services for
students at risk of dropping out due to financial circumstances, for
deliberative dialogues within the community addressing issues of
concern within society and for programmatic development, updates
and technologies within the center .................................................................. $150,000
7510-0100 For Northern Essex Community College ..................................................... $27,135,470
7511-0100 For North Shore Community College .......................................................... $29,852,724
7512-0100 For Quinsigamond Community College ...................................................... $30,327,423
7514-0100 For Springfield Technical Community College ............................................ $33,906,201
7515-0100 For Roxbury Community College ............................................................... $14,822,249
7515-0120 For the operation of the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center
at Roxbury Community College .................................................................... $2,028,694
7515-0121 For the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at Roxbury
Community College; provided, that the college may expend an amount
not to exceed $2,500,000 received from fees, rentals and facility
expenses associated with the running and operation of national track
meets, high school track meets, high school dual meets, Roxbury
Community College athletic events and other special athletic events,
conferences, meetings and programs; provided further, that only
expenses for contracted services associated with these events, event
staff, utilities and capital needs of the facility shall be funded from this
item; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the college may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $2,500,000
7516-0100 For Middlesex Community College ............................................................. $32,578,673
7518-0100 For Bunker Hill Community College .......................................................... $37,724,696
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0038 For the operation of a witness protection program under chapter 263A
of the General Laws ......................................................................................... $247,500
8000-0070 For the research and analysis of the committee on criminal justice,
established in section 156 of chapter 6 of the General Laws; provided,
that funds may be expended to support the work of the Massachusetts
166

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
sentencing commission, established in section 1 of chapter 211E of
the General Laws ............................................................................................. $140,447
8000-0202 For the purchase and distribution of sexual assault evidence collection
kits ...................................................................................................................... $92,695
8000-0313 For local public safety projects and grant programs ....................................... $100,000
8000-0600 For the office of the secretary of public safety and security, including
the highway safety bureau, to provide matching funds for a planning
and administration grant under 23 U.S.C. section 402 and the costs
associated with the implementation of chapter 122 of the acts of 2019;
provided, that the executive office of public safety and security staff
may provide administrative processing for departments under the
executive office’s purview; provided further, that not less than
$3,126,872 shall be provided for the Boston, Cambridge and Everett
fire department hazardous material response teams; and provided
further, that local police departments, sheriffs’ offices, the department
of state police, the department of correction and other state agencies,
authorities and educational institutions with law enforcement functions
as determined by the secretary that receive funds for the cost of the
replacement of bulletproof vests through the office of the secretary may
expend without further appropriation these funds to purchase
additional vests in the fiscal year in which they receive such
reimbursements .......................................................................................... $10,218,277
8000-0655 For a grant program to be administered by the executive office of
public safety and security for emerging adults re-entry programs to
reduce recidivism among individuals between the ages of 18 and 25,
inclusive, who are returning to the community from state prisons and
county correctional facilities; provided, that the secretary of public
safety and security shall distribute funds through a competitive
grant program; provided further, that grants shall be awarded to
applicants that: (i) are community-based nonprofit programs; (ii) have
a demonstrated commitment from the department of correction or a
sheriff’s office to work collaboratively to deliver services in their
respective facilities; (iii) provide both pre-release and post-release
services to individuals between the ages of 18 and 25, inclusive, who
are returning to the community from state prisons and county
correctional facilities including, but not limited to, probationers and
parolees; (iv) provide a continuum of programming from state prisons
or county correctional facilities into the community; (v) provide pre-
release services for all participating individuals that include transition
plans, education programs, workforce readiness and life skills
programs and counseling; (vi) provide post-release services that
include case management for not less than 12 months after
participating individuals have been released; and (vii) provide a plan
for ensuring that proposed programs shall be implemented with
adherence to a research-based, evidence-based or evidence-
informed program design; provided further, that not more than 6 grants
shall be awarded; provided further, that not more than 7.5 per cent of
the total appropriation in this item shall be used to provide
administrative support and training to grantees, including program
design, technical assistance and program evaluation, and to provide
training and technical assistance to any other organization or
institution working on emerging adult justice initiatives; provided
167

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
further, that contracts for grantees may be awarded for periods of not
more than 5 years; and provided further, that not later than March 3,
2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to, the: (a) successful grant applications and the services they provide;
(b) amount of funds awarded to each grantee; (c) criteria used to
evaluate grant applications; (d) number of participants served by each
program and the communities they are returning to; and (e) outcomes
and recidivism rates of the participants in each of the programs, prior
appropriation continued ................................................................................ $7,037,347
8000-1001 For the Boston regional intelligence center, or BRIC, to upgrade,
expand and integrate technology and protocols related to anti-
terrorism, anti-crime, anti-gang and emergency response; provided,
that intelligence developed shall be shared with the BRIC communities
and other state, municipal and federal agencies as necessary; and
provided further, that the BRIC shall provide technology required to
access the intelligence with its municipal partners, the department of
state police, the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, the
Massachusetts Port Authority and appropriate federal agencies to
assure maximum interagency collaboration for public safety and
homeland security ............................................................................................ $750,000
8000-1127 For a nonprofit security grant program to provide support for target
hardening and other security enhancements to nonprofit organizations
that are at high risk of terrorist attacks or hate crimes, as defined under
section 32 of chapter 22C of the General Laws; provided, that
prioritization shall be given to nonprofit organizations that have
experienced instances of terrorist attacks or hate crimes, as defined
in said section 32 of said chapter 22C; provided further, that: (i) at least
1 such grant shall be awarded to a nonprofit organization in the
eastern region of the commonwealth; (ii) at least 1 such grant shall be
awarded to a nonprofit organization in the central region of the
commonwealth; and (iii) at least 1 such grant shall be awarded to a
nonprofit organization in the western region of the commonwealth;
and provided further, that the grants shall be distributed in a
geographically equitable manner across the eastern, central and
western regions of the commonwealth ......................................................... $4,000,000
8000-1213 For the school of reentry; provided, that funds may be spent on the
credible messenger program ........................................................................ $1,385,656
8000-1225 For the operation of the office of grants and research .................................... $290,261
8000-1700 For the provision of information technology services within the
executive office of public safety and security .............................................. $22,756,953
8100-0111 For a grant program to be known as the Senator Charles E. Shannon,
Jr. community safety initiative, to be administered by the executive
office of public safety and security to support regional, multidisciplinary
approaches to combat gang violence through coordinated programs for
prevention and intervention, coordinated law enforcement, including
regional gang task forces and regional crime mapping strategies,
focused prosecutions and reintegration strategies for formerly
incarcerated persons; provided, that the secretary of public safety and
security shall distribute grant funds through a competitive grant
168

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
program that gives preference to applications that: (i) demonstrate
high levels of youth violence, gang problems and substance use in a
region; (ii) demonstrate a commitment to regional, multi-jurisdictional
strategies to deal with such community safety issues, including written
commitments for municipalities, law enforcement agencies,
community-based organizations and government agencies to work
together; (iii) clearly outline a comprehensive plan that establishes
measurable outcomes for municipalities to work with law enforcement,
community-based organizations and government agencies to address
gang activity; (iv) outline measurable outcomes that demonstrate
program success, detail a plan for collecting data related to achieving
said measurable outcomes and commit to sharing the data with the
executive office; (v) make a written commitment to match grant funds
with a 25 per cent match provided by either municipal or private
contributions; and (vi) identify a local governmental unit to serve as
the fiscal agent; provided further, that clusters of municipalities, in
partnership with nonprofit organizations and other agencies, including
district attorneys’ offices, may apply for such grant funds; provided
further, that such grant funds shall be considered 1-time grants
awarded to public agencies and shall not annualize into fiscal year
2027 or subsequent years; provided further, that administrative costs
for successful grant applications shall not exceed 10 per cent of the
value of the grant; provided further, that no grant funds shall be
awarded to the department of state police; provided further, that not
later than August 15, 2025, the executive office shall publish
guidelines and an application for the competitive portion of the grant
fund program; provided further, that not later than December 16, 2025,
grant funds shall be made available to applicants; provided further,
that not later than 60 days after the distribution of grant funds, the
executive office shall submit a report that details the distribution of
grant funds to the executive office for administration and finance and
the house and senate committees on ways and means; and provided
further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the office shall submit a
report to the house and senate committees on ways and means that
shall include, but not be limited to: (a) the number of young adults
served by the grant program during fiscal year 2026; (b) executive
summaries of the programs currently operating under the grant
program; and (c) outcomes and findings that demonstrate program
success from the grant awards from fiscal year 2025 .................................. $10,087,424
Chief Medical Examiner.
8000-0105 For the operation of the office of the chief medical examiner established
in section 2 of chapter 38 of the General Laws; provided, that not later
than January 16, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (i) the current caseload of the office and each of its medical
examiners and the caseload for fiscal year 2025; (ii) the number of
procedures performed in fiscal year 2025; (iii) the current turnaround
time and backlogs; (iv) the current response time to scenes; (v) the
number of cases completed in fiscal year 2025; (vi) the current status
of accreditation with the National Association of Medical Examiners;
(vii) progress in identification and completion of reports; and (viii)
progress in improving delays in decedent release ...................................... $19,921,742
169

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8000-0122 For the office of the chief medical examiner, which may expend for its
operations not more than $8,646,885 in revenues collected from
services provided by the office; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $8,646,885
Department of Criminal Justice Information Services.
8000-0110 For the operation of the department of criminal justice information
services, including criminal justice information services, criminal
offender record information services, firearms support services and
victim services; provided, that funds may be expended to enable
housing authorities to have access to criminal offender record
information when qualifying applicants for state-assisted housing ............. $3,431,849
8000-0111 For the operation of the public safety information system and the
criminal records review board within the department of criminal justice
information services, which may expend for the operation of the board
not more than $6,323,675 in revenues collected from services
provided by the board; provided, that funding from this item may be
retained and expended from revenues charged and collected under
section 172A of chapter 6 of the General Laws; provided further, that
funds may be expended to assist formerly incarcerated persons in
obtaining and maintaining employment and to provide education and
assistance regarding criminal records under said section 172A of said
chapter 6; provided further, that the commissioner of criminal justice
information services may make funds from this item available for a
competitive grant process to provide such training and education;
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the board may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system; and provided
further, that any unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall
be made available for this item until June 30, 2027 ..................................... $6,323,675
Sex Offender Registry.
8000-0125 For the operation of the sex offender registry including, but not limited
to, the costs of maintaining a computerized registry system and the
classification of persons subject to the registry; provided, that the
registration fee paid by convicted sex offenders under section 178Q
of chapter 6 of the General Laws shall be retained and expended by
the sex offender registry board; and provided further, that not later than
December 16, 2025, the sex offender registry shall submit a report to
the house and senate committees on ways and means outlining: (i) the
utilization of data-sharing agreements with state agencies to find
addresses of offenders that are out of compliance; (ii) plans to establish
new data-sharing agreements with other executive branch agencies;
and (iii) detailed plans to improve overall data collection and registry
maintenance to enhance public safety ......................................................... $7,477,002
170

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Department of State Police.
8100-0006 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of
private police details, including administrative costs, not more
than $52,000,000 from revenues collected for such details; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................. $52,000,000
8100-0012 For the department of state police, which may expend for the costs of
security services provided by state police officers, including overtime
and administrative costs, not more than $3,500,000 from revenues
charged for said services; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of revenues and related expenditures, the
department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .......................................................................................................... $3,500,000
8100-0018 For the department of state police, which may expend not more
than $3,205,922 from revenues collected for certain police activities
provided under agreements authorized in this item; provided, that for
fiscal year 2026, the colonel of the state police may enter into service
agreements with the commanding officer or other person in charge of
a military reservation of the United States located within the
Massachusetts development finance agency and any other service
agreements as necessary to enhance the protection of persons, assets
and infrastructure from possible external threat or activity; provided
further, that said agreements shall establish the responsibilities
pertaining to the operation and maintenance of police services
including, but not limited to: (i) provisions governing payment to the
department for the cost of regular salaries, overtime, retirement and
other employee benefits; and (ii) provisions governing payment to the
department for the cost of furnishings and equipment necessary to
provide the police services; provided further, that the department may
charge any recipients of police services for the cost of the services
under this item; provided further, that the colonel may expend from this
item for costs associated with joint federal and state law enforcement
activities from federal reimbursements received; and provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................... $3,205,922
8100-0102 For the costs associated with state police personnel assigned to the
Massachusetts port authority, which may expend for the costs of
police activities provided by state police officers, including overtime
and administrative costs, not more than $52,000,000 from revenues
collected for such activities; provided, that notwithstanding any
171

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the department of state police may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system ..................................................... $52,000,000
8100-0515 For the expenses of hiring, equipping and training state police recruits
to maintain appropriate staffing levels for the state police; provided,
that funds shall be expended to promote diversity and inclusion in the
hiring of police recruits; and provided further, that funds shall be
expended to implement comprehensive racial bias training within the
department of state police to address racial inequities in policing
practices ..................................................................................................... $10,539,485
8100-1001 For the administration and operation of the department of state police;
provided, that the department shall expend funds from this item to
maximize federal grants for the operation of a counter-terrorism unit
and the payment of overtime for state police officers; provided further,
that the department shall maintain the division of field services, which
shall include, but not be limited to, the bureau of metropolitan district
operations; provided further, that not less than 40 officers shall be
provided to the department of conservation and recreation to patrol its
watershed property; provided further, that the department of state
police shall enter into an interagency agreement with the department
of conservation and recreation to provide police coverage on
department of conservation and recreation properties and parkways;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for the administration
and operation of an automated fingerprint identification system and for
the motor carrier safety assistance program; provided further, that the
creation of a new or an expansion of the existing statewide
communications network shall include the office of law enforcement in
the executive office of energy and environmental affairs at no cost to or
compensation from the executive office; provided further, that the
department of state police may expend funds from this item for the
administration of budgetary, procurement, fiscal, human resources,
payroll and other administrative services of the office of the chief
medical examiner, the municipal police training committee and the
department of criminal justice information services; provided further,
that the department shall submit quarterly reports to the house and
senate committees on ways and means; and provided further, that
each report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the total
compensation paid to each trooper, delineated by category of payout;
(ii) the total compensation paid to each troop in the aggregate,
delineated by regular and overtime compensation; (iii) the average
hours of overtime accumulated, delineated by trooper and reason for
the use of overtime; (iv) the average hours of overtime accumulated,
delineated by troop in the aggregate; and (v) a detailed plan outlining
steps to decrease overtime usage and increase accountability and
oversight within the department ......................................................................$403,696,893
State Police Crime Laboratory.
8100-1004 For the operation and related costs of the state police crime laboratory,
including the analysis of samples used in the prosecution of controlled
substance offenses conducted at the former department of public
172

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
health facilities; provided, that the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic
substitutes, poisons, drugs, medicines and chemicals shall be funded
from this item in order to support the law enforcement efforts of the
district attorneys, the state police and municipal police departments;
provided further, that the practices and procedures of the state police
crime laboratory shall be informed by the recommendations of the
forensic science oversight board; provided further, that the department
of state police shall submit quarterly reports to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) the caseload of each lab; (ii) all relevant information regarding
turnaround time and backlogs by type of case; and (iii) the
accreditation status of each lab; provided further, that not later than
October 3, 2025, the first such report shall be submitted; provided
further, that funds shall be spent on phase II of the processing of
sexual assault evidence kits; and provided further, that not later than
March 3, 2026 the state police shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to: (a) the status of phase II of the processing of sexual assault
evidence kits; (b) an anticipated timeline for completion of phase II;
and (c) the year to date cost of processing sexual assault evidence
kits as part of phase II ................................................................................ $29,901,640
8100-1005 For the analysis of narcotic drug synthetic substitutes, poisons, drugs,
medicines and chemicals at the University of Massachusetts medical
school in order to support the law enforcement efforts of the district
attorneys, the state police and municipal police departments ......................... $686,677
Municipal Police Training Committee.
8200-0200 For the operation of veteran, reserve and in-service training programs
conducted by the municipal police training committee; provided, that
no expenditures authorized by this item shall be charged to item 8200-
0222 ............................................................................................................ $18,828,286
General Fund ......................................................... 96.49%
Public Safety Training Fund ......................................... 3.51%
8200-0222 For the municipal police training committee, which may collect and
expend not more than $5,600,000 to provide training to new recruits;
provided, that the committee shall charge $3,200 per recruit for the
training; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special
law to the contrary, the committee shall charge a fee of $3,200 per
person for training programs operated by the committee for all persons
who begin training not later than July 1, 2025; provided further, that said
fee shall be retained and expended by the committee; provided further,
that the trainee or, if the trainee is a recruit, the municipality in which
the recruit shall serve, shall provide the fee in full to the committee not
later than the first day of orientation for the program in which the
trainee or recruit has enrolled; provided further, that no recruit or
person shall begin training unless the municipality or the person has
provided the fee in full to the committee; provided further, that for
recruits of municipalities, upon the completion of the program, the
municipality shall deduct the fee from the recruit’s wages in 23 equal
monthly installments unless otherwise negotiated between the recruit
and the municipality in which the recruit shall serve; provided further,
that if a recruit withdraws from the training program before graduation,
173

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
the committee shall refund the municipality in which the recruit was to
have served a portion of the fee according to the following schedule:
(i) if a recruit withdraws from the program before the start of week 2, 75
per cent of the fee shall be refunded; (ii) if a recruit withdraws from the
program after the start of week 2 but before the start of week 3, 50 per
cent of the fee shall be refunded; (iii) if a recruit withdraws from the
program after the start of week 3 but before the start of week 4, 25 per
cent of the fee shall be refunded; and (iv) if a recruit withdraws after the
start of week 4, the fee shall not be refunded; provided further, that a
recruit who withdraws from the program shall pay the municipality in
which the recruit was to have served the difference between the fee
and the amount forfeited by the municipality according to the schedule;
provided further, that the schedule shall also apply to trainees other
than recruits who enroll in the program; provided further, that no
expenditures shall be charged to this item that are not directly related
to new recruit training; provided further, that no expenditures shall be
charged to this item that are related to chief, veteran, in-service or
reserve training or any training not directly related to new recruits;
provided further, that the committee shall submit a report on the status
of recruit training, including the number of classes, start and end dates
of each class, total number of recruits enrolled and graduating in each
class, cost per recruit and cost per class for fiscal years 2025 and
2026; provided further, that not later than January 8, 2026, the report
shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and
means; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the committee may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .......................................................................................................... $5,600,000
Department of Fire Services.
8324-0000 For the administration of the department of fire services, including the
office of the state fire marshal, the hazardous materials emergency
response program, the board of fire prevention regulations established
in section 4 of chapter 22D of the General Laws, the expenses of the
fire safety commission and the Massachusetts firefighting academy,
including the Massachusetts fire training council certification
program, municipal and non-municipal fire training and expenses of
the council; provided, that the fire training program shall use the split
days option; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated
in this item for the administration of the department of fire services, the
office of the state fire marshal, the Massachusetts firefighting
academy, critical incident stress management programs, the On-Site
Academy, other fire department training academies, the regional
dispatch centers, the radio and dispatch center improvements and the
associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from this item for
these purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies writing
fire, homeowners multiple peril or commercial multiple peril policies on
property situated in the commonwealth and paid within 30 days after
receiving notice of this assessment from the commissioner of
insurance; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the amount appropriated in
174

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
item 8100-1001 for all purposes related to fire and arson investigation
shall be assessed upon insurance companies writing fire,
homeowners multiple peril or commercial multiple peril policies on
property situated in the commonwealth, and paid within 30 days after
receiving notice of this assessment from the commissioner of
insurance; provided further, that not more than 10 per cent of the
amount designated for the arson prevention program shall be
expended for the administrative cost of the program; provided further,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, 100 per
cent of the amount appropriated in this item for the operation of the
hazardous materials emergency response program and the
associated fringe benefit costs of personnel paid from this item for
these purposes shall be assessed upon insurance companies writing
commercial multiple peril, non-liability portion policies on property
situated in the commonwealth and commercial auto liability policies as
referenced in line 5.1 and line 19.4, respectively, in the most recent
annual statement on file with the commissioner of insurance; provided
further, that not less than $100,000 shall be allocated by the
department for critical incident stress management; provided further,
that not less than $2,000,000 shall be allocated by the department for
the student awareness fire education program; and provided further,
that not less than $500,000 shall be allocated by the department for
On-Site Academy for critical incident stress management services .......... $43,236,398
8324-0050 For the commonwealth’s local fire departments .............................................. $100,000
8324-0304 For the department of fire services, which may expend for
enforcement and training not more than $8,500 from revenue
generated under chapter 148A of the General Laws; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......................................... $8,500
8324-0500 For the department of fire services, which may expend not more
than $2,325,060 in revenues collected from fees for annual issuance
of boiler and pressure vessel certificates and inspections; provided,
that funds shall be expended for the operation of the department and
to address the existing boiler and pressure vessel inspection backlog;
provided further, that funds shall be expended for hiring additional
engineering inspectors or engineers; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................... $2,325,060
Military Division.
8700-0001 For the operation of the military division, including the offices of the
adjutant general and state quartermaster, the operation of the
armories, the Camp Curtis Guild rifle range and certain national guard
aviation facilities; provided, that notwithstanding chapter 30 of the
175

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
General Laws, certain military personnel in the military division may
be paid salaries according to military pay grades; provided further, that
the division may expend funds appropriated in this item for the
administration of budgetary, procurement, fiscal, human resources,
payroll and other administrative services; and provided further, that the
adjutant general shall maintain a roster of Massachusetts veterans as
directed by section 15 of chapter 33 of the General Laws ......................... $14,416,796
8700-1140 For the military division, which may expend for the costs of national
guard missions and division operations not more than $1,900,000
from revenues collected for the nonmilitary rental or use of armories
and from reimbursements generated by national guard missions;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt
of retained revenues and related expenditures, the division may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................... $1,900,000
8700-1150 For reimbursement of the costs of the national guard tuition and fee
waivers under section 19 of chapter 15A of the General Laws;
provided, that no funds shall be distributed from this item before
certification by the state universities, community colleges and the
University of Massachusetts of the actual amount of tuition and fees
waived for national guard members attending public institutions of
higher education under said section 19 of said chapter 15A that would
otherwise have been retained by the campuses according to
procedures and regulations promulgated by the military division;
provided further, that funds from this item may be expended for the
reimbursement of the tuition and fees waived for classes taken during
the summer months; and provided further, that the funds appropriated
under this item shall not revert but shall be made available for these
purposes until June 30, 2027 ....................................................................... $8,028,077
8700-1160 For life insurance premiums under section 88B of chapter 33 of
the General Laws .......................................................................................... $1,165,204
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0001 For the operations of the Massachusetts emergency management
agency; provided, that expenditures from this item shall be contingent
upon the prior approval of the proper federal authorities; provided
further, that the funds appropriated under this item shall not revert but
shall be made available for these purposes through June 30, 2027;
provided further, that the comptroller may certify for payment amounts
not to exceed $5,000,000 in excess of the current appropriation; and
provided further, that such expenditures shall be approved by the
secretary of public safety and security, who shall cite a state of
emergency declaration for each approved expenditure, in consultation
with the secretary of administration and finance .......................................... $7,131,092
Department of Correction.
8900-0001 For the operation of the department of correction; provided, that not
later than January 6, 2026, the commissioner of correction and the
secretary of public safety and security shall report to the house and
176

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
public safety and homeland security on the point score compiled by
the department’s objective classification system for all prisoners
confined in each prison operated by the department; provided further,
that to maximize bed capacity and re-entry capability, the department
shall submit quarterly reports, utilizing standardized reporting
definitions developed mutually with the Massachusetts Sheriffs
Association, Inc. on caseload, admissions, classification, releases and
recidivism of all pre-trial, sentenced and federal incarcerated persons;
provided further, that the department shall submit the reports on a
quarterly basis not more than 30 days following the last day of the
quarter; provided further, that not less than $125,000 shall be
expended for the Disability Law Center, Inc. to monitor the efficacy of
service delivery reforms at Bridgewater state hospital, including units
at the Old Colony correctional center and the treatment center;
provided further, that the Disability Law Center, Inc. may investigate
the physical environment of said facilities, including infrastructure
issues, and may use methods including, but not limited to, testing and
sampling the physical and environmental conditions, whether or not
they are utilized by patients or incarcerated persons; provided further,
that the Disability Law Center, Inc. may monitor the continuity of care
for persons who are discharged from Bridgewater state hospital to
county correctional facilities or department of mental health facilities,
including assessment of the efficacy of admission, discharge and
transfer planning procedures and coordination between the
department of correction, Wellpath LLC, the department of mental
health and county correctional facilities; and provided further, that at
least once every 6 months, the Disability Law Center, Inc. shall report
on the impact of these reforms on those served at Bridgewater state
hospital to the joint committee on mental health, substance use and
recovery, the joint committee on the judiciary, the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the president of the senate and the
speaker of the house of representatives ................................................ $815,508,325
8900-0002 For the operation of the Massachusetts Alcohol and Substance
Abuse Center .............................................................................................. $24,521,860
8900-0003 For the implementation of mandated reforms to mental and behavioral
health and residential treatment related to the department of
correction under chapter 69 of the acts of 2018; provided, that funds
from this item may be expended for contracted service providers
specializing in relevant areas including, but not limited to, behavioral
health and residential treatment; and provided further, that said funds
shall only be expended in the AA or DD object classes if said funds are
to be utilized for counselors, teachers, mental health personnel,
medical personnel or additional legal staff ................................................... $5,030,034
8900-0010 For prison industries and farm services; provided, that the
commissioner of correction or a designee shall determine the cost of
manufacturing motor vehicle registration plates and certify to the
comptroller the amounts to be transferred from the Commonwealth
Transportation Fund established in section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the
General Laws to the department of correction revenue source; and
provided further, that not later than March 11, 2026 the department
shall submit a report to the executive office of public safety and
security, the joint committee on the judiciary, the joint committee on
177

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
public safety and homeland security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited
to: (i) a comprehensive quantitative analysis of the impact that the
program has on participating incarcerated persons as compared to
non-participating incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary
record while in custody, their recidivism rate after release and their
employment rate after release; (ii) information on the demographics of
participants; (iii) information on the customers of the program, including
whether they are a public entity, a private business or a nonprofit; and
(iv) the compensation rates for participants ................................................. $6,796,500
8900-0011 For the prison industries and farm services program, which may
expend for the operation of the program not more than $5,600,000 in
revenues collected from the sale of products, for materials, supplies,
equipment, maintenance of facilities and compensation of employees;
provided, that the commissioner of correction may allocate year-end
net profits to the cost of drug, substance use and rehabilitative
programming; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department of correction may incur expenses and the comptroller
may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system ............................................................................... $5,600,000
8900-0050 For the department of correction, which may expend not more
than $8,600,000 in revenues collected from existing assessments, and
the state criminal alien assistance program; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................... $8,600,000
8900-1100 For re-entry programs at the department of correction that are intended
to reduce recidivism rates; provided, that said programs shall be in
addition to such provided in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that
not later than January 15, 2026, the department shall report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means on re-entry
programming at the department; and provided further, that said report
shall include information on the type of programs provided and the
recidivism rate of the offenders who successfully completed said
programs....................................................................................................... $1,533,580
Parole Board.
8950-0001 For the operation of the parole board .......................................................... $25,787,435
8950-0002 For the victim and witness assistance program under chapter 258B of
the General Laws ............................................................................................. $263,037
Sheriffs.
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
178

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
8910-0102 For the operation of the Hampden sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $89,761,135
8910-0104 For the operation of a regional section 35 program, under section 35
of chapter 123 of the General Laws, in western Massachusetts for the
counties of Hampden, Hampshire, Worcester, Franklin and Berkshire
that provides involuntary commitment to a treatment facility for not
more than 90 days of an individual who has an addiction to alcohol or
drugs; provided, that the program shall be located in Hampden county
to provide treatment, case management, medical and mental health
services, withdrawal management and ongoing monitoring, medication
addiction treatment and safety and security staffing as well as release
planning and after care services; and provided further, that additional
costs associated with said program shall include medication, food,
clothing, medical needs and psychiatric services ...................................... $2,781,294
8910-1000 For the Hampden sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation
of a prison industries program not more than $3,631,251 in revenues
collected from the sale of products for materials, supplies, equipment,
maintenance of facilities, reimbursement for community service
projects and compensation of employees of the program; provided,
that not later than March 16, 2026, the office shall submit a report to
the executive office of public safety and security, the joint committee
on the judiciary, the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) a comprehensive
quantitative analysis of the impact that the program has on
participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-participating
incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rates after release and their employment rates
after release; (ii) information on the demographics of participants; (iii)
information on the customers of the program, including whether they
are a public entity, a private business or a nonprofit organization; and
(iv) the compensation rates for participants; and provided further, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system ....................................................... $3,631,251
179

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8910-1010 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization
unit to provide forensic mental health services within existing physical
facilities for incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities;
provided, that the unit shall be located in Hampden county to serve
the needs of incarcerated persons in the care of Berkshire, Franklin,
Hampden, Hampshire and Worcester counties; provided further, that
the services of the unit shall be made available to incarcerated persons
in the care of the department of correction; provided further, that the
Hampden sheriff’s office shall work in cooperation with the Middlesex
sheriff’s office to determine a standardized set of definitions and
measurements for patients at both regional behavioral evaluation and
stabilization units; provided further, that not later than February 9,
2026, the Hampden sheriff’s office, in cooperation with the department
of correction and the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc., shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i) number of
incarcerated persons in facilities located in counties that were provided
services in each unit; (ii) number of incarcerated persons in department
of correction facilities that were provided services in each unit; (iii)
alleviation of caseload at Bridgewater state hospital associated with
fewer incarcerated persons in the care of counties being attended to at
the hospital; (iv) estimated and projected cost savings in fiscal year
2026 to the sheriffs’ offices and the department of correction
associated with the regional units; and (v) deficiencies in addressing
the needs of incarcerated women; and provided further, that the
department of mental health shall maintain the monitoring and quality
review functions of the unit ........................................................................... $1,413,224
8910-1020 For costs related to department of correction incarcerated persons
with not more than 2 years of their sentence remaining who have
been transferred to the care of the Hampden sheriff’s office .......................... $667,691
8910-1030 For the operation of the western Massachusetts regional
women’s correctional center ......................................................................... $5,041,957
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0105 For the operation of the Worcester sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $60,011,322
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
180

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
8910-0107 For the operation of the Middlesex sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security, and the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that the
office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety
and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-
trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on
a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $78,200,889
8910-0450 For the Middlesex sheriff's office, which may expend not more
than $100,000 in revenues collected from public or private entities or
persons for community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................. $100,000
8910-1100 For the Middlesex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the operation
of a prison industries program not more than $75,000 in revenues
collected from the sale of products, for materials, supplies, equipment,
recyclable reimbursements, printing services, maintenance of facilities
and compensation of employees of said program; provided, that not
later than March 16, 2026, the office shall submit a report to the
executive office of public safety and security, the joint committee on
the judiciary, the joint committee on public safety and homeland
security and the house and senate committees on ways and means
that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) a comprehensive
quantitative analysis of the impact that the program has on
participating incarcerated persons as compared to non-participating
incarcerated persons, including their disciplinary record while in
custody, their recidivism rates after release and their employment
rates after release; (ii) information on the demographics of
participants; (iii) information on the customers of the program,
including whether they are a public entity, a private business or a
nonprofit organization; and (iv) the compensation rates for
participants; and provided further, that notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............... $75,000
8910-1101 For the operation of a regional behavioral evaluation and stabilization
unit to provide forensic mental health services within existing physical
facilities for incarcerated persons in the care of correctional facilities;
provided, that the unit shall be located in Middlesex county to serve
the needs of incarcerated persons in the care of the counties of
181

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Barnstable, Bristol, Dukes County, Essex, Nantucket, Middlesex,
Norfolk, Plymouth and Suffolk; provided further, that the services of
the unit shall be made available to incarcerated persons in the care of
the department of correction; provided further, that the Middlesex
sheriff’s office shall work in cooperation with the Hampden sheriff’s
office to determine a standardized set of definitions and
measurements for patients at both regional behavioral evaluation and
stabilization units; provided further, that not later than February 9,
2026, the Middlesex sheriff’s office, in cooperation with the
department of correction and the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association,
Inc., shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on
ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (i)
number of incarcerated persons in facilities located in counties that
were provided services in each unit; (ii) number of incarcerated
persons in department of correction facilities that were provided
services in each unit; (iii) alleviation of caseload at Bridgewater state
hospital associated with fewer incarcerated persons in the care of
counties being attended to at the hospital; and (iv) estimated and
projected cost savings in fiscal year 2026 to the sheriffs’ offices and the
department of correction associated with the regional units; and
provided further, that the department of mental health shall maintain
the monitoring and quality review functions of the unit ................................ $1,822,285
Hampshire Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0110 For the operation of the Hampshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and which shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $17,932,866
Berkshire Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0145 For the operation of the Berkshire sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; provided further, that not less than $50,000 shall be expended
182

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
for the Berkshire county opioid education and awareness task force;
and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of
all requirements under item 8910-7110 ...................................................... $21,259,340
8910-0155 For the operation of the Berkshire aquaponics program at the
Berkshire County house of correction .............................................................. $150,000
8910-0445 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend not more
than $100,000 in revenues generated from the operation of the
Berkshire county communication center’s 911 dispatch operations and
other law enforcement-related activities, including the Berkshire
sheriff’s prison industries program; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................. $100,000
8910-0760 For the Berkshire sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of
private police details, including administrative costs, an amount not
more than $1,500,000 from fees charged for such details; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or specific law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system.................................... $1,500,000
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0108 For the operation of the Franklin sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the office shall provide
relevant data to the executive office of public safety and security to
allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county
sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly
basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and shall
be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter;
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of
all requirements under item 8910-7110; provided further, that not less
than $100,000 shall be provided for a pilot program for training active
bystanders; and provided further, that not less than $150,000 shall be
expended for the Franklin county opioid education and awareness task
force ............................................................................................................ $21,232,907
Essex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0618 For the Essex sheriff’s office, which may expend for the costs of
private police details, including administrative costs, an amount not
183

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
more than $1,850,000 from fees charged for those details; provided,
that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the department may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system .................................... $1,850,000
8910-0619 For the operation of the Essex sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the
reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and
state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning
in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and shall be due not later
than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; and provided further,
that the office shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts Sheriffs
Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all requirements under
item 8910-7110 ........................................................................................... $88,984,867
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association.
8910-7110 For the operation of the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc.;
provided, that the sheriffs shall appoint persons to serve as executive
director, assistant executive director, research director and other staff
positions as necessary for the coordination and standardization of
services and programs, the collection and analysis of data related to
incarceration, recidivism and generation of reports, technical
assistance and training to ensure standardization in organization,
operations and procedures; provided further, that said staff shall not be
subject to section 45 of chapter 30 of the General Laws or chapter 31
of the General Laws and shall serve at the pleasure of a majority of the
sheriffs; provided further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the
executive director of the association shall submit a report to the house
and senate committees on ways and means detailing the amounts of
all grants awarded to each sheriff’s office in fiscal year 2025; provided
further, that the association shall post on its website the average daily
incarcerated persons population for the month by the fifteenth day of
the subsequent month; provided further, that not later than August 15,
2025, the first such post shall be completed; provided further, that
each sheriff’s office, in conjunction with the association, shall provide
specific data to the executive office of public safety and security to
allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county
sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly
basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and due
not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; provided
further, that each sheriff’s office shall submit said report directly to the
executive office for administration and finance, the house and senate
committees on ways and means, the joint committee on public safety
and homeland security, the executive office of public safety and
security, the association and the department of correction; provided
further, that not later than January 30, 2026, the association shall
184

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing, for each sheriff’s office: (i) all services and goods
provided to incarcerated persons in which the sheriff’s office receives
revenue; (ii) all fees imposed on incarcerated persons, delineated by
services or goods provided; (iii) the mechanism used to inform
incarcerated persons of such fees and of their opportunities to waive
certain fees; and (iv) all commissary and trust funds administered,
including the total revenues and expenditures for fiscal year 2025,
revenue projections for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 and the current
balances of such funds; and provided further, that all expenditures
made by the sheriffs’ offices shall be subject to chapter 29 of the
General Laws and recorded on the state accounting system ........................ $758,899
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8200 For the operation of the Barnstable sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county-sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $33,416,711
8910-8213 For the Barnstable sheriff's office, which may expend not more
than $1,500,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other
entities for regional emergency and public safety communication
services to support the operations, development, membership and
maintenance of the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system .......... $1,500,000
8910-8227 For the Barnstable sheriff's office, which may expend for the operation
of a prison industries program an amount not to exceed $50,000 from
revenues collected from the sale of prison industries products;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate, as reported in the state accounting
system ............................................................................................................... $50,000
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
185

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8910-8300 For the operation of the Bristol sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security, and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the office shall provide
relevant data to the executive office of public safety and security to
allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county
sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly
basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and shall
be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; and
provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data to the
Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of
all requirements under item 8910-7110 ...................................................... $62,061,753
Dukes County Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8400 For the operation of the Dukes County sheriff’s office; provided, that
not later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................... $3,936,521
8910-8401 For the Dukes County sheriff's office, which may expend not more
than $300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other
entities for regional emergency and public safety communication
services to support the operations, development, membership and
maintenance of the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............. $300,000
Nantucket Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8500 For the operation of the Nantucket sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security, and the house and
senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that the
office shall provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety
and security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-
186

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
trial, county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on
a quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 ........................................ $872,958
Norfolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8600 For the operation of the Norfolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the
reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and
state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning
in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and shall be due not later
than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; and provided further,
that the office shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts
Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all requirements
under item 8910-7110 ................................................................................ $40,680,876
8910-8629 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$55,430 in revenues collected from municipalities and other entities
for regional emergency and public safety communication services to
support the operations, development, membership and maintenance
of the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law
to the contrary, for the purposes of accommodating timing
discrepancies between the receipt of retained revenues and related
expenditures, the office may incur expenses and the comptroller may
certify for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this
authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the
state accounting system .................................................................................... $55,430
8910-8630 For the Norfolk sheriff's office, which may expend not more than
$160,000 in revenues collected from public or private entities or
persons for community programs; provided, that notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, for the purposes of
accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of retained
revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur expenses and
the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the
lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue estimate as
reported in the state accounting system .......................................................... $160,000
Plymouth Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8700 For the operation of the Plymouth sheriff’s office; provided, that not
later than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a
comprehensive inventory of all current programs and practices, in a
manner to be determined by the executive office of public safety and
security, to the executive office for administration and finance, the
executive office of public safety and security and the house and senate
committees on ways and means; provided further, that the office shall
187

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
provide relevant data to the executive office of public safety and
security to allow for the reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial,
county sentenced and state sentenced incarcerated persons on a
quarterly basis beginning in the quarter ending September 30, 2025
and shall be due not later than 30 days after the last day of each
quarter; and provided further, that the office shall provide relevant data
to the Massachusetts Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the
reporting of all requirements under item 8910-7110 .................................. $72,924,436
8910-8718 For the Plymouth sheriff's office, which may expend not more
than $300,000 in revenues collected from municipalities and other
entities for regional emergency and public safety communication
services to support the operations, development, membership and
maintenance of the office; provided, that notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, for accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
office may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment
amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the most
recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting system ............. $300,000
Suffolk Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8800 For the operation of the Suffolk sheriff’s office; provided, that not later
than December 16, 2025, the office shall provide a comprehensive
inventory of all current programs and practices, in a manner to be
determined by the executive office of public safety and security, to the
executive office for administration and finance, the executive office of
public safety and security and the house and senate committees on
ways and means; provided further, that the office shall provide relevant
data to the executive office of public safety and security to allow for the
reporting of recidivism rates for all pre-trial, county sentenced and
state sentenced incarcerated persons on a quarterly basis beginning
in the quarter ending September 30, 2025 and shall be due not later
than 30 days after the last day of each quarter; and provided further,
that the office shall provide relevant data to the Massachusetts
Sheriffs Association, Inc. to allow for the reporting of all requirements
under item 8910-7110 .............................................................................. $129,997,203
8910-8900 For the Suffolk sheriff's office, which may expend for the operation of
the Suffolk county regional lockup not more than $1,800,000 in
revenue; provided, that the office shall enter into agreements to
provide detention services to various law enforcement agencies and
municipalities and shall determine and collect fees for such detentions
from the law enforcement agencies and municipalities; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary,
for accommodating timing discrepancies between the receipt of
retained revenues and related expenditures, the office may incur
expenses and the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to
exceed the lower of this authorization or the most recent revenue
estimate as reported in the state accounting system ................................... $1,800,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.
Office of the Secretary.
188

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
9110-0100 For the operation of the executive office of aging and independence
and the regulation of assisted living facilities ............................................... $5,896,575
9110-0600 For health care services provided to MassHealth members who are
older adults eligible for community-based waiver services; provided,
that funds may be expended from this item for health care services
provided to recipients in prior fiscal years; provided further, that
subject to the assessed needs of consumers or the terms of the
waiver, the funding for benefits of community-based waiver services
shall not be reduced below the level of services provided in fiscal year
2025; provided further, that the eligibility requirements for this program
shall not be more restrictive than those established in fiscal year 2024;
provided further, that funds shall be expended from this item to
implement the pre-admission counseling and assessment program
under the fourth paragraph of section 9 of chapter 118E of the General
Laws, which shall be implemented on a statewide basis through the
Aging and Disability Resource Consortia; and provided further, that
funds from this item may be expended for the clinical assessment and
eligibility program and the comprehensive service and screening
model program .......................................................................................... $435,327,334
9110-1455 For the costs of the subsidized catastrophic prescription drug
insurance program established in section 39 of chapter 19A of the
General Laws and for the operations of the consolidated MassOptions,
prescription advantage and 800-age-info customer service centers;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary or unless otherwise prohibited by state or federal law,
prescription drug coverage or benefits payable by the executive office
of aging and independence and the entities with which it has contracted
for administration of the subsidized catastrophic prescription drug
insurance program under said section 39 of said chapter 19A shall be
the payer of last resort for this program for eligible persons with regard
to any other third-party prescription drug coverage or benefits available
to eligible persons; provided further, that the executive office shall take
steps for the coordination of benefits with the Medicare prescription
drug benefit created under the federal Medicare Prescription Drug,
Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Public Law 108-173, as
amended, to ensure that residents of the commonwealth take
advantage of this benefit; provided further, that residents shall also be
eligible to enroll in the program at any time within a year after reaching
age 65; provided further, that funds shall be expended for the
operation of the pharmacy outreach program under section 4C of said
chapter 19A; provided further, that the executive office shall seek to
obtain maximum federal funding for discounts on prescription drugs
available to the executive office and to prescription advantage
enrollees; provided further, that amounts received by the executive
office’s vendor as premium revenue for this program may be retained
and expended by the vendor for the program; provided further, that not
less than 90 days before any action to limit or cap the number of
enrollees in the program, the executive office shall notify the house
and senate committees on ways and means; provided further, that not
less than 30 days before any coverage or benefits expansions, the
executive office shall notify the house and senate committees on ways
and means; provided further, that not less than $1,000,000 shall be
expended for the Serving the Health Insurance Needs of Everyone, or
SHINE, program, administered by the executive office in partnership
189

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
with local community-based organizations including, but not limited to,
councils on aging, aging service access points and others, in order to
support the operational costs incurred by these programs; and
provided further, that the executive office shall allow those who meet
the program eligibility criteria to enroll in the program at any time
during the year ............................................................................................ $19,635,432
9110-1604 For the operation of the supportive senior housing program at state or
federally assisted housing sites; provided, that for fiscal year 2026 the
executive office shall maintain the same number of sites as in fiscal
year 2025, prior appropriation continued .................................................... $11,642,961
9110-1630 For the operation of the elder home care program, including contracts
with aging service access points or other qualified entities for the home
care program, home care, health aides, homemaker, personal care,
supportive home care aides, home health and respite services,
geriatric behavioral health services and other services provided to
older adults; provided, that sliding-scale fees shall be charged to
qualified older adults; provided further, that the secretary of aging and
independence may waive collection of sliding-scale fees in cases of
extreme financial hardship; provided further, that not more than
$16,000,000 in revenues accrued from sliding-scale fees shall be
retained by the individual home care organizations without reallocation
by the executive office of aging and independence and shall be
expended for the home care program, consistent with guidelines to be
issued by the executive office; provided further, that no rate increase
shall be awarded in fiscal year 2026 that would cause a reduction in
client services or the number of clients served; provided further, that
no funds shall be expended from this item to pay for salary increases
for direct service workers who provide state-funded homemaker and
home health aide services that would cause a reduction in client
services; provided further, that the secretary may transfer not more
than 3 per cent of the funds appropriated in this item to item 9110-
1633 for case management services and the administration of the
home care program; provided further, that the secretary shall expend
not less than $1,400,000 between this item and said item 9110-1633
on recipients of the home care over-income cost-sharing program;
provided further, that funding shall be expended for a contract with the
LGBTQIA+ Aging Project for provider training including, but not limited
to, home care and home health providers, councils on aging, skilled
nursing facilities and adult day health programs and outreach to gay,
lesbian, bisexual, transgender, queer and questioning older adults and
to caregivers ............................................................................................. $280,355,704
9110-1633 For the operation of the elder home care case management program,
including contracts with aging service access points or other qualified
entities for home care case management services and the
administration of the home care organizations funded through item
9110-1630; provided, that the contracts shall include the costs of
administrative personnel, home care case managers, travel, rent and
other costs deemed appropriate by the executive office of aging and
independence; and provided further, that the secretary of aging and
independence may transfer an amount not more than 3 per cent of
the funds appropriated in this item to item 9110-1630 ............................. $110,705,880
190

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
9110-1636 For the elder protective services program including, but not limited to,
protective services case management, guardianship services, the
statewide elder abuse hotline, money management services and the
elder-at-risk program ................................................................................... $49,625,111
9110-1637 For a grant program administered by the secretary of aging and
independence that focuses on advanced skill training for the home
care aide workforce that serves consumers of the elder home care
program administered by the department of aging and independence;
provided, that not later than March 3, 2026 the executive office of aging
and independence shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means detailing: (i) the number of students
currently enrolled in the online training program, outreach measures
to encourage enrollment; (ii) the cost of the course to students, the
number of students who have completed the course; and (iii) the
number of former students currently working as home care aides
in Massachusetts .......................................................................................... $1,195,525
9110-1640 For the geriatric mental health program, including outreach,
counseling, resource management and system navigation for
community-dwelling older adults with mental health needs ......................... $2,473,357
9110-1660 For congregate and shared housing services and naturally
occurring retirement communities for older adults; provided, that not
less than $856,000 shall be expended for providers of naturally
occurring retirement communities with whom the executive office of
aging and independence entered into service agreements in fiscal
year 2025 and shall maintain at proportions of total available funding
equal to those provided in fiscal year 2025................................................... $4,176,695
9110-1700 For assessment, placement and homelessness prevention services
for homeless and at-risk older adults ............................................................... $286,000
9110-1900 For the elder nutrition program; provided, that not less than the amount
appropriated in item 9110-1900 of section 2 of chapter 24 of the acts
of 2021 shall be expended for the senior farm share program ................... $12,657,217
9110-9002 For grants to the councils on aging and for grants to or contracts with
non-public entities which are consortia or associations of councils on
aging; provided, that notwithstanding the former proviso, all funds
appropriated in this item shall be expended under the distribution
schedules for formula and incentive grants established by the
secretary of aging and independence; provided further, that the
formula grant portion of this item shall be $16 per elder; and provided
further, that not later than February 6, 2026, the distribution schedules
shall be submitted to the house and senate committees on ways and
means ......................................................................................................... $29,522,592
LEGISLATURE.
Senate.
9500-0000 For the operation of the senate .................................................................. $30,730,075
House of Representatives.
191

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
9600-0000 For the operation of the house of representatives ..................................... $49,880,444
Joint Legislative Expenses.
9700-0000 For the joint operations of the legislature ................................................... $11,260,795
SECTION 2B.
SECTION 2B. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the agencies listed in this section
may expend the amounts listed in this section for the provision of services to agencies listed in section 2.
All expenditures made under this section shall be accompanied by a corresponding transfer of funds from
an account listed in said section 2 to the Intragovernmental Service Fund established in section 2Q of
chapter 29 of the General Laws. All revenues and other inflows shall be based on rates published by the
seller agency that are developed in accordance with cost principles established by the United States Office
of Management and Budget Circular A-87, Cost Principles for State, Local and Indian Tribal Governments.
All rates shall be published within 30 days after the effective date of this section. No expenditures shall be
made from the Intragovernmental Service Fund which would cause that fund to be in deficit at the close of
fiscal year 2026. All authorizations in this section shall be charged to the Intragovernmental Service Fund
and shall not be subject to section 5D of said chapter 29. Any balance remaining in that fund at the close
of fiscal year 2026 shall be transferred to the General Fund.
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0511-0003 For the costs of providing electronic and other publications purchased
from the state bookstore, for commission fees, notary fees and for
direct access to the secretary’s computer library .............................................. $16,000
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
0699-0018 For the cost of debt service for the clean energy investment program
and other projects or programs for which an agency has committed to
fund the associated debt service; provided, that the state treasurer
may charge other appropriations and federal grants for the cost of the
debt service ................................................................................................ $35,234,951
OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER.
1000-0005 For the cost of the single state audit for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026; provided, that the comptroller may charge other appropriations
and federal grants for the cost of the audit .................................................... $1,817,632
1000-0008 For the costs of operating and managing the state management
accounting and reporting system accounting system for fiscal year
2026; provided, that any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year
2026 in an amount not to exceed 5 per cent of the amount authorized
shall remain in the Intergovernmental Service Fund and is hereby
re-authorized for expenditures for such item in fiscal year 2027 .................. $4,556,136
1000-0601 For the office of the comptroller which may, on behalf of the office, the
human resources division and the executive office of technology
services and security, charge and collect from participating state
agencies a fee sufficient to cover administrative costs and expend
192

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
such fees for goods and services rendered in the administration of
the human resources compensation management system program ........... $2,442,905
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Office of the Secretary.
1100-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office for administration and finance ................................. $27,084,189
Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance.
1102-3224 For the costs for the Leverett Saltonstall building lease and
occupancy payments, as provided in chapter 237 of the acts of 2000 ....... $15,856,741
1102-3226 For the operation and maintenance of state buildings; provided, that
the division of capital asset management and maintenance may also
charge for reimbursement for overtime expenses, materials and
contract services purchased in performing renovations and related
services for agencies occupying state buildings or for services
rendered to approved entities using state facilities ................................... $14,255,568
Reserves.
1599-2040 For the payment of prior year deficiencies based upon schedules
provided to the executive office for administration and finance and the
house and senate committees on ways and means; provided, that
notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
comptroller may certify payments on behalf of departments for certain
contracted goods or services rendered in prior fiscal years for which
certain statutes, regulations or procedures were not properly followed;
provided further, that the department that was a party to the
transaction shall certify in writing that the services were performed or
goods delivered and shall provide additional information that the
comptroller may require; provided further, that the comptroller may
charge departments’ current fiscal year appropriations and transfer to
this item amounts equivalent to the amounts of any prior year
deficiency, subject to the conditions stated in this item; provided
further, that the comptroller shall assess a chargeback to that current
fiscal year appropriation that is for the same purpose as that to which
the prior year deficiency pertains or, if there is no appropriation for that
purpose, to that current fiscal year appropriation which is most similar
in purpose to the appropriation to which the prior year deficiency
pertains or is for the general administration of the department that
administered the appropriation to which the prior year deficiency
pertains; provided further, that no chargeback shall be made which
would cause a deficiency in any current fiscal year item; provided
further, that the comptroller shall report with such schedule a detailed
reason for the prior year deficiency on all chargebacks assessed that
exceed $10,000 including the amount of the chargeback, the item and
object class charged; provided further, that the comptroller shall report
on a quarterly basis on all chargebacks assessed, including the
amount of the chargeback, the item, object class charged and the
reason for the prior year deficiency; and provided further, that the
comptroller shall include in the schedules the amount of each prior
193

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
year deficiency paid, the fiscal year and appropriation to which it
pertained, the current fiscal year appropriation and object class to
which it was charged and the department's explanation for the failure
to make payment in a timely manner ........................................................ $50,000,000
1599-3100 For the cost of the commonwealth’s employer contributions to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund and the Medical Security Trust
Fund established in section 48 of chapter 151A of the General Laws;
provided, that the secretary of administration and finance shall
authorize the collection, accounting and payment of these
contributions; and provided further, that in executing these
responsibilities, the comptroller may charge, in addition to individual
appropriation accounts, certain non-appropriated funds in amounts
that are computed based on rates developed in accordance with the
Office of Management and Budget circular A-87, including expenses,
interest expense or related charges ........................................................... $38,000,000
1599-3101 For the cost of the commonwealth's employer contributions to the
Family and Employment Security Trust Fund established in section 7
of chapter 175M of the General Laws; provided, that the secretary of
administration and finance shall authorize the collection, accounting
and payment of these contributions; and provided further, that in
executing these responsibilities the comptroller may charge, in
addition to individual appropriation accounts, certain non-appropriated
funds in amounts that are computed based on rates developed in
accordance with the Office of Management and Budget circular A-
87, including expenses, interest expense and related charges ............... $50,000,000
Human Resources Division.
1750-0101 For the cost of goods and services rendered in administering training
programs, including the cost of training unit staff; provided, that the
human resources division shall charge to other items for the cost of
participants enrolled in programs sponsored by the division or to state
agencies employing such participants; provided further, that the
division may collect from participating state agencies a fee sufficient
to cover administrative costs of the commonwealth’s performance
recognition programs and to expend such fees for goods and services
rendered in the administration of these programs; provided further,
that the division may charge and collect from participating state
agencies a fee sufficient to cover administrative costs and expend
such fees for goods and services rendered in the administration of
information technology services related to the human resources
compensation management system program; and provided further,
that the division may charge and collect from participating state
agencies fees sufficient to cover the costs of shared services ........................ $367,343
1750-0105 For the cost of the commonwealth's workers’ compensation program,
including the workers' compensation litigation unit; provided, that the
secretary of administration and finance shall charge state agencies for
workers’ compensation costs, including related administrative
expenses, incurred on behalf of the employees of those agencies;
provided further, that the personnel administrator shall administer
those charges on behalf of the secretary and may establish
regulations considered necessary to implement this item; provided
further, that the personnel administrator shall notify agencies
194

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
regarding the chargeback methodology to be used in fiscal year 2026
and the amount of their estimated workers’ compensation charges and
shall require agencies to encumber sufficient funds to meet the
estimated charges, including any additional amounts considered
necessary under the regulations; provided further, that for any agency
that fails within 60 days of the effective date of this act to encumber
funds sufficient to meet the estimated charges, the comptroller shall
encumber funds on behalf of that agency; provided further, that the
personnel administrator shall: (i) determine the amount of the actual
workers’ compensation costs incurred by each agency in the
preceding month, including related administrative expenses; (ii) notify
each agency of those amounts; (iii) charge those amounts to each
agency's accounts as estimates of the costs to be incurred in the
current month; and (iv) transfer those amounts to this item; provided
further, that any unspent balance in this item at the close of fiscal year
2026 shall be re-authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2027; and
provided further, that prior year costs for hospital, physician, benefit
and other costs may be funded from this item ............................................ $66,007,132
1750-0106 For the workers’ compensation litigation unit, including the costs
of personnel .................................................................................................. $1,038,788
1750-0600 For the cost of core human resources administrative processing
functions ........................................................................................................ $3,476,920
Operational Services Division.
1775-0800 For the purchase, operation and repair of vehicles and for the cost
of operating and maintaining all vehicles that are leased by other
agencies, including the costs of personnel; provided, that any unspent
balance at the close of fiscal year 2026 shall remain in the
Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for that item
in fiscal year 2027 ......................................................................................... $8,161,573
1775-1000 For the provision of printing, photocopying, mailing and related graphic
art or design work, including all necessary incidental expenses and
liabilities ...................................................................................................... $11,162,432
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-0110 For the cost of central services provided to agencies of the executive
office of veterans’ services ................................................................................... $5,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY.
1790-0200 For the cost of computer resources and services provided by the
executive office of technology services and security; provided, that
any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2026 shall remain in
the Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the
item in fiscal year 2027 ............................................................................. $179,363,291
195

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
1790-0201 For the costs of any information technology or telecommunications
product, service or equipment incurred by the executive office of
technology services and security in delivering necessary information
technology and telecommunications services and products to its
customers, but not including any administrative costs; provided, that
any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2026 shall remain in
the Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the
item in fiscal year 2027 ............................................................................... $30,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office of energy and environmental affairs .......................... $6,557,316
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-0102 For the cost of transportation services for health and human services
clients and the operation of the health and human services
transportation office .................................................................................... $20,334,806
4000-0103 For the costs of core administrative functions performed within the
executive office of health and human services; provided, that the
secretary of health and human services, notwithstanding any general
or special law to the contrary, may identify administrative activities and
functions common to the separate agencies, departments, offices,
divisions and commissions within the executive office and may
designate those functions as core administrative functions in order to
improve administrative efficiency and preserve fiscal resources;
provided further, that common functions may be designated core
administrative functions including, but not limited to, human resources,
financial management, leasing and facility management; provided
further, that all employees performing functions so designated may
be employed by the executive office; provided further, that upon the
designation of a function as a core administrative function, the
employees of each agency, department, office or commission who
perform these core administrative functions may be transferred to the
executive office of health and human services; provided further, that
the executive office shall charge the agencies, departments, offices,
divisions and commissions for the services under this item; provided
further, that the reorganization shall not impair the civil service status
of any transferred employee who immediately before the effective date
of this act either holds a permanent appointment in a position
classified under chapter 31 of the General Laws or has tenure in a
position by reason of section 9A of chapter 30 of the General Laws;
and provided further, that nothing in this item shall impair or change
an employee’s status, rights or benefits under chapter 150E of the
General Laws .............................................................................................. $45,876,388
4000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office of health and human services .................................. $73,868,753
196

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
4125-0122 For the costs of interpreter services provided by commission staff;
provided, that the costs of personnel may be charged to this item; and
provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures, the
commission may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify for
payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or the
most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system .............................................................................................................. $450,000
4125-0124 For the costs of contracted communication access services incurred
by the commission for the deaf and hard of hearing to deliver
necessary communication access services to commonwealth
agencies, but not including any administrative costs; provided, that
any unspent balance at the close of fiscal year 2026 shall remain in the
Intragovernmental Service Fund and may be expended for the item in
fiscal year 2027 ............................................................................................. $6,000,000
Department of Public Health.
4510-0108 For the costs of pharmaceutical drugs and services provided by the
state office for pharmacy services; provided, that the state office shall
notify all agencies listed below of their obligations under this item by
December 30, 2025; provided further, that the state office shall
continue to be the sole provider of pharmacy services for the following
agencies currently under the state office: (i) the department of public
health; (ii) the department of mental health; (iii) the department of
developmental services; (iv) the department of correction; (v) the
sheriffs’ offices of Barnstable, Berkshire, Bristol, Essex, Franklin,
Hampden, Hampshire, Middlesex, Norfolk and Plymouth; and (vi) the
Soldiers’ Homes in the cities of Holyoke and Chelsea; provided further,
that the state office shall be the sole provider of pharmacy services for
all said agencies and all costs for pharmacy services shall be charged
by this item; provided further, that the state office shall become the sole
provider of pharmacy services to the sheriffs’ offices of Worcester and
Suffolk; provided further, that these agencies shall not charge or
contract with any other alternative vendor for pharmacy services other
than the state office; provided further, that the state office shall validate
previously-submitted pharmacy expenditures including HIV Drug
Assistance Program drug reimbursements during fiscal year
2026; provided further, that the state office shall continue to work to
reduce medication costs, provide standardized policies and
procedures in a clinically responsible manner, provide comprehensive
data analysis and improve the quality of clinical services; and provided
further, that not later than April 16, 2026, the state office shall submit
a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing recommendations for the inclusion of other entities that may
realize cost savings by joining the state office............................................. $71,052,404
4590-0901 For the costs of medical services provided at department of public
health hospitals and charged to other state agencies ...................................... $159,135
197

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4590-0903 For the costs of medical services provided at the department of public
health Lemuel Shattuck hospital to incarcerated persons in the care of
houses of correction; provided, that the costs shall be charged to items
8910-0102, 8910-0105, 8910-0107, 8910-0108, 8910-0110, 8910-
0145, 8910-0619, 8910-8200, 8910-8300, 8910-8400, 8910-8500,
8910-8600, 8910-8700, and 8910-8800 of section 2 .................................... $3,160,038
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-0018 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office of economic development ......................................... $6,864,065
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Office of the Secretary.
7009-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office of education ............................................................... $3,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-1701 For the cost of information technology services provided to agencies
of the executive office of public safety and security .................................... $11,464,504
Department of State Police.
8100-0002 For the costs associated with department of state police personnel
assigned to roadways of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, the district attorneys’ offices, the attorney general, the
Massachusetts gaming commission and other state agencies;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, for the purpose of accommodating timing discrepancies
between the receipt of retained revenues and related expenditures,
the department may incur expenses and the comptroller may certify
for payment amounts not to exceed the lower of this authorization or
the most recent revenue estimate as reported in the state accounting
system ......................................................................................................... $45,000,000
8100-0003 For the costs associated with the use and maintenance of the
statewide telecommunications system ............................................................ $156,375
Military Division.
8700-1145 For the costs of utilities and maintenance associated with state armory
rentals and related services and for the implementation of
energy conservation measures with regard to the state armories ................... $100,000
198

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Department of Correction.
8900-0021 For costs related to the production and distribution of products
produced by prison industries and for the costs of services provided by
incarcerated persons; provided, that the commissioner of correction
may allocate year-end net profits to the cost of drug, substance
abuse and rehabilitative programming ....................................................... $14,650,000
SECTION 2D.
SECTION 2D. The amounts set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Federal
Grants Fund. Federal funds received in excess of the amount appropriated in this section shall be expended
only in accordance with section 6B of chapter 29 of the General Laws. The amount of any unexpended
balance of federal grant funds received before June 30, 2025 and not included as part of an appropriation
item in this section is hereby made available for expenditure during fiscal year 2026 and shall be in addition
to any amount appropriated in this section.
JUDICIARY.
Supreme Judicial Court.
0320-1710 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Court Improvement Basic Grant ....................................................................... $643,450
Committee for Public Counsel Services.
0320-1808 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Collaboration to Correct Wrongful Convictions ..................... $101,613
0320-1809 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Postconviction Testing of DNA Evidence ....................................................... $515,968
0320-1810 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Collaboration to Correct Wrongful Convictions FY24 BJA Preventing
Wrongful Convictions Program Expansion ...................................................... $254,121
Trial Court.
0332-3201 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Chicopee and
Holyoke Access to Treatment and Services .................................................... $333,333
0332-3501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintain
Independence and Sobriety Through Systems Integration ............................. $392,241
0333-0123 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Guardianship:
Helping Vulnerable Adults Explore Alternatives to Traditional
Guardianship ..................................................................................................... $71,477
0337-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OJJDP FY 2021
Family Drug Program ...................................................................................... $392,937
0339-0612 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Project NORTH .......... $427,566
0339-1014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY21
Second Chance Act Pay for Success Initiative ............................................... $225,000
199

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
0339-1015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Improving
Reentry High-Tech Career Reentry Path Project ............................................ $300,000
DISTRICT ATTORNEYS.
Worcester District Attorney.
0340-0471 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Worcester
County Drug Diversion and Drug Endangered Children
(FCOSSAPDEC) .............................................................................................. $366,173
0340-0472 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Peer Recovery
Support Center ................................................................................................ $530,000
Plymouth District Attorney.
0340-0837 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY21 Sexual
Assault Kit Initiative (SAKI) ............................................................................... $561,956
0340-0841 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA
FY21 Comprehensive Opioid Abuse Program ................................................ $113,015
0340-0842 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Plymouth
County First Response to Substance Use & Recovery .................................... $431,003
0340-0843 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Human
Trafficking 2nd Round........................................................................................ $312,127
0340-0844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA FY24
National Community Courts Initiative .............................................................. $232,638
SECRETARY OF THE COMMONWEALTH.
0526-0113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Historic
Preservation Survey and Planning ................................................................ $1,157,066
0526-0118 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Maritime Heritage Grant Program .................................................................... $200,000
TREASURER AND RECEIVER GENERAL.
Massachusetts Cultural Council.
0640-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Folk and
Traditional Arts ................................................................................................... $35,000
0640-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Basic State Grant
......................................................................................................................... $829,100
0640-9718 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Arts in Education
........................................................................................................................... $62,900
200

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
0640-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Reach
State and Regional Programs .......................................................................... $282,900
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
Office of the Attorney General.
0810-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY21 COPS
Anti- Heroin Task Force Grant Program ....................................................... $3,889,492
0810-0024 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY21 COPS
Anti-Heroin Task Force Grant Program ........................................................ $1,558,000
0810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC
Task Force to Combat Human Trafficking ........................................................ $750,000
0810-0052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC
Task Force to Combat Human Trafficking ........................................................ $749,999
0810-0053 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 OVC
Victim Compensation Formula ...................................................................... $2,019,000
0810-0054 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 BJA
STOP School Violence Program ...................................................................... $997,672
0810-0060 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY22 OVC
Victim Compensation Formula ...................................................................... $1,669,000
Victim and Witness Assistance Board.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of Victims
of Crimes – Victim Assistance Formula ....................................................... $37,950,872
MASSACHUSETTS DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL.
1100-1702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Implementation
of the Federal Developmental Disabilities Act; provided, that in order
to qualify for said grant, this item shall be exempt from the first
$314,698 of fringe benefits and indirect cost charges under section 6B
of chapter 29 of the General Laws ................................................................. $1,552,698
1100-1704 For the purposes of a federally funded technical assistance grant
entitled, Maintain and Further Development of Developmental
Disabilities Suite; provided, that in order to qualify for said grant, this
item shall be exempt from the first $36,000 of fringe benefits and
indirect cost charges under section 6B of chapter 29 of the General
Laws ................................................................................................................. $100,000
1100-1713 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanding the
Public Health Workforce within the Disability Networks: State Councils
on Developmental Disabilities; provided, that in order to qualify for said
grant, this account shall be exempt from the first $4,800 of fringe
benefits and indirect cost charges pursuant to section 6B of chapter
29 of the General Laws ...................................................................................... $14,000
201

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Disabled Persons Protection Commission.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Victims of
Crime Act (VOCA) ......................................................................................... $901,451
9110-1089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Administration for Community Living (ACL) ...................................................... $34,882
9110-1199 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, EJAP Adult
Protective Services Formula Grants to States ................................................ $101,254
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
Massachusetts Office on Disability.
1107-2450 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Client
Assistance Program ........................................................................................ $230,000
Department of Revenue.
1201-0109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Access
and Visitation Program ..................................................................................... $179,442
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1410-2601 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cemetery
Expansion - Agawam .................................................................................... $2,044,214
1410-2602 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cemetery
Expansion - Winchendon.............................................................................. $1,694,506
Soldiers’ Home in Massachusetts.
4190-0400 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Consolidated Appropriations Act SVHs One Time Payment COVID ................ $512,203
4190-0401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, American
Rescue Plan Act SVHs One Time Payment COVID ..................................... $1,714,016
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
Office of the Secretary.
2000-0141 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Coastal Zone Management Program Implementation ......... $2,820,883
2000-0143 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Coastal
Zone Management ILJA Capacity ................................................................. $1,600,353
202

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Parks Service Land and Water Conservation Fund ....................................... $8,609,063
2000-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Buzzards
Bay Estuary Program .................................................................................... $3,500,000
2030-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Joint
Enforcement Agreement Between NOAA-OLE-Fisheries............................... $333,022
2030-0115 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Port Security
Grant Program ................................................................................................ $316,191
2030-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational
Boating Safety Program................................................................................ $2,522,202
Department of Public Utilities.
2100-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rail Fixed
Guideway Public Transportation System State Safety Oversight .................... $2,650,100
7006-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pipeline Security ....... $2,440,749
Department of Environmental Protection.
2200-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Water
Quality Management Planning ........................................................................ $770,225
2200-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Leaking
Underground Storage Tank Cooperative Agreement ......................................... $780,000
2200-9717 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Department
of Defense State Memorandum of Agreement ................................................ $776,493
2200-9724 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Superfund
Block Grant ...................................................................................................... $875,490
2200-9728 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfields
Assessment Program ....................................................................................... $260,000
2200-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
CERCLA 128(a) Response Program Cooperative Agreement for
MADE .............................................................................................................. $700,000
2200-9735 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Brownfield
Multipurpose CERCLA .................................................................................... $400,000
2230-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Performance Partnership Grant .................................................................. $16,000,000
2240-9790 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MassDEP
Disadvantaged Communities Drinking Water ..................................................... $30,140
2240-9791 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Long Island
Sound Project (LIJA) ..................................................................................... $3,000,000
203

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
2240-9792 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Small/Disadvantaged Comm Drinking Water Grant ......................................... $178,000
2240-9793 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASSDEP
Emerging Contaminants in Small or Disadvantaged Communities
Grant ............................................................................................................. $7,605,000
2240-9794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead Testing
in School and Child Care Drinking Water ......................................................... $250,451
2240-9795 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Small/Disadvantaged Comm Drinking Water Grant ......................................... $164,249
2240-9796 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, DEP 319 PPG
NPS/PPG ......................................................................................................... $786,159
2240-9797 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ENV Inf
Exchange Network ............................................................................................ $85,910
2240-9798 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, MassDEP EC-
SDC Grant Program #2 ................................................................................ $3,208,167
2250-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act
Section 103 ...................................................................................................... $115,587
2250-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts National Air Toxics Trend Station Program ............................... $19,857
2250-9726 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Homeland
Security Co-Op Agreement .............................................................................. $769,359
2250-9732 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Underground Storage Program ........................................................................ $178,879
2250-9744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Clean Diesel Program ...................................................................................... $567,814
2250-9746 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, NAAQS
Environmental Justice Communities .................................................................. $47,603
2250-9747 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Enhanced
Protection of Environmental Justice Populations in MA ...................................... $263,463
2250-9748 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recycle Smart
MA Initiative ........................................................................................................ $40,206
2250-9750 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Air Act
(IRA) ................................................................................................................ $442,750
Department of Fish and Game.
2310-0122 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Land Acquisition ....... $3,500,000
2310-0123 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Chronic
Wasting Disease Education Program, Prevent Strategies, MA ............................ $6,000
204

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2310-0124 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Windsor Brook
Wetland Restoration ........................................................................................ $650,000
2310-0125 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Assessing
Viability of NEWC Metapopulations ................................................................... $50,000
2330-9222 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Vessel
Act Grant Program ........................................................................................ $1,175,000
2330-9712 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Commercial Fisheries Statistics ...................................................................... $500,000
2330-9725 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Boating
Infrastructure ................................................................................................... $500,000
2330-9730 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Interstate
Fisheries Management Support ....................................................................... $400,000
2330-9732 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ACCSP
Implementation Strategic Plan ........................................................................... $25,000
2330-9733 For the purpose of a federally funded grant entitled, Testing Cod
Avoiding Trawl Net Designs ............................................................................ $250,000
2330-9739 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Turtle
Disengagement ................................................................................................ $950,000
2330-9742 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Age and
Growth Project Segment One .......................................................................... $450,000
2330-9743 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sport
Fish Restoration Coordination ......................................................................... $125,000
Department of Agricultural Resources.
2511-0004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Food Safety
Program ........................................................................................................... $575,000
2511-0310 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Pesticide Enforcement Grant .................................................. $500,000
2511-0400 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative
Agricultural Pest Survey ................................................................................... $500,000
2511-0972 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farm and
Ranch Lands Protection Program ................................................................. $3,500,000
2511-1025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Country of
Origin Labeling - Retail Surveillance .................................................................. $10,000
2515-1006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Animal Identification System .............................................................................. $45,000
2516-9002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Development
of Institutional Marketing .................................................................................. $700,000
205

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
2516-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Farmers'
Market Coupon Program .................................................................................. $600,000
2516-9004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Senior
Farmers' Market Nutrition Program .................................................................. $535,000
2516-9005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA
Senior Farmers’ Market Nutrition Program ............................................................. $200,000
2516-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Organic
Certification Cost-Share Program ...................................................................... $12,000
2516-9008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Resilient
Food Systems Infrastructure ......................................................................... $1,500,000
Department of Conservation and Recreation.
2800-9760 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FEMA National
Flood Insurance, Community Assistance Program, State Support
Services Element ............................................................................................. $395,000
2800-9770 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FEMA National
Dam Safety Program .................................................................................... $2,757,419
2820-9705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Identifying
and Eradicating the Asian Longhorned Beetle .............................................. $2,800,000
2820-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, NRCS
Dam Rehabilitation Funding for Watershed Restoration ............................... $3,850,573
2820-9903 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, USDA Forest
Service Volunteer Fire Assistance Program .................................................... $307,998
2820-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Park Service’s Historic Preservation Fund, (Semiquincentennial Grant
Funding)........................................................................................................... $350,000
2821-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Inflation
Reduction Act Funding for Urban and Community Forestry Programs ............. $500,000
2821-9905 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban
and Community Forestry Grant ........................................................................ $482,532
2821-9908 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest
Stewardship Conservation and Education Grant ............................................. $244,563
2821-9911 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Fire
Assistance Grant ............................................................................................. $405,949
2821-9912 For the purposes of a federally funded Bipartisan Infrastructure Law
grant entitled, Community Wildfire Defense Grant ............................................. $30,367
2821-9913 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazard
Fuels Management and Wildfire Risk Reduction Grant ........................................ $273,044
206

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
2821-9917 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest
Legacy Administration Grant ................................................................................ $1,097,101
2821-9918 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, US Forest Service
–IRA Funding for Forest Legacy Administration Grant .................................. $3,366,666
2821-9919 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2024 USFSM-
Underserved Forest Landowner Capacity IRA Grant ...................................... $500,000
2821-9926 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Forest
Health Program Grant ...................................................................................... $193,983
2821-9927 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hemlock
Woolly Adelgid Suppression Grant .................................................................... $55,717
2821-9928 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 2021
Community Wood Energy Grant – Warming Our Parks ......................................... $60,046
2830-9729 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, US Forest Service
– IIJA Temporary Bridge Funding ...................................................................... $75,000
2830-9733 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, USFWS
Aquatic Invasive Species Management Grant.................................................. $178,160
2840-9708 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, US Dept. of
Commerce – NOAA – ILJA Funded – Capacity Building Habitat
Coop Agreement .............................................................................................. $350,000
2840-9709 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Waquoit Bay
National Estuarine Research ........................................................................ $1,030,271
2850-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recreational
Trails Grant Program ..................................................................................... $1,486,955
2850-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal
Highway Charging and Fueling Infrastructure Grant ....................................... $325,000
Department of Energy Resources.
7006-9310 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clean Cities
Program ........................................................................................................... $115,000
7006-9311 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Energy Security Plan - SEP .......................................................................... $2,396,912
7006-9312 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL -
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law ........................................................................ $2,000,000
7006-9313 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL - EECBG
Program (IIJA) .............................................................................................. $1,247,340
7006-9314 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50121
HER ............................................................................................................ $21,925,837
7006-9315 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ira-50122
Hear ............................................................................................................ $21,842,739
207

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7006-9316 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Solar for
All ................................................................................................................ $36,382,289
7006-9317 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Energy
Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Grant Program ...................... $947,380
7006-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Heating
Oil Propane Program ......................................................................................... $22,288
7006-9734 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Energy
Plan - SEP .................................................................................................... $1,228,359
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
4000-1826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Money Follows
the Person Y4 .................................................................................................. $800,000
Office for Refugees and Immigrants.
4003-0808 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth Mentoring .......... $235,200
4003-0818 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elderly
Refugee Services ............................................................................................. $151,903
4003-0821 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee
School Impact ............................................................................................... $2,136,406
4003-0826 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee Cash
and Medical Assistance Program ................................................................ $70,989,708
4003-0830 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee
Support Services Ukraine Base .................................................................... $1,200,000
4003-0845 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Wilson Fish
TANF Coordination Program ......................................................................... $1,080,000
4003-0854 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee
Health Promotion .......................................................................................... $2,338,000
4003-0855 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Refugee
Social Services Program ............................................................................. $21,896,726
4003-0860 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Afghan
Refugee Social Service ................................................................................. $5,277,893
4003-0862 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Afghan
Refugee Health Promotion ............................................................................... $788,264
Massachusetts Commission for the Blind.
4110-3021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for
208

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
pensions, group health and life insurance or any other such indirect
cost of federally reimbursed state employees ............................................... $8,134,873
4110-3026 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent
Living–Services to Older Blind Americans ....................................................... $700,000
4110-3028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment ....................................................................................................... $58,000
MassAbility.
4120-0020 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Rehabilitation; provided, that no funds shall be deducted for pensions,
group health and life insurance or any other such indirect cost of
federally reimbursed state employees ........................................................ $53,521,717
4120-0187 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supported
Employment Services Grant ............................................................................ $303,452
4120-0191 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Informed
Members Planning and Assessing Choices Together ...................................... $235,100
4120-0421 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Road
to Independence, Self-Sufficiency, and Employment .................................... $4,000,000
4120-0511 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Social
Security Disability Insurance ....................................................................... $55,731,678
4120-0751 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Assistive
Technology Grant ............................................................................................ $611,189
4120-0752 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent
Living Federal Grant (Part C) ........................................................................ $1,731,410
4120-0753 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Independent
Living State Grants (Part B) ............................................................................. $385,492
4120-0758 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beyond Bridges:
The Intersection of Behavioral Health & Traumatic Brain Injury ....................... $280,969
4120-0765 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, (ISPH)
Expanding Public Health Workforce ................................................................. $121,081
Department of Transitional Assistance.
4400-3064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SNAP Nutrition
Education and Obesity Prevention Grant ................................................... $10,000,000
4400-3067 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program Employment and Training ............................. $3,235,000
4400-3073 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer EBT
Administrative Grant ..................................................................................... $2,262,172
4400-3074 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Summer EBT
Benefit Grant .............................................................................................. $77,397,000
209

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4400-3076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TANF Data
Equity Modeling ........................................................................................ $110,000,000
Department of Public Health.
4500-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preventive
Health and Health Services .......................................................................... $4,845,171
4500-1056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Rape
Prevention and Education Program ................................................................. $942,383
4500-1057 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Sexual Assault Service Program ............................................. $985,383
4500-1064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Loan Repayment ARPA Funding ..................................................................... $839,800
4500-2000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal and
Child Health Services .................................................................................. $13,125,116
4502-1012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Cooperative
Health Statistics System .................................................................................. $285,000
4510-0114 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Primary
Care Offices ..................................................................................................... $349,580
4510-0117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Office of
Rural Health ..................................................................................................... $227,791
4510-0120 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Rural
Hospital Flexibility Program .............................................................................. $538,305
4510-0223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Oral
Health Workforce Activities .............................................................................. $533,027
4510-0224 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small Rural
Hospital Improvement Grant Program................................................................ $82,992
4510-0401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Medicare
and Medicaid Survey and Certification ........................................................ $12,532,386
4510-0404 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Bioterrorism Hospital Preparedness Programs ............................................ $4,100,000
4510-0501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Clinical
Laboratory Improvement Amendment ............................................................. $ 806,680
4510-0507 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Impact Act
for Hospice Recertification Surveys ................................................................... $85,671
4510-0619 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FDA Inspection
of Food Establishments .................................................................................... $100,000
4510-0645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Harold
Rogers Prescription Drug Monitoring Program ................................................ $842,185
210

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
4510-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Mammography Quality Standards Act .............................................................. $499,000
4510-9041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ATSDR’s
Partnership to Promote Local Efforts to Reduce Environmental
Exposure.......................................................................................................... $489,000
4510-9048 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Indoor
Radon Development Program .......................................................................... $170,000
4510-9053 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Beach Monitoring
......................................................................................................................... $254,000
4510-9054 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Strengthening Statewide Environmental Health Capacity .................................. $90,000
4510-9068 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maintenance
and Enhancement of the State and National Environment ............................... $615,000
4510-9071 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Childhood
Lead Poisoning Prevention Program ................................................................ $519,000
4510-9073 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Human and
Animal Food Rapid Response Teams (U2F) MA FPP .................................... $450,000
4512-0100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Sexually
Transmitted Disease Control ........................................................................ $2,091,000
4512-0101 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening
STD Prevention & Control for Health Departments COVID ........................... $1,200,000
4512-0108 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mass
Applications for STD Surveillance Parts A and B ............................................ $441,480
4512-0150 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Immunization
and Vaccines for Children ........................................................................... $11,911,392
4512-0151 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Immunization
and Vaccines for Children ........................................................................... $14,000,000
4512-0152 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Immunization
and Vaccines for Children ARPA Supplemental................................................. $90,000
4512-0193 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building and
Enhancing Epidemiology, Laboratory and Health Information
Systems Capacity ....................................................................................... $14,070,616
4512-0194 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Epidemiology
and Laboratory Capacity for Infectious Diseases ........................................ $60,009,539
4512-0195 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Build
Epidemiology and Laboratory Capacity ........................................................ $7,587,440
4512-0197 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New
England Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence .................................... $ 2,732,951
211

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4512-0198 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New
England Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence .................................... $ 1,680,881
4512-9055 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting
Integration of Primary & Behavioral Health Care ......................................... $2,000,000
4512-9058 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance
Abuse Prevention and Treatment Block Grant – ARPA Supplemental ......... $1,000,000
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance
Abuse Prevention and Treatment Block Grant ............................................ $51,943,748
4512-9085 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strategic
Prevention Framework ..................................................................................... $517,466
4512-9089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Prevent
Prescription Drug Overuse Misuse ................................................................ $9,883,363
4512-9092 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Amy
Sorensen-Alawad MPA ................................................................................. $1,643,070
4512-9093 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
State Opioid Response SOR ...................................................................... $72,621,523
4512-9426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Uniform Alcohol
and Drug Abuse Data ....................................................................................... $689,574
4513-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing
Opportunity for People with AIDS Program ..................................................... $ 700,758
4513-9007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Women Infants
and Children .............................................................................................. $134,836,712
4513-9009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA
Technology for a Better WIC Experience ......................................................... $565,000
4513-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Enhancing
Reviews & Surveillance to Eliminate Maternal Mortality ................................. $495,000
4513-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Infants and
Toddlers with Disabilities ............................................................................... $9,612,117
4513-9031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Systems Development Initiative for MA ............................................................ $114,057
4513-9037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Care
Act Title II .................................................................................................... $23,401,181
4513-9047 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Comprehensive
HIV Prevention Project for Health Departments ............................................ $9,285,775
4513-9056 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
HIV Behavioral Surveillance ............................................................................. $469,735
212

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
4513-9063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State Sexual
Risk Avoidance Education FY 2018 ................................................................. $850,998
4513-9070 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency
Medical Services for Children .......................................................................... $200,000
4513-9104 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Universal
Newborn Hearing Screening ............................................................................ $310,000
4513-9106 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA
Comprehensive Asthma Control Program ........................................................ $773,240
4513-9109 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Perinatal Quality Collaborative ................................................ $335,700
4513-9110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, B Existing
PRAMS ............................................................................................................ $175,202
4513-9112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA EHDI Project
......................................................................................................................... $165,000
4513-9113 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Maternal, Infant,
and Early Childhood Home Visiting Grant Program .................................... $10,038,382
4513-9117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Defects
Study to Evaluate Pregnancy Exposures ...................................................... $1,091,721
4513-9121 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric
Mental Healthcare Access New Area Expansion – ARPA ............................... $850,000
4513-9127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Ryan White Title
IV Program ....................................................................................................... $542,459
4513-9130 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Maternal Health Innovation Program ............................................................. $1,294,513
4513-9131 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Transforming Massachusetts Pediatrics for Early Childhood ....................... $1,161,221
4513-9132 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Pediatric
Mental Health Care Access Expansion .............................................................. $81,758
4513-9133 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Childhood
Essentials Preventing Adverse Experiences ................................................... $516,624
4513-9134 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA
Population-Based Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome Surveillance ..................... $555,780
4514-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2015 WIC
Special Project Grants ..................................................................................... $150,000
4514-1014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, WIC
Regional Infrastructure ..................................................................................... $165,329
4515-0116 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Tuberculosis
Elimination and Lab Control Co-op Agreement ............................................. $1,913,261
213

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4515-0211 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HIV/AIDS,
Viral Hepatitis, STD and TB Prevention ........................................................ $1,163,698
4515-0215 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New England
Pathogen Genomics Center of Excellence...................................................... $500,000
4515-1125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Viral
Hepatitis Prevention and Surveillance .............................................................. $700,696
4516-1013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Biomonitoring
Program to Assess Environment Chemical Exposure .................................... $750,000
4516-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hospital
Preparedness and Public Health Emergency Preparedness ...................... $15,500,000
4516-1036 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MDPH
HSLI Laboratory Accreditation.......................................................................... $145,000
4516-1042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MASPHL-
NARMS Cooperative Agreement ..................................................................... $182,000
4518-0520 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Violent
Death Reporting System .................................................................................. $284,015
4518-0535 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Expanded
Occupational Health Surveillance in MA .......................................................... $753,033
4518-1000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Procurement
of Information for the National Death Index ........................................................ $45,000
4518-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Death File – Social Security Administration ............................... $95,000
4518-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Birth Records for
the Social Security Administration .................................................................... $192,000
4518-9023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Census of
Fatal Occupational Injuries ................................................................................. $70,637
4518-9052 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Behavioral
Risk Factor Surveillance System...................................................................... $600,000
4570-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Strengthening
PH Infrastructure, Workforce, and Data Systems ......................................... $2,187,994
4570-1011 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, PH
Infrastructure, Workforce, and Data System ARPA ....................................... $3,752,916
4570-1527 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Personal
Responsibility Education Program 2010 ....................................................... $1,048,026
4570-1534 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal
Drug Administration Tobacco 2011 ............................................................... $1,810,770
214

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
4570-1548 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Paul
Coverdell National Acute Stroke Prevention .................................................... $672,920
4570-1549 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Health and Disability Program ................................................. $650,000
4570-1554 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY14
Family Planning Services FOA ...................................................................... $7,348,447
4570-1557 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA
Organized Approaches to Increase Colorectal Cancer Screen ........................ $652,871
4570-1561 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Massachusetts
Core Violence Injury Prevention Program ........................................................ $275,000
4570-1562 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, The Family
Violence Service State Grants ...................................................................... $2,796,558
4570-1564 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA Diabetes
and Heart Disease Stroke Prevention Program ............................................ $2,354,008
4570-1568 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National and
State Tobacco Control Program .................................................................... $2,864,014
4570-1571 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MA
Cancer Prevention and Control Program ...................................................... $2,822,325
4570-1573 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and
Community Based Injury Prevention and Control ........................................ $ 1,102,512
4570-1575 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Suicide Prevention................................................................ $4,240,167
4570-1577 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family
Violence Prevention and Domestic Violence and Support Service
ARPA ............................................................................................................ $9,257,424
4570-1578 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CHWS for
COVID Response & Resilient Communities.................................................. $3,650,718
4570-1579 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARP/SEJC
Massachusetts Comprehensive Asthma Control Project ................................ $ 200,000
4570-1580 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family
Violence Prevention and Services/Sexual Assault/Rape Crisis and
Supports ARPA ............................................................................................ $3,228,788
Department of Children and Families.
4800-0006 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Children’s
Justice Act ........................................................................................................ $310,073
4800-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title
IV-E Independent Living Program ................................................................. $2,999,866
215

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
4800-0013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Promoting Safe
and Stable Families Program Title IV-B Subpart 2 and Caseworker
Visitation ....................................................................................................... $7,523,198
4800-0084 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Education &
Training Voucher Program ............................................................................ $1,043,671
4800-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adoption
Incentives Payments ..................................................................................... $1,394,000
4899-0001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV-B
Child Welfare Services .................................................................................. $3,507,302
4899-0021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Center
for Child Abuse and Neglect .......................................................................... $1,893,122
Department of Mental Health.
5012-9179 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, ARPA for
Block Grants for Community Mental Health Services ................................... $3,260,869
5012-9182 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BSCA Center
for Mental Health Block Grants ..................................................................... $1,457,889
5012-9401 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Block Grants
for Community Mental Health Services ....................................................... $21,459,534
5012-9406 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, System of
Care Expansion and Sustainability Grants ....................................................... $929,366
5012-9407 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Psychosis Prevention Project ................................................. $399,999
5046-9100 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Shelter Plus Care
......................................................................................................................... $337,017
Department of Developmental Services.
5911-3024 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lifespan Respite .......... $315,586
Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
6440-0089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial
Vehicle Information Systems and Networks .................................................... $775,999
6440-0090 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commercial
Driver License Information System Enhancement ........................................... $834,449
6440-0091 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fatality
Analysis Reporting ........................................................................................... $118,406
6440-0011 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SMART
Drones ............................................................................................................... 493,560
216

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
6440-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Massachusetts Climate Pollution Reduction Grants Program .......................... $835,897
6642-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Non-Urbanized
Area Formula Program .................................................................................. $8,649,998
6642-0023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section
5303 & 5304 Metropolitan Transportation Planning ...................................... $2,077,806
6642-0026 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, New
Freedom Operating Segment ............................................................................. $65,000
6642-0030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 5339 Bus
and Bus Facility Formula Funds .................................................................... $4,711,125
6642-0049 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special Needs
for Elderly Individuals and Individuals with Disabilities.................................. $3,879,250
6642-0050 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 5311
FFY20 CARES Act ........................................................................................... $689,800
6642-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CRRSAA ........................ $49,033
6643-0017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BUILD Grant ................ $205,570
6643-0018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CRISI Grant .............. $3,500,000
6643-0019 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, East Deerfield
Intermodal Grant ........................................................................................... $2,480,000
6644-0009 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Climate Pollution
Reduction Program ............................................................................................ $81,620
BOARD OF LIBRARY COMMISSIONERS.
7000-9702 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Library Service
Technology Act ............................................................................................. $3,642,371
9000-9700 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Reserve
Title I ................................................................................................................ $157,544
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7002-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, EDA
Statewide Tourism Grant ARPA .................................................................. $58,348,810
7002-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband
Equity, Access and Deployment ....................................................................... $1,000,000
7002-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Broadband
Equity, Access and Deployment .................................................................. 50,000,000
217

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7002-2025 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Capital Projects
Fund ............................................................................................................ $86,737,472
Massachusetts Marketing Partnership.
7008-9028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Step11 ........................... $57,477
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
7003-4206 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead
License Enforcement ......................................................................................... $48,931
7003-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, OSHA
23G Operational Program ............................................................................. $1,423,484
Department of Career Services.
7002-6623 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Work Opportunity
Tax Credit ........................................................................................................ $556,292
7002-6625 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Labor Certification
......................................................................................................................... $646,929
7002-6626 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Employment Services State Allotment ........................................................ $14,000,000
7002-6628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Disabled
Veterans Outreach Program............................................................................. $3,054,648
7003-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Trade
Adjustment Assistance ..................................................................................... $556,292
7003-1630 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Adult Activities ....................................................................... $31,498,150
7003-1631 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Youth Formula Grants ........................................................ $18,200,757
7003-1777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act National Emergency Grants .................................................... $261,180
7003-1778 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Workforce
Investment Act Dislocated Worker Formula Grant ...................................... $16,532,677
7003-1785 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Apprenticeships
USA State Accelerator Grant ......................................................................... $2,120,530
Department of Unemployment Assistance.
7002-6624 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Unemployment Insurance Administration .................................................... $67,000,000
218

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
7002-9701 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Bureau
of Labor Statistics ............................................................................................. $468,921
7003-2022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal
Unemployment Insurance ARPA Integrity ........................................................ $900,000
Department of Labor Standards.
7002-2013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Mine Safety
and Health Training .......................................................................................... $110,027
7003-4203 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bureau of
Labor Statistics Statistical Survey ...................................................................... $75,000
7003-4212 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Asbestos
Licensing and Monitoring ................................................................................... $79,000
7003-4213 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Lead Licensing
and Monitoring .................................................................................................. $102,500
7003-6627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Occupational
Safety and Health Administration On-site Consultation Program ....................... $74,250
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES.
Office of the Secretary.
4400-0705 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, McKinney
Emergency Shelter Grants Program ............................................................. $5,500,000
4400-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Continuum of
Care Supplemental Housing ....................................................................... $33,000,000
7004-1718 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth
Homelessness Demonstration Program (COC YHDP) ................................. $1,500,000
7004-2021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal
COVID Rental Assistance ............................................................................. $1,500,000
7004-2030 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Weatherization Assistance for Low Income Persons .................................. $13,000,000
7004-2033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low Income
Home Energy Assistance Program ........................................................... $220,000,000
7004-2034 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community
Services Block Grant ................................................................................... $24,000,000
7004-2041 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Low-Income
Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (IIJA) .................................... $11,000,000
7004-2043 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BIL
Weatherization Assistance Program (IIJA) .................................................. $50,000,000
219

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7004-3037 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Small
Cities Community Development Block Grant Program ............................... $80,000,000
7004-3039 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community
Development Block Grant COVID-19 ............................................................ $3,000,000
7004-9001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Youth
Homelessness System Improvement ........................................................... $1,000,000
7004-9010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stability Voucher
...................................................................................................................... $1,200,000
7004-9012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Recovery
Housing Program .......................................................................................... $3,000,000
7004-9013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Foster Youth to
Independence ................................................................................................... $1,200,000
7004-9014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal
Housing Voucher Program .......................................................................... $10,000,000
7004-9015 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Housing
Choice Voucher and Moving to Work Program ........................................ $535,000,000
7004-9016 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Family
Unification Program ....................................................................................... $3,700,000
7004-9017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Supportive
Housing for Persons with Disabilities............................................................ $5,000,000
7004-9018 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 811
Project Based Rental Assistance Demonstration Program ........................... $3,200,000
7004-9019 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Section 8
Moderate Rehabilitation Program................................................................. $7,200,000
7004-9021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, the Family
Self-Sufficiency Program ............................................................................... $1,200,000
7004-9022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Emergency
Housing Vouchers (ARPA) .......................................................................... $19,500,000
7004-9028 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home
Investment Partnerships .............................................................................. $23,000,000
7004-9029 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Housing Trust Fund ..................................................................................... $20,000,000
7004-9038 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Home
Investment Partnership (ARPA) .................................................................. $15,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
220

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
3000-0707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Head
Start Collaboration ........................................................................................... $175,000
3000-9003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community-
Based Child Abuse Prevention .................................................................... $1,081,322
3000-9004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Community-
Based Child Abuse Prevention - ARPA ........................................................... $945,000
3000-9005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool
Development Grant Birth to Five (PDG) ..................................................... $12,000,000
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
7010-9706 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Common Core
Data Project ..................................................................................................... $174,861
7038-0107 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult Education
– State Grant Program ................................................................................ $13,700,847
7043-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Grants to
Local Education Agencies ........................................................................ $285,434,127
7043-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Migrant
Children ......................................................................................................... $1,295,888
7043-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title I Neglected
Children and Orphans ................................................................................... $1,051,085
7043-2001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title II Teacher
Quality State Grants .................................................................................... $30,121,542
7043-3001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title III Language
Instruction and LEP Grants ........................................................................ $20,499,380
7043-4002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IV
21st Century Community Learning Centers ................................................ $20,598,667
7043-4004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Student Support
and Academic Enrichment Grants ............................................................... $21,478,609
7043-4005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Stronger
Connections Grant (SCG) Program .............................................................. $7,333,970
7043-6001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI State
Assessment Grants ...................................................................................... $6,818,554
7043-6501 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title X
Homeless Children and Youth ...................................................................... $1,978,769
7043-7001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special
Education Grants ...................................................................................... $340,056,295
7043-7002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Preschool Grants
.................................................................................................................... $10,888,209
221

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
7043-8001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Vocational
Education Grants ........................................................................................ $23,420,190
7048-2000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, STEM AP
Course Expansion Opportunity ........................................................................ $742,040
7048-2002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Shaping
Teacher Quality and Student of Color Experience in MA ................................. $178,000
7048-2004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CLSD Equitable
Literacy Experience .................................................................................... $10,152,081
7048-2005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Academic
Assessment for Science Grant ..................................................................... $3,155,500
7048-2321 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, CDC Funding
to Promote Adolescent Health ......................................................................... $107,500
7048-7323 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Striving
Readers Comprehensive Literacy State Formula ........................................... $900,000
7048-9144 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Migrant
Education Program Consortium Incentive Grants .............................................. $61,126
7053-2008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Fresh Fruits
and Vegetables Nutrition .............................................................................. $4,661,973
7053-2112 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Special
Assistance Funds ...................................................................................... $478,793,178
7053-2117 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Care
Program ........................................................................................................ $6,496,010
7053-2119 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Child Nutrition
School Food Equipment Grant ........................................................................ $186,251
7053-2125 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Commodity
Supplemental Food Program ........................................................................... $265,534
7053-2126 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Temporary
Emergency Food Assistance ........................................................................ $2,618,257
7053-2129 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, TEFAP CC
Operational Funds ........................................................................................... $435,000
7053-2266 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Team Nutrition
Competitive Training Grant.............................................................................. $533,333
7053-3272 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Direct
Certification Performance Award ...................................................................... $458,506
7057-2127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FARM TO
SCHOOL GRANTS ARPA ............................................................................... $453,778
7060-1000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elementary
and Secondary School Emergency Relief Fund COVID-19 ...................... $160,000,000
222

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
7060-2000 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Emergency Assistance for Non-Public Schools ............................................ $2,333,904
7062-0008 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Office of
School Lunch Programs - Child Care Program Admin ................................. $8,712,500
7062-0017 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Charter
School Assistance and Distributions ............................................................. $2,283,814
Department of Higher Education.
7066-6033 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Gaining
Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs .................... $4,256,000
Community Colleges.
7503-6557 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bristol CC - TRIO
- Talent Search ................................................................................................ $161,636
7503-9714 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bristol CC -
Upward Bound Program .................................................................................. $199,879
7518-6127 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Bunker Hill CC -
College Work Study Program .......................................................................... $408,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY.
Office of the Secretary.
8000-0402 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, F402BIL
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law Funds I ........................................................... $6,000,000
8000-0405 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, F405BIL
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law Funds II ........................................................... $5,000,000
8000-4692 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Homeland Security Program ......................................................................... $5,868,016
8000-4707 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nonprofit
Security Grant Program ................................................................................ $5,587,881
8000-4727 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State and Local
Cybersecurity ................................................................................................ $7,122,187
8000-4794 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Urban Areas
Initiative Grant ............................................................................................ $15,509,028
8000-4804 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Agency Programs ................................................................................................ $4,285
8000-4807 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 405 Highway
Safety Plan ....................................................................................................... $132,107
223

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8000-4808 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, 402 Highway
Safety Plan ....................................................................................................... $126,252
8100-4600 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020 Juvenile
Justice Delinquency Prevention ........................................................................ $96,987
8100-4610 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2022
Statistical Analysis Center .................................................................................. $18,750
8100-4611 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020
Byrne Justice Assistance Programs .............................................................. $3,976,596
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020
Residential Substance Abuse Treatment – Admin Grant ................................. $280,739
8100-4627 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020
Sex Offender Registration - Grants .................................................................. $249,233
8100-4628 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020
National Criminal History Improvement Program ......................................... $2,600,000
8100-4639 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020 John
R. Justice Grant ............................................................................................... $163,679
8100-4645 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Support for
Adam Walsh Act Implementation Grant Program ............................................... $45,000
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2020
Violence Against Women Act ........................................................................ $3,451,619
8100-4669 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2022-23
Byrne State Crisis Intervention Program SCIP .............................................. $2,483,728
8100-4670 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23
Comprehensive Opioid, Stimulate, and Substance Use Grant .................... $2,250,724
8100-4671 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23
Second Chance Act Smart Supervision ........................................................... $350,000
8100-4693 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Project Safe
Neighborhood – Admin Grant .......................................................................... $484,833
Department of State Police.
8100-1426 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Law
Enforcement Mental Health and Wellness Act ................................................ $120,000
8100-2013 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023
Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration FFY2024 .................................... $153,060
8100-2014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Admin FFY2024 ....................................................................... $6,395,186
8100-2408 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024
Prosecuting Cold Cases Using DNA ............................................................... $200,000
224

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
8100-2541 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2024 Cops
Microgrant to Prevent Hate Crimes ................................................................... $75,000
8100-3003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 COPS
Anti-Heroin Task Force.................................................................................. $2,000,000
8100-3004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 COPS
AHTF ............................................................................................................ $2,480,000
8100-3011 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY21 COPS
Anti-Meth Program ........................................................................................... $184,000
8100-4183 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 ICAC
Task Force Grant ............................................................................................. $311,991
8100-4568 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY22 COPS
Law Enforcement Accreditation Grant ................................................................ $13,694
8100-9715 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2022-23
Port Security Grant ........................................................................................................ $3,000
8100-9716 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY2024 Port
Security Grant Program ..................................................................................... $78,816
8100-9772 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY21
Coverdell Competitive ....................................................................................... $14,146
8100-9776 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23
Coverdell Formula .............................................................................................. $41,633
8100-9777 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24
Coverdell Formula ............................................................................................ $124,217
8100-9782 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY23 DNA
CEBR ............................................................................................................... $295,588
8100-9783 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY24 DNA
CEBR ............................................................................................................... $500,000
Military Division.
8700-0014 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Administrative Services ......................................................................... $200,000
8700-1001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Facilities Program ............................................................................ $31,134,400
8700-1002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Environmental Program..................................................................... $3,744,600
8700-1003 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Security .............................................................................................. $1,642,050
8700-1004 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Electronic Security ................................................................................ $140,000
225

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8700-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Command Control, Communications and Information
Management .................................................................................................... $576,000
8700-1007 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Sustainable Ranges ............................................................................. $724,295
8700-1010 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Army National
Guard Anti-Terrorism ......................................................................................... $81,200
8700-1021 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard Facilities Operations and Maintenance ............................................ $11,172,426
8700-1022 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard Environmental ....................................................................................... $107,084
8700-1023 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard Security .............................................................................................. $2,400,000
8700-1024 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard Fire Protection ........................................................................................ $4,289,893
8700-1031 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard SRM Projects ........................................................................................ $400,000
8700-1040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Air National
Guard Distributed Learning Program ............................................................... $420,000
8700-2301 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Camp
Edwards Readiness Center ........................................................................ $47,937,258
Massachusetts Emergency Management Agency.
8800-0005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, EMPG ...................... $5,220,700
8800-0040 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY23 Regional
Catastrophic Preparedness Grant ................................................................ $1,100,000
8800-0042 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Hazardous
Materials Transportation Act ............................................................................ $500,000
8800-0050 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023
Emergency Operations Center Grant ........................................................... $2,000,000
8800-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022
1/30 Snowstorm HAZ Mitigation Program Project Cost .................................... $100,000
8800-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-
19 Presidential Declaration Mitigation Grant Program .................................. $2,000,000
8800-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-
Disaster Mitigation Program Management Cost ............................................... $50,000
8800-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023 Pre-
Disaster Mitigation Program Project ................................................................ $250,000
226

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
8800-1644 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY11 Pre-
Disaster Mitigation Competitive Projects ......................................................... $500,000
8800-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building
Resilient Infrastructure Communities Grant Program Management
Cost .................................................................................................................. $500,000
8800-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building
Resilient Infrastructure Communities 2021....................................................... $100,000
8800-2012 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FFY12
Emergency Management Performance Grant.............................................. $2,000,000
8800-4110 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, February 8-9,
2013 Severe Winter Storm ............................................................................... $150,000
8800-4214 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 26-28
Severe Winter Storm ......................................................................................... $80,000
8800-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm and Flooding ................................................................. $300,000
8800-4379 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 13-14
2018 Severe Winter Storm and Flooding ........................................................ $500,000
8800-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19
Pandemic .................................................................................................... $30,000,000
8810-0051 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 30 2022
Snowstorm Haz Mitigation Program Project Cost $1,707,277 ........................ $500,000
8810-0065 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 26-28
Severe Winter Storm ......................................................................................... $40,000
8810-0072 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm and Flooding .............................................................. $1,000,000
8810-0079 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 13-14
2018 Severe Winter Storm Flood Mitigation .................................................... $860,000
8810-0096 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, HMPG COVID-
19 Pandemic PRJ ......................................................................................... $5,000,000
8810-1544 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Pre-
Disaster Mitigation Program Project Cost .................................................... $5,000,000
8810-1545 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY 2023 PRE-
DISASTER MITIGATION PROGRAM PROJECT COST ............................. $2,000,000
8810-1744 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities Project BRIC20 ............................................. $3,000,000
8810-1844 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Building Resilient
Infrastructure & Communities Project Cost ..................................................... $600,000
227

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8810-1944 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2022 Building
Resilient Infrastructure and Communities .................................................... $2,000,000
8810-3599 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, September 13
2023 Emergency Grant Leominster Region .................................................... $200,000
8810-4214 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 26-28
Severe Winter Storm .................................................................................. $10,000,000
8810-4372 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 2-3 2018
Severe Winter Storm Flooding ..................................................................... $8,000,000
8810-4379 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, March 13-14
2018 Severe Winter Storm and Flooding ..................................................... $5,000,000
8810-4496 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COVID-19
Pandemic OG 2020 ............................................................................... $1,000,000,000
8810-4651 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, January 28-29
2022 Snowstorm Mitigation Assistance Project Cost ........................................ $100,00
Chief Medical Examiner.
8100-9774 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Coverdell
Program ............................................................................................................. $36,614
Criminal Justice Information Services.
0840-0111 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Crime Victim
Assistance ......................................................................................................... $79,969
Department of Fire Services.
8324-1505 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National Fire
Academy Training Grant .................................................................................... $20,000
Department of Correction.
8900-7001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Body-worn
Camera Equipment ............................................................................................ $40,435
Parole Board.
8950-0002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, MOVA ......................... $310,083
Sheriffs.
Franklin Sheriff’s Office.
7035-0002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult Basic
Education ............................................................................................................. $1,200
7043-8001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Perkins Grant ................ $35,000
228

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment for State Prisoners (RSAT) Program ...................... $30,000
8910-0820 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA - PDOA
......................................................................................................................... $525,000
8910-0822 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, COSSAP COAP .......... $325,000
Hampden Sheriff’s Office.
4512-9069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Substance Abuse
......................................................................................................................... $108,500
7035-0002 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Adult
Basic Education ............................................................................................... $354,743
7043-1005 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title 1 Neglected
or Delinquent Program ....................................................................................... $96,037
7043-8001 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Perkins Grant ............... $101,977
8100-4646 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Violence
Against Women Act ............................................................................................ $46,000
Hampshire Sheriff’s Office.
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment for State Prisoners (RSAT) Program .................. $35,000
Essex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0625 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Essex
MAT Recovery Project ..................................................................................... $420,425
8910-0630 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Essex
County Mental Health Diversion ...................................................................... $225,000
Worcester Sheriff’s Office.
8000-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Residential
Substance Abuse Treatment ................................................................................ $7,500
Middlesex Sheriff’s Office.
8910-0138 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, BJA
Comprehensive Opioid, Stimulant & Substance Abuse Site Based
Program ........................................................................................................... $556,302
8910-0172 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Body Worn
Camera .............................................................................................................. $60,000
8910-0174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled,
Comprehensive Opioid, Stimulant, and Substance Abuse Site-based
Program ........................................................................................................... $556,302
Barnstable Sheriff’s Office.
229

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
8910-8223 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, SAMHSA
VIPS (Vivitrol Increased Participation Services) ............................................... $523,826
Bristol Sheriff’s Office.
8910-8322 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Parents & Their
Minor Children ................................................................................................. $125,000
Norfolk Sheriff’s Office.
8100-4622 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, RSAT Grant .................... $8,264
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF AGING AND INDEPENDENCE.
9110-1063 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VI OAA
MA to Support Family Caregivers 25 .............................................................. $490,000
9110-1064 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2024-25
MIPPA Priority 2 for AAAs ............................................................................... $248,170
9110-1065 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2024-25
MIPPA Priority 3 for ADRCs ............................................................................ $219,423
9110-1066 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2024
MIPPA Priority 1 for SHIPs .............................................................................. $238,235
9110-1067 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023
MIPPA Priority 1 for SHIPS .............................................................................. $572,406
9110-1068 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023
MIPPA Priority 2 for AAAS .............................................................................. $329,000
9110-1069 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, FY2023
MIPPA Priority 3 for ADRCs ............................................................................. $202,203
9110-1074 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans
Act ................................................................................................................. $1,028,904
9110-1075 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title VII
Ombudsman .................................................................................................... $781,032
9110-1076 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Title IIIB
Supportive Service ........................................................................................ $1,992,011
9110-1077 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, National
Family Caregiver Support Program ............................................................... $5,692,746
9110-1079 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, IIID
Preventative Health ......................................................................................... $930,000
9110-1089 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, APC6 ARP for
APS ............................................................................................................... $4,236,749
230

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
9110-1094 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, State
Health Insurance Assistance Program .......................................................... $1,509,857
9110-1173 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Older Americans
Act ............................................................................................................... $23,366,990
9110-1174 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Nutrition
Services Incentive Program.......................................................................... $6,000,000
9110-1178 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Senior
Community Service Employment Program .................................................. $1,700,000
9110-1199 For the purposes of a federally funded grant entitled, Elder Justice
Adult Protective 24 .......................................................................................... $302,735
SECTION 2E.
SECTION 2E. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated for transfer from the General Fund
to the trust funds named within each item unless specifically designated otherwise in this section, for the
purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section and subject to the laws regulating the
disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. Items in this section shall not be
subject to allotment under section 9B of chapter 29 of the General Laws or reduction under section 9C of
said chapter 29 without express authorization from the general court. Notwithstanding section 19A of said
chapter 29, any transfer under this section shall be made by the comptroller in accordance with a transfer
schedule to be developed for each item by the comptroller after consulting with the appropriate agency
secretary, the secretary of administration and finance and the state treasurer. The schedule for each
appropriation shall provide for transfers in increments considered appropriate to meet the cash flow needs
of each fund; provided, however, that the sum of the incremental transfers shall equal the sum set forth in
this section and all transfers under the schedule shall be completed not later than June 30, 2026. Not later
than 7 days after the schedules receive final approval by the comptroller, they shall be reported to the house
and senate committees on ways and means.
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT.
Office of the Secretary.
1595-1075 For an operating transfer to the Workforce Competitiveness Trust
Fund established in section 2WWW of chapter 29 of the General Laws
.................................................................................................................... $10,000,000
Gaming Economic Development Fund ..................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE.
1599-6152 For an operating transfer to the State Retiree Benefits Trust
Fund established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws ......... $450,000,000
1595-6153 For an operating transfer to the Communications Access Trust Fund
established pursuant to section 2XXXXX of chapter 29 of the General
Laws; provided, that not later than March 10, 2026, the executive office
for administration and finance shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be
limited to the: (i) distribution of the funds appropriated in this item to
sheriffs’ offices and the department of correction; (ii) barriers to
231

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
providing calls free of charge to incarcerated individuals; and (iii)
current number of calls at sheriffs’ offices and the department of
correction .............................................................................................................. $10,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS.
1595-6232 For the Clean Energy Investment Fund, established in section 15 of
chapter 23J of the General Laws; provided, that funds shall be
appropriated for environmental sector workforce development and
investments to support emissions reductions in the energy,
transportation and buildings sectors, as directed by the Massachusetts
clean energy and climate plan for 2050; and provided further, that not
later than April 3, 2026, the executive office shall submit a report to the
house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include
the: (i) number of workforce development programs receiving funds in
fiscal year 2026; (ii) number of individuals served by said programs;
and (iii) status of projected progress towards the goals outlined in the
Massachusetts clean energy and climate plan for 2050 ............................. $25,000,000
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES.
Office of the Secretary.
1595-1068 For an operating transfer to the MassHealth provider payment account
under the Medical Assistance Trust Fund established in section 2QQQ
of chapter 29 of the General Laws; provided, that these funds shall be
expended for: (i) services provided; (ii) public hospital transformation
and incentive initiative payments; (iii) health equity incentive
payments; or (iv) Medicaid care organization payments under 42 CFR
438.6(c); provided further, that all payments from the Medical
Assistance Trust Fund shall be: (A) subject to the availability of federal
financial participation; (B) made only under federally-approved
payment methods; (C) consistent with federal funding requirements
and all federal payment limits as determined by the secretary of health
and human services; and (D) subject to the terms and conditions of an
agreement with the executive office of health and human services;
provided further, that the secretary of health and human services shall
notify the house and senate committees on ways and means and the
joint committee on health care financing of increases or decreases in
any payments made within the term of the current 1115 waiver or other
state plan amendments within 15 days of said payments; and provided
further, that the secretary of health and human services shall utilize
funds from the Medical Assistance Trust Fund to make payments of
up to $493,900,000 to the Cambridge public health commission or to
Medicaid care organizations for payment to the Cambridge public
health commission if the Cambridge public health commission, in
anticipation of receiving such payments, first voluntarily transfers an
amount equal to the non-federal share of such payments to the
Medical Assistance Trust Fund using a federally-permissible source
of funds...................................................................................................... $547,582,400
1595-1069 For an operating transfer to the Health Information Technology Trust
Fund established in section 35RR of chapter 10 of the General Laws;
provided, that these funds shall be expended for operating costs for
232

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
the statewide health information exchange and integrated eligibility
system; and provided further, that not later than December 16, 2025,
the executive office of health and human services shall submit a report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on health care financing detailing utilization in fiscal year
2025 of the Health Information Technology Trust Fund established in
said section 35RR of said chapter 10, including the: (i) total dollar
amount billed to the Health Information Technology Trust Fund; (ii)
total dollar amount of federal reimbursement; (iii) initiatives and
programs paid for out of the Health Information Technology Trust
Fund; and (iv) amount disbursed from the Health Information
Technology Trust Fund to each program and initiative outlined in the
enabling statute .......................................................................................... $14,177,900
1595-1071 For an operating transfer to the Community Behavioral Health
Promotion and Prevention Trust Fund established in section 35GGG
of chapter 10 of the General Laws, inserted by section 7 of chapter
208 of the acts of 2018 ..................................................................................... $200,000
Department of Public Health.
1595-4506 For an operating transfer to the Childhood Lead Poisoning
Prevention Trust Fund established in section 35MMM of chapter 10
of the General Laws ..................................................................................... $2,700,000
TRANSPORTATION.
Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
1595-6368 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust
Fund established under section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws;
provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the registrar of motor vehicles shall provide quarterly reports
to the commissioner of correction detailing the number of identity
cards processed pursuant to the enhanced state identity card program
for citizens released from the department of correction facilities;
provided further, that the report shall also provide a summary and
detail of the registry of motor vehicles fees associated with the
transactions and that, upon receipt and verification by the department
of correction of the accuracy of the transactions reported in each
quarterly report, the commissioner of correction shall submit a request
to the comptroller for an operating transfer of the full amount of said
registry of motor vehicles fees to the Commonwealth Transportation
Fund established by section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws;
and provided further, that the transfer request shall include the
department of correction account from which the transfer shall be
made and the quarterly report from the registrar of motor vehicles as
supporting documentation ........................................................................ $577,620,163
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ................... 73.17%
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 26.83%
1595-6369 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation
Authority under clause (1) of subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter
29 of the General Laws; provided, that the Massachusetts Bay
233

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Transportation Authority shall submit quarterly reports to the executive
office for administration and finance and the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include an accounting of the
funds provided for in this item including: (i) the amount of money
received under this transfer; (ii) the amount of money expended under
this transfer; (iii) a description of items and services for which funds
have been expended; and (iv) the status of ongoing and planned
capital projects under the purview of the authority; provided further,
that the authority shall submit these reports on a quarterly basis not
later than 30 days following the last day of the quarter; provided further,
that not less than $40,000,000 shall be expended for the
Massachusetts Bay Transit Authority academy program to establish a
pipeline for a skilled workforce; provided further, that not less than
$10,000,000 shall be expended for a program to support grants for
operational assistance to ferry services; provided further, that funds
included in this item may be used for an income eligible, reduced fares
program under the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority for
riders of all modes with low-incomes; and provided further, that funds
included in this item over the total amount of funds made available in
this item in the prior fiscal year shall not be used for capital spending .... $687,000,000
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ...................... 100%
1595-6370 For an operating transfer to the regional transit authorities organized
under chapter 161B of the General Laws, or any prior laws, under
clause (2) of subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the
General Laws; provided, that each regional transit authority receiving
assistance under this item shall deliver not later than January 6, 2026,
a copy of its most recent audited financial statement to the chief
financial officer of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation,
the secretary of administration and finance, the treasurer of the
commonwealth, the comptroller of the commonwealth, the house and
senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
transportation ............................................................................................ $204,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ..................... 53.92%
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ................... 46.08%
1595-6379 For the operation of the motor vehicle insurance merit rating board,
including the rent, related parking and utility expenses of the board;
provided, that the amount appropriated in this item and the associated
fringe benefit costs shall be borne by insurance companies doing
motor vehicle insurance business within the commonwealth under
section 57A of chapter 6C of the General Laws; and provided
further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, no safe driver insurance plan shall require the payment of an
unsafe driver point surcharge for the first offense for a non-criminal
motor vehicle traffic violation as described in chapter 90C of the
General Laws .............................................................................................. $11,671,807
Commonwealth Transportation Fund ...................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
234

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
1595-0035 For an operating transfer to the Twenty-First Century Education Trust
Fund established in section 35NNN of chapter 10 of the General Laws;
provided, that funds may be used for effective and sustainable
improvement initiatives in public schools designated as in need of
assistance pursuant to the school accountability system established by
the board of elementary and secondary education, and for the purpose
of addressing persistent disparities in achievement among student
subgroups, improving educational opportunities for all students,
sharing best practices for improving classroom learning and
supporting efficiencies within and across school districts .............................. $1,000,000
1595-0115 For the Civics Project Trust Fund established in section 2CCCCC
of chapter 29 of the General Laws to promote civics education .................... $2,500,000
Department of Higher Education.
1595-7066 For the support of the Massachusetts Science, Technology
Engineering, and Mathematics Grant Fund, referred to as the
Pipeline Fund, established in section 2MMM of chapter 29 of the
General Laws ................................................................................................ $1,000,000
SECTION 2F.
SECTION 2F. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the Education and
Transportation Fund for the purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section and subject to
the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. All
appropriations in this section shall not be subject to section 5D of chapter 29 of the General Laws
EDUCATION.
Department of Early Education and Care.
1596-2410 For operational grants to child care providers; provided, that for fiscal
year 2026 funds shall be distributed in accordance with the formula
established in section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws; provided
further, that funds from this line item shall be expended in coordination
with funds from line item 3000-1045; provided further, that the
department shall collect data from participating programs including,
but not limited to: (i) the number of enrolled children; (ii) the number of
educators employed; (iii) efforts to recruit and retain employees; (iv)
any available demographic data of the families served by participating
providers; (v) to the extent feasible, the income level of the families
served by participating providers; (vi) the amount awarded to each
provider; and (vii) the amount of operational grants spent by provider,
delineated by category of spending including, but not limited to: (A)
salaries; (B) other compensation; (C) workforce training; and (D)
facilities improvements; provided further, that programs shall respond
to all data collection requests and surveys from the department to be
eligible for said stabilization grants; provided further, that funds may
be expended for departmental technical assistance related to the
administration and distribution of said grants; and provided further, that
administrative costs for the program shall not exceed 2 per cent of the
total appropriation for said program .......................................................... $360,000,000
235

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
1596-2411 For efforts to reduce the waitlist for income-eligible early education
and care programs; provided, that funds may be expended for teen
parents and homeless families at risk of becoming eligible for
transitional aid to families with dependent children; provided further,
that funds may be expended for informal early education and care
benefits for families meeting income-eligibility criteria; provided
further, that not less than $15,000,000 shall be expended for the
department’s fiscal year 2026 procurement of contracted early
education slots; provided further, that the early education and care
services funded from this item shall be distributed in a geographically
equitable manner that provides fair and adequate access to early
education and care for all eligible individuals; and provided further, that
not later than April 1, 2026, the department of early education and care
shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the number of families removed from the waitlist
through this item .......................................................................................... $15,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2452 For efforts to maintain capacity and the fiscal year 2025 rate structure
for the department of early education and care's child care financial
assistance programs; provided, that the commissioner of early
education and care may transfer funds between this item and items
3000-1000, 3000-3060 and 3000-4060 ...................................................... $53,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1596-2422 For the reimbursement of school districts and participating schools for
the costs of providing universal free school meals pursuant to section
1C of chapter 69 of the General Laws; provided, that districts receiving
funds under this item shall not implement a meal charge for students;
provided further, that participating districts that are eligible for
reimbursement under the community eligibility provision or provision 2
of the National School Lunch Program or an applicable provision of
the National Child Nutrition Act, Public Law 111-296, shall adopt said
provision to maximize access to federal funds; and provided further,
that not later than January 15, 2026, the department of elementary and
secondary education shall submit a report to the house and senate
committees on ways and means that shall include: (i) data on any
change in utilization of school lunch services in districts receiving
funding under this item, delineated by free, reduced and full- pay
students as defined by the National School Lunch Program; (ii) the
distribution of funding paid through this item and, for the purpose of
universal free school meals in fiscal year 2024, item 7053-1925
delineated by school district; and (iii) options to reform, modify or
extend the program in a manner that promotes equity, maximizes
federal funds and improves predictability and sustainability of funding ... $190,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2424 For a competitive grant program administered by the department of
elementary and secondary education, in consultation with
236

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Massachusetts clean energy center, for K-12 public schools or
districts for projects to install or maintain clean energy infrastructure
pursuant to section 37 of chapter 69 of the General Laws ......................... $20,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2438 For the cost of providing an additional $104 per pupil in minimum aid
funding to qualifying cities, towns, regional school districts, counties
maintaining agricultural schools, independent vocational schools and
independent agricultural and technical schools to be distributed under
chapters 70 and 76 of the General Laws and section 3 ........................... $240,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION.
1596-2437 For an early literacy initiative directed by the secretary of education, in
consultation and coordination with the commissioner of elementary
and secondary education and the commissioner of early education
and care, to be known as Literacy Launch: Reading Success from Age
3 through Grade 3; provided, that said program shall provide grants,
programming and materials to increase the number of public schools
and licensed early education and care providers in the commonwealth
providing evidence-based literacy instruction to students in pre-
kindergarten through grade 3; provided further, that grants may
support activities including, but not limited to: (i) the adoption and
implementation of high quality curricular materials by public schools
and districts and early education program providers; (ii) the provision
of technical support, coaching and professional development to
maximize educator impact and improve student learning of literacy
skills for students in pre-kindergarten through grade 3, including the
support of required staff for the development and implementation of
the program by the granting agencies; (iii) an acceleration of the
program review of educator preparation programs approved by the
department of elementary and secondary education; (iv) the
coordination and alignment of assessment and screening, curriculum
and professional development across the departments of early
education and care and elementary and secondary education; and (v)
other professional learning initiatives and supports related to literacy
assessment, measurement and instruction for specific groups of
learners or specific evidence-based materials; provided further, that
grant recipients may include, but not be limited to: (A) public schools
and districts and licensed early education and care programs
providing pre-kindergarten instructional services; (B) the University of
Massachusetts; (C) state universities and community colleges; and
(D) other educator preparation programs; provided further, that not
later than November 27, 2026, the secretary of education shall provide
a summary of the current and planned allocations of funds for each
program funded through this item to the joint committee on education
and the house and senate committees on ways and means and that
such report shall include: (1) a list of grant recipients; (2) grants
awarded delineated by recipient; (3) any matching funds or services
contributed by grant recipients or program participants; (4) the
purposes of the grants; and (5) a detailed breakdown of the purposes
and amounts of administrative costs charged to this item; and provided
237

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
further, that any unexpended funds in this item shall not revert but shall
be made available until August 30, 2027 .................................................... $15,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education.
1596-2451 For reimbursements to regional school districts for the transportation
of pupils and to cities, towns, regional vocational or county agricultural
school districts, independent vocational schools and collaboratives for
certain expenditures for transportation of nonresident pupils to
approved vocational-technical programs of any regional or county
agricultural school district, city, town, independent school or
collaborative under section 8A of chapter 74 of the General Laws;
provided, that if the amount appropriated in this item is insufficient to
fully fund said section 8A of said chapter 74, initial reimbursements
made by the department of elementary and secondary education may
be prorated by the department to all eligible cities, towns, regional
vocational or county agricultural school districts, independent
vocational schools and collaboratives; provided further, that funds
from this item for reimbursements to regional school districts for the
transportation of pupils shall be in addition to funds appropriated in
item 7035-0006; and provided further, that the commissioner of
elementary and secondary education may transfer funds from this
item to said item 7035-0006 ....................................................................... $50,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ........................ 100%
Department of Higher Education.
1596-2414 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to
Massachusetts students enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher
education in any public institutions of higher education in the
commonwealth; provided, that funds from this item may be expended
on the administration of the scholarship program; and provided further,
that the commissioner of higher education, in coordination with the
Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall adopt regulations
governing the eligibility and the awarding of financial assistance under
this item ...................................................................................................... $80,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2418 For MassReconnect, a scholarship program to provide financial
assistance to students from the commonwealth who: (i) are enrolled in
and pursuing a program of higher education at a public community
college in the commonwealth; (ii) are not less than 25 years of age as
of the first day of classes; (iii) have not previously earned a college
degree; and (iv) are enrolled in at least 6 credits; provided, that the
funds shall be used to cover any remaining tuition and fees due and the
cost of books and supplies for any eligible student after all other
sources of federal and state grant aid have been exhausted; provided
further, that funds from this item may be expended on student support
services, administration and marketing of said scholarship program;
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months; provided further, that the commissioner of
higher education, in consultation with the executive office of education
238

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
and the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges and in
coordination with the Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall
adopt guidelines governing the eligibility for and the awarding of
financial assistance under this item; provided further, that not later than
January 30, 2026, the department of higher education, in consultation
with the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges, shall
submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and
means detailing the metrics and benchmarks being used to measure
program success including, but not limited to: (A) enrollment; (B)
retention; (C) barriers to student participation; and (D) demographic
data related to program participants; and provided further, that not
later than May 29, 2026, the department of higher education shall
submit information to the house and senate committees on ways and
means on the number of students participating in MassReconnect
at each community college .......................................................................... $24,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2423 For a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to students
in the commonwealth who are enrolled in and pursuing a program of
higher education at a public institution of higher education, as defined
in section 5 of chapter 15A of the General Laws, for an in-demand
profession as defined by the executive office of labor and workforce
development's study on labor market conditions pursuant to section
16A of said chapter 15A; provided, that funds from this item may be
expended on the administration of said scholarship program; provided
further, that the board of higher education, in coordination with the
Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall adopt guidelines
governing the eligibility for and the awarding of financial assistance;
provided further, that not less than $1,500,000 shall be expended for
a scholarship program to provide financial assistance to students from
the commonwealth who: (i) are enrolled in and pursuing either an
associate degree or certificate program at a municipal college; (ii) are
age 25 or older as of the first day of classes; (iii) have not previously
earned a college degree; and (iv) are enrolled in at least 6 credits;
provided, that the funds shall be used to cover any remaining tuition
and fees, costs of books and supplies for any eligible student after all
other sources of federal and state grant aid have been exhausted;
provided further, that funds from this item may be expended on
student support services, administration and the marketing of said
scholarship program; and provided further, that funds may be
expended for programs or activities during the summer months ............... $10,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2439 For state university cohort counseling to ensure student success
(SUCCESS) grants to state universities to provide wraparound
supports and services to improve outcomes for their most vulnerable
populations including, but not limited to, low-income, first-generation,
minority and disabled students and lesbian, gay, bisexual,
transgender, queer and questioning students; provided, that funds
shall be disbursed based on a formula and criteria developed by the
department of higher education; provided further, that eligible
wraparound support activities shall include, but not be limited to, peer
mentors, academic skills workshops and targeted academic, career
and scholarship advising; provided further, that appropriated funds
239

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
may be expended for programs or activities during the summer
months; provided further, that all funds distributed may be spent solely
on personnel costs at the discretion of the universities; and provided
further, that not later than March 3, 2026, the department shall report
to the house and senate committees on ways and means on the
progress made on implementing and funding this program,
including any regulations, guidelines or criteria used to distribute the
funds and on the final distribution of funds to campuses ............................ $14,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2501 For a free community college program for students who: (i) are
enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher education at a public
community college in Massachusetts; (ii) have completed a free
application for federal student aid or an equivalent application for
state-funded financial assistance; (iii) have not earned a prior
baccalaureate degree, or the equivalent; and (vi) are enrolled in at
least 6 credits; provided, that funds shall be expended to cover any
remaining tuition and fees due and an allowance for the cost of books,
supplies and other expenses for any eligible student after all other
sources of federal and state grant aid have been exhausted; provided
further, that students whose household income is at or below 125 per
cent of the state median income shall be granted an allowance of up to
$1,200 per academic year for books, supplies and other expenses for
attending a community college program; provided, however, that said
allowance shall not preclude students from receiving assistance
through MassGrant or MassGrant Plus, subject to the regulations of
said programs; provided further, that the commissioner of higher
education, in consultation with the executive office of education and
the Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges, and in
coordination with the Massachusetts state scholarship office, shall
adopt guidelines governing eligibility for and the awarding of financial
assistance under this item; provided further, that funds from this item
may be expended on student support services, administration and
marketing of said scholarship program; provided further, that students
aged 25 or older may be referred to as MassReconnect students;
provided further, that funds from this item may be expended to create
awareness and conduct public outreach related to MassReconnect;
provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities
during the summer months; provided further, that tuition and fees at
public community colleges shall not increase more than the lesser of:
(A) the ratio of the value of the implicit price deflator for state and local
government purchases in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year to its
value in the third quarter of the fiscal year 2 years prior; and (B) 1.045;
provided further, that the department, after consultation with the
Massachusetts Association of Community Colleges, shall analyze the
faculty and staff capacity to meet the needs of the program established
in this item, to ensure a sufficient workforce; provided further, that not
later than February 1, 2026, the department of higher education, in
consultation with the Massachusetts Association of Community
Colleges, shall submit a report to the joint committee on higher
education and the house and senate committees on ways and means
detailing program uptake, funding distribution and the metrics and
benchmarks being used to measure program success including, but
not limited to: (1) enrollment; (2) retention; (3) barriers to student
participation; and (4) demographic data related to program
240

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
participants; and provided further, that not later than May 31, 2026,
the department of higher education shall submit information to the
executive office for administration and finance, the board of higher
education, the joint committee on higher education and the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the number of
students participating in the program at each community college ............... $94,000,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2601 For additional operational funding for state universities; provided, that
funds from this item shall be distributed in accordance with the funding
formula in line item 7066-1400 of section 2 of chapter 165 of the acts
of 2014; provided further, that funding from this item shall be contingent
upon approval of a funding formula that incorporates equity by the
board of higher education; provided further, that not later than March
3, 2026, the state universities shall submit a report to the house and
senate committees on ways and means on the total balance in all
budgeted and off-budget funds; provided further, that funds from this
item may be transferred to item 7066-1400; and provided further, that
the allocation of funds shall be approved by the board of higher
education .................................................................................................... $10,500,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
1596-2602 For funding to community college campuses; provided, that funds shall
be expended for the continued implementation of community college
reform, for continued initiatives to strengthen the connections between
the colleges, local businesses and regional workforce investment
boards and to improve workforce training at the colleges; provided
further, that funding shall be allocated among the campuses using a
formula that incorporates equity, developed by the commissioner of
higher education in consultation with the secretaries of education,
labor and workforce development and economic development;
provided further, that funds from this item may be transferred to item
7100-4000; and provided further, that the allocation of funds shall be
approved by the board of higher education .................................................. $9,500,000
Education and Transportation Fund ......................... 100%
241

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
SECTION 3 LOCAL AID DISTRIBUTIONS.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026 the distribution of unrestricted general government aid to cities and towns of the balance of
the State Lottery and Gaming Fund, as paid from the General Fund in accordance with clause (c) of the
second paragraph of section 35 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, and additional funds from the General
Fund and the Gaming Local Aid Fund, shall be $1,308,713,668 and shall be apportioned to cities and towns
in accordance with this section.
For fiscal year 2026 the total amounts to be distributed and paid to each city, town and regional
school district from item 7061-0008 of section 2 and item 1596-2438 of section 2F, shall be as set forth in
the following lists. If there is conflict between the language of this section and the distribution listed below,
the distribution below shall control. The specified amounts distributed from said item 7061-0008 of said
section 2 and said item 1596-2438 of said section 2F shall be deemed in full satisfaction of the amounts
due under chapter 70 of the General Laws.
For fiscal year 2026, a district’s school aid shall be calculated according to the provisions of said
chapter 70. The foundation budget category of “low-income enrollment” for the purpose of calculating
foundation enrollment shall be determined by financial eligibility for certain federal programs, as defined by
the provisions of section 2 of said chapter 70, and including a number of students identified and approved
as low income through the supplemental claiming system established and posted by the department for
that purpose, as well as students identified and approved as homeless for purposes of calculating the
McKinney-Vento homelessness grant program administered by the department, consistent with the
conditions provided for in said section 2. The assumed special education enrollment percentage for
vocational school students shall be set at 4.90 per cent and the assumed special education enrollment
percentage for non-vocational school students shall be set at 3.90 per cent.
The per-pupil rates for the employee benefits and fixed charges allotments shall be adjusted by the
foundation employee benefits inflation rate and the per-pupil rates for all other foundation allotments shall
be adjusted by the foundation inflation index. Foundation increments shall be the additional resources
provided for the education of students designated as English learners or low-income; provided, however,
that for low-income students the amount of the foundation increment shall be determined by the low-income
group into which each district is assigned. Foundation budget rates for employee benefits and fixed
charges, guidance and psychological services, special education out-of-district tuition, English learners and
low-income students shall be increased by three-sixths of the gap between the rates used in fiscal year
2021 and the rates established in tables 1 and 2 of section 3 of said chapter 70, consistent with adjustments
prescribed in said section 3 and set at the rates identified in the table below. Required local contributions
shall be calculated pursuant to said chapter 70; provided, that municipal revenue growth factors shall be
calculated in a manner consistent with calculations made in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that the total
statewide target local contribution shall be 59 percent and the effort reduction percentage shall be 100
percent; and provided further that the minimum aid per pupil dollar amount shall be $150.
Chapter 70 aid for fiscal year 2026 shall be the greater of: (i) foundation aid, or (ii) the sum of base
aid and minimum aid. No non-operating district shall receive chapter 70 aid in an amount greater than the
district’s foundation budget.
The department of elementary and secondary education shall not consider health care costs for
retired teachers to be part of net school spending for any district in which such costs were not considered
part of net school spending in fiscal year 1994 and for any district that has not accepted the provisions of
section 260 of chapter 165 of the acts of 2014; provided, however, that any district for whom such costs
are not so considered shall have included as part of net school spending an amount equal to the increase
in the foundation budget for the district associated with health care costs of retired teachers.
No payments to cities, towns or counties maintaining an agricultural school under this section shall
be made after November 30 of the fiscal year until the commissioner of revenue certifies acceptance of the
prior fiscal year’s annual financial reports submitted under section 43 of chapter 44 of the General Laws.
Advance payments shall be made for some or all of periodic local reimbursement or assistance programs
to any city, town, regional school district or independent agricultural school that demonstrates an
242

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
emergency cash shortfall, as certified by the commissioner of revenue and approved by the secretary of
administration and finance, under guidelines established by the secretary.
Base Rates
Instructional
Classroom & Other Materials, Guidance & Employee Special
Instructional Specialist Teaching Professional Equipment & Psychologi Pupil Operations & Benefits/Fixed Education Total, All
Administration Leadership Teachers Services Development Technology cal Services Services Maintenance Charges Tuition Categories
Pre-school 228.66 412.96 1,893.58 485.65 74.89 274.06 206.70 54.80 525.83 909.02 0.00 5,066.15
Kindergarten half-day 228.66 412.96 1,893.58 485.65 74.89 274.06 206.70 54.80 525.83 909.02 0.00 5,066.15
Kindergarten full-day 457.31 825.94 3,787.16 971.33 149.86 548.15 413.42 109.64 1,051.64 1,818.01 0.00 10,132.46
Elementary 457.31 825.94 3,787.11 971.33 149.88 548.15 413.42 164.43 1,051.64 1,818.02 0.00 10,187.23
Junior/Middle 457.31 825.94 3,332.67 699.22 162.46 548.15 428.63 268.61 1,140.11 1,952.67 0.00 9,815.77
High School 457.31 825.94 4,900.96 582.09 157.53 877.03 459.83 619.39 1,105.46 1,728.92 0.00 11,714.46
Vocational 457.31 825.94 8,331.69 582.09 260.44 1,534.79 459.83 619.39 2,068.92 2,213.89 0.00 17,354.29
Special Education & Incremental Rates
Instructional
Classroom Other Materials, Guidance & Employee Special
Instructional & Specialist Teaching Professional Equipment & Psychological Pupil Operations & Benefits/Fixed Education Total, All
Administration Leadership Teachers Services Development Technology Services Services Maintenance Charges Tuition Categories
Pre-school 228.66 412.96 1,893.58 485.65 74.89 274.06 206.70 54.80 525.83 909.02 0.00 5,066.15
Kindergarten half-day 228.66 412.96 1,893.58 485.65 74.89 274.06 206.70 54.80 525.83 909.02 0.00 5,066.15
Kindergarten full-day 457.31 825.94 3,787.16 971.33 149.86 548.15 413.42 109.64 1,051.64 1,818.01 0.00 10,132.46
Elementary 457.31 825.94 3,787.11 971.33 149.88 548.15 413.42 164.43 1,051.64 1,818.02 0.00 10,187.23
Junior/Middle 457.31 825.94 3,332.67 699.22 162.46 548.15 428.63 268.61 1,140.11 1,952.67 0.00 9,815.77
High School 457.31 825.94 4,900.96 582.09 157.53 877.03 459.83 619.39 1,105.46 1,728.92 0.00 11,714.46
Vocational 457.31 825.94 8,331.69 582.09 260.44 1,534.79 459.83 619.39 2,068.92 2,213.89 0.00 17,354.29
Special Education in-district 3,156.17 0.00 10,414.58 9,723.94 502.39 438.50 0.00 0.00 3,525.59 4,353.17 0.00 32,114.34
Special Education tuitioned-out 3,900.17 0.00 0.00 59.58 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 0.00 37,030.05 40,989.80
English learners PK-5 115.25 201.68 1,411.71 201.68 57.61 144.04 86.43 28.82 345.72 348.80 0.00 2,941.74
English learners 6-8 123.15 215.48 1,508.36 215.48 61.56 153.91 92.36 30.79 369.39 372.67 0.00 3,143.15
English learners high school/voc 140.07 245.13 1,715.83 245.13 70.03 175.08 105.05 35.02 420.21 423.94 0.00 3,575.49
Low-income group 1 (0-5.99%) 56.36 267.04 2,606.95 0.00 126.48 19.39 105.56 548.54 0.00 464.11 0.00 4,194.43
Low-income group 2 (6-11.99%) 59.38 281.33 2,746.29 0.00 133.24 20.43 111.20 577.86 0.00 488.93 0.00 4,418.66
Low-income group 3 (12-17.99%) 62.39 295.61 2,885.64 0.00 140.00 21.47 116.85 607.18 0.00 513.73 0.00 4,642.87
Low-income group 4 (18-23.99%) 65.40 309.87 3,024.98 0.00 146.76 22.49 122.49 636.50 0.00 538.55 0.00 4,867.04
Low-income group 5 (24-29.99%) 68.41 324.15 3,164.32 0.00 153.53 23.53 128.14 665.81 0.00 563.35 0.00 5,091.24
Low-income group 6 (30-35.99%) 76.09 360.53 3,519.46 0.00 170.74 26.18 142.51 740.54 0.00 626.58 0.00 5,662.63
Low-income group 7 (36-41.99%) 83.32 394.78 3,853.90 0.00 186.97 28.66 156.06 810.92 0.00 686.11 0.00 6,200.72
Low-income group 8 (42-47.99%) 90.56 429.05 4,188.34 0.00 203.20 31.16 169.60 881.28 0.00 745.65 0.00 6,738.84
Low-income group 9 (48-53.99%) 97.79 463.31 4,522.79 0.00 219.42 33.63 183.14 951.66 0.00 805.19 0.00 7,276.93
Low-income group 10 (54-69.99%) 105.01 497.57 4,857.23 0.00 235.65 36.12 196.68 1,022.02 0.00 864.75 0.00 7,815.03
Low-income group 11 (70-79.99%) 116.63 552.58 5,394.34 0.00 261.70 40.12 218.44 1,135.04 0.00 960.36 0.00 8,679.21
Low-income group 12 (80%+) 128.24 607.61 5,931.45 0.00 287.76 44.11 240.18 1,248.06 0.00 1,055.97 0.00 9,543.38
243

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ABINGTON $14,812,278 $2,422,223
ACTON $0 $1,722,409
ACUSHNET $7,461,972 $1,866,952
ADAMS $0 $2,882,694
AGAWAM $27,210,280 $4,536,201
ALFORD $0 $17,281
AMESBURY $9,957,529 $2,395,443
AMHERST $6,538,659 $10,366,349
ANDOVER $15,338,760 $2,200,200
AQUINNAH $0 $2,878
ARLINGTON $20,246,693 $9,341,579
ASHBURNHAM $0 $979,012
ASHBY $0 $539,155
ASHFIELD $93,683 $228,596
ASHLAND $11,996,178 $1,665,126
ATHOL $0 $3,259,884
ATTLEBORO $61,796,457 $7,024,558
AUBURN $15,740,489 $2,108,747
AVON $4,399,731 $853,424
AYER $0 $932,142
BARNSTABLE $26,088,377 $2,590,019
BARRE $0 $1,107,412
BECKET $76,923 $111,821
BEDFORD $6,667,909 $1,413,464
BELCHERTOWN $14,735,480 $2,095,079
BELLINGHAM $10,531,532 $2,089,340
BELMONT $12,935,419 $2,780,224
BERKLEY $4,318,848 $749,194
BERLIN $0 $248,249
BERNARDSTON $0 $358,127
BEVERLY $15,674,495 $7,190,630
BILLERICA $21,331,984 $7,170,082
BLACKSTONE $234,189 $1,685,374
BLANDFORD $77,586 $156,348
BOLTON $3,474 $243,110
BOSTON $245,309,561 $233,284,129
BOURNE $5,892,775 $1,805,020
BOXBOROUGH $32,909 $310,600
BOXFORD $2,044,923 $598,572
BOYLSTON $113,472 $421,767
BRAINTREE $21,959,550 $7,045,993
244

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
BREWSTER $1,484,085 $486,179
BRIDGEWATER $190,196 $4,484,718
BRIMFIELD $1,791,067 $480,068
BROCKTON $282,074,317 $25,781,650
BROOKFIELD $1,968,286 $607,959
BROOKLINE $17,784,893 $7,817,560
BUCKLAND $0 $377,027
BURLINGTON $10,503,556 $3,224,636
CAMBRIDGE $22,664,367 $26,452,452
CANTON $9,502,600 $2,640,502
CARLISLE $1,533,774 $270,113
CARVER $10,839,443 $1,798,774
CHARLEMONT $106,868 $215,233
CHARLTON $0 $1,783,908
CHATHAM $0 $185,311
CHELMSFORD $15,450,424 $6,249,641
CHELSEA $130,754,505 $10,112,804
CHESHIRE $16,351 $756,413
CHESTER $79,282 $221,683
CHESTERFIELD $133,594 $170,001
CHICOPEE $100,241,158 $14,178,996
CHILMARK $0 $4,619
CLARKSBURG $2,204,261 $447,931
CLINTON $21,848,135 $2,898,564
COHASSET $3,333,035 $633,498
COLRAIN $0 $355,370
CONCORD $4,524,105 $1,428,463
CONWAY $656,966 $220,060
CUMMINGTON $59,811 $102,719
DALTON $261,687 $1,400,933
DANVERS $10,137,350 $3,506,991
DARTMOUTH $11,271,317 $3,103,975
DEDHAM $10,145,563 $4,026,590
DEERFIELD $1,225,219 $591,405
DENNIS $0 $670,586
DEVENS $308,558 $0
DIGHTON $8,253 $952,104
DOUGLAS $9,195,163 $898,577
DOVER $1,154,911 $236,860
DRACUT $28,136,689 $4,314,193
DUDLEY $10,983 $2,200,007
245

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
DUNSTABLE $0 $302,852
DUXBURY $7,351,890 $1,091,453
EAST BRIDGEWATER $13,370,869 $1,843,097
EAST BROOKFIELD $221,080 $357,105
EAST LONGMEADOW $15,669,936 $1,782,313
EASTHAM $556,679 $183,447
EASTHAMPTON $9,063,542 $3,460,974
EASTON $11,511,787 $2,696,435
EDGARTOWN $1,269,737 $82,020
EGREMONT $0 $77,690
ERVING $603,466 $82,759
ESSEX $0 $301,474
EVERETT $126,865,323 $8,506,767
FAIRHAVEN $10,036,083 $2,776,605
FALL RIVER $230,788,276 $29,342,937
FALMOUTH $10,042,889 $1,707,078
FITCHBURG $86,211,388 $10,507,955
FLORIDA $572,487 $61,287
FOXBOROUGH $10,082,632 $1,834,061
FRAMINGHAM $92,499,182 $12,250,410
FRANKLIN $30,460,643 $3,042,531
FREETOWN $16,860 $1,169,221
GARDNER $32,375,957 $5,217,779
GEORGETOWN $6,011,432 $882,077
GILL $0 $299,503
GLOUCESTER $12,161,741 $4,917,750
GOSHEN $96,381 $98,506
GOSNOLD $0 $2,582
GRAFTON $13,539,728 $1,925,260
GRANBY $4,929,700 $1,087,201
GRANVILLE $139,520 $197,416
GREAT BARRINGTON $0 $934,473
GREENFIELD $16,748,064 $3,909,199
GROTON $0 $953,815
GROVELAND $65,470 $896,304
HADLEY $1,462,046 $558,840
HALIFAX $3,649,183 $1,117,742
HAMILTON $0 $827,276
HAMPDEN $0 $847,150
HANCOCK $463,156 $69,520
HANOVER $8,088,931 $2,608,382
246

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
HANSON $40,519 $1,576,798
HARDWICK $0 $573,235
HARVARD $2,418,691 $1,823,506
HARWICH $0 $530,386
HATFIELD $969,096 $384,204
HAVERHILL $94,219,635 $12,101,856
HAWLEY $13,300 $53,286
HEATH $0 $103,023
HINGHAM $9,439,417 $1,943,280
HINSDALE $104,923 $274,161
HOLBROOK $12,796,989 $1,816,822
HOLDEN $14,521 $2,354,185
HOLLAND $1,052,634 $248,529
HOLLISTON $9,575,140 $1,906,809
HOLYOKE $106,764,120 $12,505,347
HOPEDALE $6,443,660 $802,916
HOPKINTON $10,864,019 $967,268
HUBBARDSTON $0 $554,659
HUDSON $13,867,740 $2,455,382
HULL $4,180,024 $2,609,481
HUNTINGTON $436,448 $424,366
IPSWICH $4,538,746 $1,976,544
KINGSTON $6,045,617 $1,181,872
LAKEVILLE $101,399 $1,007,493
LANCASTER $11,693 $1,177,001
LANESBOROUGH $0 $424,745
LAWRENCE $317,611,710 $24,176,627
LEE $2,307,885 $766,840
LEICESTER $11,448,367 $2,137,945
LENOX $1,461,523 $656,319
LEOMINSTER $72,723,191 $7,047,158
LEVERETT $422,288 $219,786
LEXINGTON $19,344,035 $1,887,088
LEYDEN $0 $101,381
LINCOLN $1,446,538 $838,262
LITTLETON $5,259,250 $875,266
LONGMEADOW $7,791,911 $1,720,307
LOWELL $261,489,114 $31,014,530
LUDLOW $15,020,153 $3,761,531
LUNENBURG $9,229,410 $1,302,115
LYNN $317,126,307 $27,568,674
247

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
LYNNFIELD $6,502,690 $1,280,605
MALDEN $69,770,045 $15,448,168
MANCHESTER $0 $273,829
MANSFIELD $20,336,797 $2,746,586
MARBLEHEAD $7,006,279 $1,402,160
MARION $1,250,902 $277,832
MARLBOROUGH $51,900,943 $6,702,846
MARSHFIELD $16,133,973 $2,667,448
MASHPEE $5,216,280 $453,025
MATTAPOISETT $1,099,653 $499,053
MAYNARD $5,983,800 $1,934,459
MEDFIELD $7,255,778 $1,784,906
MEDFORD $18,554,446 $14,935,807
MEDWAY $11,364,627 $1,502,236
MELROSE $13,285,756 $6,314,804
MENDON $38,052 $503,189
MERRIMAC $56,805 $1,036,018
METHUEN $71,034,365 $6,694,913
MIDDLEBOROUGH $23,101,805 $3,035,815
MIDDLEFIELD $13,290 $65,458
MIDDLETON $1,943,879 $673,723
MILFORD $54,536,658 $3,760,956
MILLBURY $9,261,393 $2,180,421
MILLIS $5,267,116 $1,289,163
MILLVILLE $73,662 $501,554
MILTON $12,776,644 $3,956,453
MONROE $141,132 $22,640
MONSON $7,867,879 $1,607,343
MONTAGUE $9,046 $1,764,674
MONTEREY $0 $56,931
MONTGOMERY $31,236 $106,858
MOUNT WASHINGTON $13,818 $36,910
NAHANT $622,905 $465,245
NANTUCKET $4,838,877 $97,561
NATICK $14,509,257 $4,692,127
NEEDHAM $14,721,434 $2,149,525
NEW ASHFORD $123,072 $25,010
NEW BEDFORD $254,298,042 $28,325,395
NEW BRAINTREE $0 $162,548
NEW MARLBOROUGH $0 $72,112
NEW SALEM $0 $127,757
248

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
NEWBURY $16,934 $637,692
NEWBURYPORT $6,192,935 $3,140,406
NEWTON $30,401,034 $7,236,119
NORFOLK $3,873,979 $1,180,826
NORTH ADAMS $16,707,282 $5,462,791
NORTH ANDOVER $13,071,489 $2,523,446
NORTH ATTLEBOROUGH $22,282,527 $3,542,528
NORTH BROOKFIELD $5,046,966 $981,155
NORTH READING $8,066,587 $2,186,313
NORTHAMPTON $8,619,389 $5,412,027
NORTHBOROUGH $4,644,408 $1,373,482
NORTHBRIDGE $16,390,353 $2,599,152
NORTHFIELD $0 $444,877
NORTON $13,707,982 $2,559,197
NORWELL $5,549,338 $1,319,976
NORWOOD $18,520,131 $5,727,421
OAK BLUFFS $2,053,849 $89,550
OAKHAM $0 $236,239
ORANGE $7,047,875 $1,989,947
ORLEANS $492,134 $211,505
OTIS $0 $44,787
OXFORD $12,453,663 $2,531,931
PALMER $12,171,699 $2,469,410
PAXTON $0 $666,310
PEABODY $38,124,801 $8,888,400
PELHAM $292,599 $196,002
PEMBROKE $14,632,674 $2,069,844
PEPPERELL $0 $1,837,779
PERU $91,030 $140,624
PETERSHAM $714,028 $141,162
PHILLIPSTON $0 $227,133
PITTSFIELD $68,450,361 $10,631,253
PLAINFIELD $53,056 $61,775
PLAINVILLE $3,190,373 $934,152
PLYMOUTH $30,162,897 $4,824,871
PLYMPTON $1,145,742 $292,121
PRINCETON $0 $364,573
PROVINCETOWN $328,599 $170,319
QUINCY $47,604,553 $23,511,939
RANDOLPH $30,617,365 $6,400,276
RAYNHAM $0 $1,400,176
249

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
READING $12,326,033 $3,991,857
REHOBOTH $0 $1,283,550
REVERE $107,214,598 $12,666,415
RICHMOND $553,593 $133,218
ROCHESTER $2,537,232 $522,976
ROCKLAND $19,893,378 $3,255,129
ROCKPORT $1,726,466 $538,795
ROWE $156,995 $4,851
ROWLEY $34,649 $664,959
ROYALSTON $0 $221,371
RUSSELL $255,579 $304,112
RUTLAND $0 $1,139,058
SALEM $31,038,303 $8,494,100
SALISBURY $14,443 $778,011
SANDISFIELD $0 $42,669
SANDWICH $8,063,976 $1,387,851
SAUGUS $16,170,602 $4,517,440
SAVOY $531,339 $142,672
SCITUATE $7,234,435 $2,477,060
SEEKONK $8,276,778 $1,515,221
SHARON $11,377,366 $1,723,696
SHEFFIELD $15,185 $299,980
SHELBURNE $0 $322,011
SHERBORN $948,465 $266,716
SHIRLEY $0 $1,615,525
SHREWSBURY $22,487,010 $3,430,063
SHUTESBURY $672,182 $208,810
SOMERSET $11,039,877 $1,888,580
SOMERVILLE $22,553,482 $31,024,812
SOUTH HADLEY $11,136,899 $3,215,900
SOUTHAMPTON $2,742,798 $784,590
SOUTHBOROUGH $3,473,063 $538,561
SOUTHBRIDGE $34,297,908 $4,331,911
SOUTHWICK $220,059 $1,553,218
SPENCER $34,709 $2,785,058
SPRINGFIELD $545,839,651 $46,614,520
STERLING $0 $853,664
STOCKBRIDGE $0 $122,740
STONEHAM $7,891,703 $4,576,264
STOUGHTON $31,413,964 $3,943,077
STOW $0 $518,357
250

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
STURBRIDGE $5,304,154 $953,975
SUDBURY $6,192,244 $1,723,660
SUNDERLAND $931,556 $622,367
SUTTON $5,997,981 $961,202
SWAMPSCOTT $5,783,630 $1,593,845
SWANSEA $11,323,738 $2,312,692
TAUNTON $105,442,130 $10,356,565
TEMPLETON $11,493 $1,717,060
TEWKSBURY $14,642,447 $3,427,114
TISBURY $1,736,199 $120,741
TOLLAND $0 $22,759
TOPSFIELD $1,635,187 $755,262
TOWNSEND $0 $1,618,274
TRURO $470,826 $37,045
TYNGSBOROUGH $8,055,660 $1,189,974
TYRINGHAM $72,676 $15,634
UPTON $39,979 $655,574
UXBRIDGE $10,102,020.00 $1,694,280
WAKEFIELD $9,402,623.00 $4,148,234
WALES $1,203,868.00 $290,839
WALPOLE $10,801,800.00 $3,138,201
WALTHAM $26,380,926.00 $11,824,339
WARE $14,743,900 $2,125,841
WAREHAM $16,793,832 $2,436,234
WARREN $11,789 $1,114,045
WARWICK $392,384 $156,602
WASHINGTON $37,233 $116,303
WATERTOWN $8,513,866 $8,213,318
WAYLAND $7,949,860 $1,113,045
WEBSTER $21,361,821 $3,048,735
WELLESLEY $10,942,336 $1,595,117
WELLFLEET $327,563 $71,972
WENDELL $0 $214,594
WENHAM $0 $527,440
WEST BOYLSTON $3,370,195 $981,077
WEST BRIDGEWATER $7,102,423 $805,204
WEST BROOKFIELD $328,719 $599,742
WEST NEWBURY $13,151 $364,849
WEST SPRINGFIELD $47,140,802 $4,413,074
WEST STOCKBRIDGE $0 $119,724
WEST TISBURY $0 $228,714
251

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Municipality / District Chapter 70 Government Aid
WESTBOROUGH $12,875,256.00 $1,426,899
WESTFIELD $45,142,610.00 $7,751,621
WESTFORD $18,982,269.00 $2,616,820
WESTHAMPTON $514,848 $178,430
WESTMINSTER $0 $806,066
WESTON $4,962,659 $460,595
WESTPORT $5,829,452 $1,498,073
WESTWOOD $7,796,626 $898,330
WEYMOUTH $30,801,983 $10,736,788
WHATELY $351,983 $165,248
WHITMAN $174,351 $2,981,659
WILBRAHAM $0 $1,802,116
WILLIAMSBURG $875,431 $372,791
WILLIAMSTOWN $0 $1,175,614
WILMINGTON $12,602,570 $3,061,838
WINCHENDON $14,394,811 $2,071,546
WINCHESTER $11,388,803 $1,821,859
WINDSOR $28,984 $127,871
WINTHROP $10,448,196 $5,190,981
WOBURN $15,419,389 $7,371,734
WORCESTER $411,779,259 $51,170,554
WORTHINGTON $495,642 $154,668
WRENTHAM $4,163,597 $1,148,005
YARMOUTH $0 $1,554,670
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AID $6,428,152,376 $1,308,713,668
252

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
ACTON BOXBOROUGH $17,200,971 $0
AMHERST PELHAM $10,072,811 $0
ASHBURNHAM WESTMINSTER $16,262,637 $0
ASSABET VALLEY $11,083,668 $0
ATHOL ROYALSTON $25,520,562 $0
AYER SHIRLEY $8,993,333 $0
BERKSHIRE HILLS $3,534,168 $0
BERLIN BOYLSTON $3,149,921 $0
BLACKSTONE MILLVILLE $12,080,008 $0
BLACKSTONE VALLEY $9,595,822 $0
BLUE HILLS $7,641,944 $0
BRIDGEWATER RAYNHAM $34,209,990 $0
BRISTOL COUNTY $5,240,855 $0
BRISTOL PLYMOUTH $14,666,169 $0
CAPE COD $3,579,390 $0
CENTRAL BERKSHIRE $10,080,937 $0
CHESTERFIELD GOSHEN $796,622 $0
CONCORD CARLISLE $3,610,473 $0
DENNIS YARMOUTH $13,956,285 $0
DIGHTON REHOBOTH $14,005,428 $0
DOVER SHERBORN $2,942,852 $0
DUDLEY CHARLTON $25,823,037 $0
ESSEX NORTH SHORE $8,666,224 $0
FARMINGTON RIVER $768,194 $0
FRANKLIN COUNTY $6,198,918 $0
FREETOWN LAKEVILLE $12,333,339 $0
FRONTIER $3,053,027 $0
GATEWAY $6,340,830 $0
GILL MONTAGUE $8,069,823 $0
GREATER FALL RIVER $23,833,067 $0
GREATER LAWRENCE $41,447,422 $0
GREATER LOWELL $38,330,600 $0
GREATER NEW BEDFORD $36,903,254 $0
GROTON DUNSTABLE $11,831,303 $0
HAMILTON WENHAM $4,436,892 $0
HAMPDEN WILBRAHAM $13,043,530 $0
HAMPSHIRE $3,510,417 $0
HAWLEMONT $669,970 $0
HOOSAC VALLEY $12,259,184 $0
KING PHILIP $8,379,178 $0
LINCOLN SUDBURY $4,225,817 $0
253

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
MANCHESTER ESSEX $3,514,666 $0
MARTHAS VINEYARD $3,749,388 $0
MASCONOMET $5,842,553 $0
MENDON UPTON $13,252,594 $0
MINUTEMAN $3,142,029 $0
MOHAWK TRAIL $6,372,134 $0
MONOMOY $4,624,715 $0
MONTACHUSETT $18,762,805 $0
MOUNT GREYLOCK $5,133,546 $0
NARRAGANSETT $13,040,917 $0
NASHOBA $10,547,898 $0
NASHOBA VALLEY $5,001,664 $0
NAUSET $4,000,729 $0
NEW SALEM WENDELL $938,840 $0
NORFOLK COUNTY $1,531,455 $0
NORTH MIDDLESEX $21,623,879 $0
NORTHAMPTON SMITH $963,771 $0
NORTHBORO SOUTHBORO $3,673,616 $0
NORTHEAST METROPOLITAN $16,193,577 $0
NORTHERN BERKSHIRE $7,106,152 $0
OLD COLONY $4,312,665 $0
OLD ROCHESTER $3,710,721 $0
PATHFINDER $7,831,316 $0
PENTUCKET $14,101,990 $0
PIONEER $4,151,899 $0
QUABBIN $17,421,662 $0
QUABOAG $10,600,015 $0
RALPH C MAHAR $6,511,146 $0
SHAWSHEEN VALLEY $6,995,373 $0
SILVER LAKE $10,796,658 $0
SOMERSET BERKLEY $7,204,101 $0
SOUTH MIDDLESEX $9,913,729 $0
SOUTH SHORE $5,963,097 $0
SOUTHEASTERN $24,546,392 $0
SOUTHERN BERKSHIRE $2,243,595 $0
SOUTHERN WORCESTER $14,644,387 $0
SOUTHWICK TOLLAND GRANVILLE $10,169,546 $0
SPENCER EAST BROOKFIELD $14,306,180 $0
TANTASQUA $11,688,349 $0
TRI COUNTY $6,100,766 $0
TRITON $9,645,085 $0
254

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
Unrestricted General
Regional School District Chapter 70 Government Aid
UPISLAND $1,064,412 $0
UPPER CAPE COD $4,720,060 $0
WACHUSETT $37,561,713 $0
WHITMAN HANSON $26,188,146 $0
WHITTIER $13,953,373 $0
TOTAL REGIONAL AID $933,712,176 $0
TOTAL MUNICIPAL AND REGIONAL AID $7,361,864,552 $1,308,713,668
255

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
SECTION 1.
SECTION 2.
SECTION3.
1 SECTION 4. Section 17 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “, the Massachusetts
3 commission against discrimination”.
4 SECTION 5. Said chapter 6 is hereby further amended by striking out section 56 and
5 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
6 Section 56. (a) There shall be a commission to be known as the Massachusetts
7 commission against discrimination. The commission shall be an independent agency of the
8 government of the commonwealth and shall not be subject to the control of any other department
9 or agency.
10 (b)(1) The commission shall consist of 5 members, to be known as commissioners: 3 of
11 whom shall be appointed by the governor; and 2 of whom shall be appointed by the attorney
12 general. The governor shall designate 1 commissioner as chair, who shall devote their full-time
13 duties to their office and the remaining 4 commissioners shall be per diem. Two commissioners
14 shall reside in Worcester, Hampden, Hampshire, Franklin or Berkshire county and 3
15 commissioners shall reside in any of the remaining counties of the commonwealth.
16 (2) Each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. Any commissioner
17 chosen to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term shall be appointed for the
18 unexpired term of the commissioner whom they are to succeed. Three commissioners shall
19 constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting the business of the commission and a majority
20 of commissioners present and voting shall be required for any action of the commission. The
21 chair may call a meeting of the commission and may call for a vote on any matter designated for
22 a vote on the notice of the meeting. A vacancy shall not impair the right of the remaining
23 commissioners to exercise all the powers of the commission. A commissioner may be removed
24 by their appointing authority for inefficiency, neglect of duty, misconduct or malfeasance in
25 office, after being given a written statement of the charges and an opportunity to be heard
26 thereon.
27 (c)(1) The commission shall appoint an executive director. The executive director shall
28 be the executive and administrative head of the commission. The executive director shall: (i)
29 serve at the pleasure of the commission; (ii) receive a salary at least commensurate with the
30 salary received by the chair of the commission, as may be determined by the commission; and
31 (iii) devote their full time and attention to the duties of the office. The executive director shall be
32 a person with skill and experience in management. The executive director shall be responsible
33 for the day-to-day operations of the commission and for administering and ensuring the
34 commission’s ability to enforce the provisions of law relative to the commission and to each
35 administrative unit thereof, which shall include, but shall not be limited to, developing protocols
36 and procedures to execute the commission’s regulations and to expedite the handling of cases
37 and complaints.
256

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
38 (2) The executive director shall annually render a written report to the governor and the
39 general court of the commission’s activities and any recommendations.
40 (d)(1) The executive director shall employ a chief financial officer, who shall be
41 responsible for all funds of the commission. The executive director may employ attorneys, clerks
42 and other employees and agents as the executive director may deem necessary, fix their
43 compensation within the limitations provided by law and prescribe their duties.
44 (2) All employees of the commission shall be subject to chapter 31 and the rules and
45 regulations thereunder; provided, however, that chapter 31 and the rules and regulations
46 thereunder shall not apply to the executive director, executive secretary, the heads and deputy
47 heads of divisions, attorneys, field representatives and such other positions as the commission
48 may from time to time designate.
49 (e) There shall be regional offices located in the cities of Fall River, Springfield and
50 Worcester. The commission shall hold public hearings, as needed, in the respective regions.
51 Every case shall, to the extent practicable, be heard in the region in which the complainant
52 resides.
53 (f)(1) The governor and the attorney general shall appoint an advisory board to the
54 commission, consisting of not less than 21 persons: 13 of whom shall be appointed by the
55 governor and 8 of whom shall be appointed by the attorney general. The members of the
56 advisory board shall include diverse representation and strive to include: (i) persons with
57 expertise in fair housing laws and regulations; (ii) owners and brokers of residential property;
58 (iii) major lending and credit institutions; (iv) major private employers; (v) a designee of the civil
59 service commission; (vi) post-secondary educational institutions; (vii) major labor organizations;
60 (viii) minority racial, ethnic and linguistic groups; (ix) women; (x) older adults; (xi) persons with
61 disabilities; and (xii) recipients of public assistance.
62 (2) Each member of the advisory board shall be appointed for a term of 5 years. Any
63 advisory board member chosen to fill a vacancy occurring other than by expiration of a term
64 shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the advisory board member whom they are to
65 succeed. The governor shall from time to time designate 1 member as chair of the advisory
66 board. The members of the advisory board shall not be compensated for their services, but they
67 shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessary for the performance of their duties.
68 The executive director may provide technical and clerical assistance to the advisory board.
69 (3) The advisory board shall: (i) advise the commission on matters of policy affecting the
70 commission; (ii) review the implementation of the commission’s programs and policies; (iii)
71 from time to time report their conclusions to the commission and the commissioner appointing
72 authorities; and (iv) coordinate the activities of the local or regional advisory boards appointed
73 pursuant to subsection 8 of section 3 of chapter 151B.
74 SECTION 6. Section 18N of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
75 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 30, the words “the chief justice of the
257

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
76 trial court or a designee” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- a retired judge of
77 the trial court to be appointed by the governor.
78 SECTION 7. Section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
79 amended by striking out, in line 98, the figure “$40,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the
80 following figure:- $35,000,000.
81 SECTION 8. Subsection (a) of section 25 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as
82 amended by section 9 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting
83 after the word “appropriation”, the first time it appears, the following words:- ; provided,
84 however, that the commission may enter into contracts or group agreements for lottery games not
85 currently or previously authorized by the commission, resulting in a contractor or licensor to be
86 paid a specified percentage of net or gross revenues of such game, and such payments shall not
87 be subject to appropriation.
88 SECTION 9. Section 11K of chapter 12 of the General Laws is hereby repealed.
89 SECTION 10. Section 11M of said chapter 12, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
90 is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 52 to 54, inclusive, the words “; provided, however,
91 that the commission shall not approve such a request if the request would exceed an annual
92 reimbursement of $3,000,000”.
93 SECTION 11. Subsection (c) of section 20 of chapter 15D of the General Laws, as
94 inserted by section 36 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, in
95 the third sentence, the figure “1”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each
96 instance, the following figure:- 1.25.
97 SECTION 12. Section 7A of chapter 26 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
98 Official Edition, is hereby amended, in lines 18, 33 and 38, by inserting after the figure “176B”,
99 in each instance, the following figure:- , 176E.
100 SECTION 13. Subsection (a) of section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General Laws,
101 as most recently amended by section 52 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further
102 amended by striking out the figure “$250,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
103 figure:- $500,000,000.
104 SECTION 14. Section 64 of said chapter 29, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
105 hereby amended by striking out, in line 31, the words “independent contractors” and inserting in
106 place thereof the following words:- contracted employees.
107 SECTION 15. Said section 64 of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby further
108 amended by adding the following paragraph:-
109 The state treasurer, on behalf of the commonwealth, may establish an automatic
110 enrollment feature within the deferred compensation program. The automatic enrollment feature
111 shall not require prior authorization by an employee. Automatic enrollment features shall be set
258

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
112 forth in the deferred compensation plan document and shall include, but shall not be limited to,
113 the following:
114 (i) automatic enrollment shall apply only to employees hired on or after January 1, 2026;
115 provided, however, that for any commonwealth agencies or departments that purchase or make
116 payments to an individual or group annuity contract, custodial account or any other investment
117 authorized under section 403(b) of the Code for its employees, automatic enrollment shall only
118 apply at said agency’s or department’s discretion and affirmative election;
119 (ii) automatic enrollment shall apply only to new employees of a governmental body,
120 described in section 64B, if the governmental body elects to implement the automatic enrollment
121 feature for its employees;
122 (iii) automatic enrollment shall not require new employees to defer any amount of their
123 compensation;
124 (iv) an employee who is automatically enrolled shall have the option to decline
125 participation in the plan and shall have 90 days from the date of enrollment to discontinue
126 participation in the plan;
127 (v) a qualified default investment option shall be made to receive contributions by any
128 automatically-enrolled employee who does not choose an investment alternative to receive the
129 employee’s contributions; and
130 (vi) notice requirements to automatically-enrolled participants shall be made in
131 accordance with federal law.
132 SECTION 16. Section 64B of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
133 inserting after the third paragraph the following paragraph:-
134 On behalf of a governmental body, the body’s treasurer or, if there is no treasurer, the
135 chief financial officer by whatever name that person is called, may at its own election implement
136 an automatic enrollment feature within its deferred compensation program established pursuant
137 to this section. The automatic enrollment feature shall not require advance authorization by an
138 employee. Subject to the election of each governmental body, any such automatic enrollment
139 feature permitted as a part of a governmental body’s deferred compensation program shall only
140 apply to new employees of a governmental body hired on or after January 1, 2026 and such
141 deferred compensation program shall be required to include the specifications for auto
142 enrollment detailed in clauses (ii) through (vi), inclusive, of the ninth paragraph of section 64.
143 SECTION 17. The definition of “Employee” in section 1 of chapter 32 of the General
144 Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- “Employee”, as
145 applied to persons whose regular compensation is paid by the advisory board to the
146 Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority established in section 7A of chapter 161A, shall
147 mean any person who is engaged in duties that require that the person’s time be devoted to the
259

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
148 service of said advisory board in each year during the ordinary working hours of regular and
149 permanent employees.
150 SECTION 18. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
151 amended by inserting after the word “District,”, in line 389, the following words:- the advisory
152 board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority as established in section 7A of chapter
153 161A.
154 SECTION 19. Said section 1 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
155 amended by inserting after the word “employer”, in line 602, the following words:- , including
156 any accrued sick, personal or vacation leave except when paid as a supplement to the receipt of
157 weekly workers’ compensation benefits pursuant to section 69 of chapter 152.
158 SECTION 20. Section 2 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
159 inserting after the word “Council”, in line 21, the following words:- , the advisory board to the
160 Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority established in section 7A of chapter 161A.
161 SECTION 21. Section 2 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
162 amended by inserting after the word “Authority”, in line 16, the following words:- , the advisory
163 board to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority as established in section 7A of chapter
164 161A.
165 SECTION 22. Section 2A of chapter 65C of the General Laws, as amended by sections
166 36 and 37 of chapter 50 of the acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by striking out paragraphs
167 (a) and (b) and inserting in place thereof the following 2 paragraphs:-
168 (a) A tax is hereby imposed upon the transfer of the estate of each person dying on or
169 after January 1, 1997 who, at the time of death, was a resident of the commonwealth. The
170 amount of the tax shall be equal to the credit for state death taxes that would have been allowable
171 to a decedent’s estate as computed under section 2011 of the Code, as in effect on December 31,
172 2000, hereinafter referred to as the “credit”. The credit shall be determined based on the value of
173 the federal gross estate after such estate is increased by the value of any property: (i) not
174 included in the federal gross estate; (ii) in which the decedent had at death a qualifying income
175 interest for life described in subsection (c) of section 3A; (iii) for which a deduction was allowed
176 for Massachusetts estate tax purposes with respect to the transfer of such property to the
177 decedent; and (iv) which is not real or tangible personal property located outside of the
178 commonwealth at the time of death. If the federal gross estate of a person includes real or
179 tangible personal property located outside of the commonwealth at the time of death, the credit
180 shall be determined based on the value of the federal gross estate after such estate is reduced by
181 the value of such real or tangible personal property located outside of the commonwealth and
182 increased by the value of any property: (A) not included in the federal gross estate; (B) in which
183 the decedent had at death a qualifying income interest for life described in subsection (c) of
184 section 3A; (C) for which a deduction was allowed for Massachusetts estate tax purposes with
185 respect to the transfer of such property to the decedent; and (D) that is not real or tangible
186 personal property located outside of the commonwealth at the time of death; provided, however,
260

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
187 that for the purposes of calculating the federal taxable estate, no deduction shall be allowed that
188 is attributable to such real or tangible personal property located outside of the commonwealth.
189 (b) A tax is hereby imposed upon the transfer of real property situated in this
190 commonwealth and upon tangible personal property having an actual situs in this commonwealth
191 of every person who at the time of their death was not a resident of this commonwealth. The
192 amount of this tax is the amount of the credit calculated based upon a federal gross estate that is
193 equal to the sum of: (i) the value of the estate’s real or tangible personal property located in the
194 commonwealth; and (ii) the value of any real or tangible property: (A) not included in the federal
195 gross estate; (B) in which the decedent had at death a qualifying income interest for life
196 described in subsection (c) of section 3A; (C) for which a deduction was allowed for
197 Massachusetts estate tax purposes with respect to the transfer of such property to the decedent;
198 and (D) which is not located outside of the commonwealth at the time of death. Under this
199 subsection, for the purposes of calculating the federal taxable estate, no deduction shall be
200 allowed that is attributable to property other than such real or tangible personal property located
201 in the commonwealth.
202 SECTION 23. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
203 section 87DDD1/2 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
204 Section 87DDD1/2. (a) No person shall engage in the business of finding dwelling
205 accommodations for prospective tenants for a fee unless such person is a licensed broker or real
206 estate salesman as defined in section 87PP.
207 (b) A licensed broker or real estate salesperson may exclusively contract in writing with
208 a: (i) prospective tenant to find for rent residential real property for a tenant; provided, that the
209 licensed broker or real estate salesperson may present an offer to lease to the landlord or
210 landlord’s agent and negotiate on behalf of the tenant; or (ii) landlord or landlord’s agent to find
211 a tenant for a residential real property.
212 (c) No tenant or prospective tenant shall be charged a commission or other fee by a
213 licensed broker or real estate salesperson for procuring residential real property for lease or
214 rental, including if the broker has been engaged by the landlord to market the premises
215 exclusively; provided, however, that the tenant or prospective tenant may be responsible for
216 rental brokerage fees only if: (i) the tenant or prospective tenant initiated contact with the
217 licensed broker or real estate salesperson, including, but not limited to, by responding to an
218 advertisement or listing; (ii) has received a rental brokerage fee disclosure from the licensed
219 broker or real estate salesperson; and (iii) has agreed to the terms and conditions of the brokerage
220 fee disclosure in writing and in accordance with applicable law.
221 SECTION 24. Section 9D of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the
222 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 21, the words “or MassHealth-
223 only”.
261

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
224 SECTION 25. Said section 9D of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
225 amended by striking out, in line 31, the word “or” and inserting in place thereof the following
226 word:- and.
227 SECTION 26. Said section 9D of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
228 amended by striking out, in lines 55 and 56, the words “or only eligible for benefits under Title
229 XIX of the Social Security Act”.
230 SECTION 27. Section 63 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
231 striking out, in lines 27 and 28, the words “the lesser of $240,000,000, or an amount” and
232 inserting in place thereof the following words:- an amount less than or.
233 SECTION 28. Chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
234 section 12C the following section:-
235 Section 12D. (a) In any city or town that accepts this section, the local licensing authority
236 may allow any licensee that is licensed to sell only wines and malt beverages pursuant to section
237 12 to trade in said license and be issued a license to sell all alcoholic beverages pursuant to
238 section 12; provided, that any wine and malt beverage license that is traded in to the local
239 licensing authority for an all alcoholic beverage license under this section shall become non-
240 transferable upon the issuance of the license to sell all alcoholic beverages; provided, however,
241 that a license converted under this section shall be subject to all other relevant provisions of this
242 chapter.
243 (b) The local licensing authority of a city or town that accepts this section may charge a
244 reasonable fee that shall not be excessive for a license for wine and malt beverage to be traded in
245 for an all alcoholic beverages license under this section.
246 (c) The local licensing authority of a city or town that accepts this section may establish
247 additional requirements for a license for wine and malt beverage to be traded in for an all
248 alcoholic beverages license under this section.
249 (d) A license for wine and malt beverage traded in for an all alcoholic beverages license
250 under this section shall not increase the total number of licenses authorized pursuant to section
251 17 or any other general or special law.
252 SECTION 29. Section 15B of chapter 186 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
253 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “pay”, in line 17, the following
254 words:- , to the lessor or to any agent of the lessor,.
255 SECTION 30. Chapter 258B of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
256 section 4 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
257 Section 4. (a) There shall be a victim and witness assistance board consisting of 7
258 members who shall serve without compensation. Notwithstanding any provision of section 6 of
259 chapter 268A to the contrary, the board shall consist of the attorney general or a designee, who
262

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
260 shall serve as chair, and 6 persons to be appointed by the governor, 2 of whom shall be district
261 attorneys and 4 of whom shall be members of the public of whom 3 shall be victims of a crime
262 and 1 shall represent a community disproportionately impacted by high rates of violence and
263 crime or a population underserved due to racial or ethnic identity; provided, however, that the 3
264 members who are victims of a crime shall be selected from a list of not less than 5 nominations
265 provided by the executive director of the Massachusetts office of victim assistance. For the
266 purposes of this subsection, “members of the public” shall not include any current local, state or
267 federal elected officials. Members of the board shall be selected from diverse ethnicities, races,
268 religions, ages, sexual orientations, gender identities, socio-economic status and geographical
269 backgrounds from throughout the commonwealth. Each member shall serve for a term of 3 years
270 and until their successor is duly appointed and qualified; provided, however, that any person
271 appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members of
272 the board shall be eligible for reappointment.
273 (b) The board shall, by majority vote of its members, appoint an executive director who
274 shall serve, subject to appropriation, at such rate of compensation as the board directs for a term
275 of 3 years unless removed for cause by a vote of 6 members of the board. The executive director,
276 subject to appropriation, shall have the power to hire staff, subject to the approval of the board,
277 as is needed to fulfill the powers and duties of the board. The executive director shall have such
278 other powers and duties as the board may delegate to them.
279 (c) The provisions of chapter 31 shall not apply to the executive director or any employee
280 of the board.
281 (d) The board shall review program plans, annual reports and the implementation and
282 operation of programs as described in this chapter. The board shall promulgate rules for the
283 preparation and review of such program plans and annual reports.
284 (e) In addition to the foregoing, the board shall:
285 (i) have printed and shall make available to social service agencies, medical facilities and
286 law enforcement agencies, cards, posters, brochures or other materials explaining the victim and
287 witness rights and services established under this chapter;
288 (ii) assist hospitals, clinics and other medical facilities, whether public or private, in
289 disseminating information giving notice of the rights established under this chapter; provided,
290 that this assistance may include providing informational materials including posters suitable to
291 be displayed in emergency and waiting rooms;
292 (iii) assist law enforcement agencies in familiarizing all of their officers and employees
293 with the crime victims’ rights as provided under this chapter; provided, that this assistance may
294 include supplying informational literature on this subject to be utilized as part of the training
295 curriculum for all trainee officers;
296 (iv) assist all local law enforcement agencies in establishing procedures whereby
297 expedient notification is given to victims and witnesses, as defined under this chapter, of the
263

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
298 rights provided under this chapter; provided, that in municipalities that do not have a local law
299 enforcement agency, the board shall establish procedures whereby it, in cooperation with the
300 state police, shall give notice to victims of crimes as provided in this section;
301 (v) assume the management and administration of the Garden of Peace, a public
302 memorial garden located on the plaza of 100 Cambridge street in the city of Boston to honor
303 victims of homicide, to receive gifts or grants of money or property to assist the board in the
304 maintenance and operation of the memorial and to establish an advisory committee that shall
305 consist of individuals who have served on the board of directors of the Garden of Peace or other
306 interested citizens appointed by the victim witness assistance board to provide ongoing advice to
307 the board; and
308 (vi) administer the provisions of chapter 258C through the Massachusetts office for
309 victim assistance.
310 (f) The executive director, appointed by the board, shall have the authority to promulgate
311 rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 30A as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.
312 SECTION 31. Section 1 of chapter 258C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
313 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting before the definition of “Catastrophic injury”
314 the following definition:-
315 “Agency”, the Massachusetts office for victim assistance, which administers the
316 provisions of chapter 258B on behalf of the victim and witness assistance board.
317 SECTION 32. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
318 amended by striking out the definition of “Department”.
319 SECTION 33. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
320 amended by striking out, in lines 32, 64 and 65, each time it appears, the word “his” and
321 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- the victim’s.
322 SECTION 34. Said section 1 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
323 amended by striking out the definition of “Division” and inserting in place thereof the following
324 definition:-
325 “Director”, the executive director of the agency or the executive director’s designee.
326 SECTION 35. Section 2 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
327 striking out, in lines 2, 9, 29, 40 and 41, each time it appears, the word “division” and inserting
328 in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- agency.
329 SECTION 36. Said section 2 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
330 amended by striking out, in line 17, the word “he” and inserting in place thereof the following
331 words:- the claimant.
264

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
332 SECTION 37. Subclause (B) of clause (1) of subsection (b) of section 3 of said chapter
333 258C, as amended by section 155 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended
334 by striking out the word “program”.
335 SECTION 38. Subclause (D) of clause (2) of said subsection (b) of said section 3 of said
336 chapter 258C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in
337 lines 61 and 68, each time it appears, the word “he” and inserting in place thereof, in each
338 instance, the following words:- the victim.
339 SECTION 39. Subclause (E) of said clause (2) of said subsection (b) of said section 3 of
340 said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 73, the word “his”
341 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- the victim’s.
342 SECTION 40. Said chapter 258C is hereby further amended by striking out section 4 and
343 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
344 Section 4. (a) The agency shall administer this chapter. The director may appoint and
345 remove investigative, legal, clerical or other staff as the work of the agency requires.
346 (b) The director may promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 30A as may be
347 necessary to carry out this chapter.
348 (c) The director may apply for and receive sums which may be transmitted to the victim
349 compensation fund maintained by the treasurer and for any other such funds as may become
350 available to administer the requirements of this chapter.
351 SECTION 41. Section 5 of said chapter 258C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
352 is hereby amended by striking out, in line 4, the word “he” and inserting in place thereof the
353 following words:- the claimant.
354 SECTION 42. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
355 amended by striking out, in lines 6, 18, 20 and 26, each time it appears, the word “division” and
356 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following word:- agency.
357 SECTION 43. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
358 amended by striking out, in line 22, the word “division” and inserting in place thereof the
359 following words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
360 SECTION 44. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
361 amended by striking out, in line 33, the word “him” and inserting in place thereof the following
362 words:- the person.
363 SECTION 45. Said section 5 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
364 amended by striking out, in line 33, the words “attorney general” and inserting in place thereof
365 the following words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
265

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
366 SECTION 46. Section 6 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
367 striking out, in line 2, the word “division” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
368 agency.
369 SECTION 47. Said chapter 258C is hereby further amended by striking out section 7 and
370 inserting in place thereof the following section:-
371 Section 7. Within 15 days of completion of the claims review, the director shall notify the
372 claimant of compensation to be paid or denied and the reasons therefor and shall issue payment
373 in accordance with regulations established under this chapter. The notice shall contain
374 information regarding the right of the claimant to petition for judicial review of the decision by
375 the director.
376 SECTION 48. Section 8 of said chapter 258C, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
377 is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2, 4, 5, 8, 11 and 16, each time it appears, the word
378 “program”.
379 SECTION 49. Said section 8 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
380 amended by striking out, in line 5, the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following
381 words:- the director’s.
382 SECTION 50. Section 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
383 striking out, in lines 2, 6, 9, 11 and 42, each time it appears, the word “program”.
384 SECTION 51. Said section 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
385 amended by striking out, in line 12, the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following
386 words:- the director’s.
387 SECTION 52. The first paragraph of subsection (e) of said section 9 of said chapter
388 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the fourth and fifth sentences and
389 inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:- The clerk of the court shall immediately
390 notify the claimant in writing of the decision and shall forward to the agency a certified copy of
391 the decision. The agency, without further authorization, shall, subject to appropriation, pay the
392 claimant the amount determined by the court.
393 SECTION 53. Said section 9 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
394 amended by striking out, in lines 33, 34, 37, 40 and 41, each time it appears, the word “his” and
395 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- the victim’s.
396 SECTION 54. Section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
397 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “attorney general” and inserting in place thereof the
398 following word:- agency.
399 SECTION 55. Said section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
400 amended by striking out, in line 7, the words “attorney general” and inserting in place thereof the
401 following words:- agency, through the attorney general,.
266

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
402 SECTION 56. Said section 11 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
403 amended by striking out, in line 8, the word “he”.
404 SECTION 57. Section 12 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
405 striking out, in line 4, the word “division” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
406 agency.
407 SECTION 58. Said section 12 of said chapter 258C, as so appearing, is hereby further
408 amended by inserting after the word “general”, in line 15, the following words:- , representing
409 the agency,.
410 SECTION 59. Said chapter 258C is hereby further amended by adding the following
411 section:-
412 Section 15. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all records and information
413 received, obtained or maintained by the agency in connection with any claim for crime victim
414 compensation shall be confidential and privileged. All records and information shall not be
415 disclosed by the agency or by anyone who receives such records or information from the agency.
416 (b) Nothing in this section shall preclude disclosure of records or information:
417 (i) for the processing of a claim by the agency or responding to an action in court seeking
418 review of a decision by the agency;
419 (ii) consisting of information exchanged between the claimant or the claimant’s
420 authorized representative and the agency; provided, that the claimant or the claimant’s
421 authorized representative consents to such disclosure in writing; or
422 (iii) upon a lawful order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
423 SECTION 60. Section 152 of chapter 68 of the acts of 2011 is hereby repealed.
424 SECTION 61. Section 81 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023 is hereby amended by
425 striking out the word “2-year”, each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each
426 instance, the following word:- 3-year.
427 SECTION 62. Subsection (d) of said section 81 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by
428 striking out the words “and July 1, 2026” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- ,
429 and all subsequent annual reports shall be submitted not later than July 1 of each year thereafter.
430 SECTION 63. Section 114 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by striking out the
431 figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2027.
432 SECTION 64. Notwithstanding section 59 of chapter 23K of the General Laws or any
433 other general or special law to the contrary, 100 per cent of the revenue received from a category
267

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
434 1 licensee, as defined in section 2 of said chapter 23K, pursuant to subsection (a) of section 55 of
435 said chapter 23K, in fiscal year 2026 shall be transferred as follows:
436 (i) 30.1 per cent to the Gaming Local Aid Fund established in section 63 of said chapter
437 23K;
438 (ii) 20.6 per cent to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund established in section 2ZZZ
439 of chapter 29 of the General Laws;
440 (iii) 19.4 per cent to the Education Fund established in section 64 of said chapter 23K;
441 (iv) 13.2 per cent to the Gaming Economic Development Fund established in section
442 2DDDD of said chapter 29;
443 (v) 6.2 per cent to the Local Capital Projects Fund established in section 2EEEE of said
444 chapter 29;
445 (vi) 5 per cent to the Public Health Trust Fund established in section 58 of said chapter
446 23K;
447 (vii) 2.5 per cent to the Race Horse Development Fund established in section 60 of said
448 chapter 23K;
449 (viii) 2 per cent to the Massachusetts Cultural and Performing Arts Mitigation Trust Fund
450 established in section 2HHHHH of said chapter 29; and
451 (ix) 1 per cent to the Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund to fund tourist promotion
452 agencies under subsection (b) of section 13T of chapter 23A of the General Laws.
453 SECTION 65. (a) There shall be a task force on vocational-technical education program
454 admissions to examine and make recommendations on: (i) admissions policies pursuant to
455 chapter 74 of the General Laws; (ii) the collection, dissemination and analysis of district-level
456 and statewide data on vocational-technical education program admissions and waitlists for
457 programs pursuant to said chapter 74; and (iii) the standard for review and enforcement of the
458 policies pursuant to clause (i) and data collected, disseminated and analyzed pursuant to clause
459 (ii).
460 (b) The task force shall consist of the following 15 members: the chairs of the joint
461 committee on education, who shall serve as co-chairs; the chairs of the joint committee on labor
462 and workforce development; a member of the house of representatives appointed by the house
463 minority leader; a member of the senate appointed by the senate minority leader; 1 member of
464 the gateway cities legislative caucus; the commissioner of elementary and secondary education
465 or a designee; 1 member of the Massachusetts Association of Vocational Administrators; 1
466 member of the Alliance for Vocational Technical Education; 1 member of the Massachusetts
467 Career & Technical Educators Organization; 1 member of the Massachusetts Association of
468 School Committees; 1 member of the Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents; 1
268

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
469 member of the Massachusetts Association of Regional Schools; and 1 member of the
470 Massachusetts Municipal Association.
471 (c) The first meeting of the task force shall take place not later than September 15, 2025.
472 The task force shall conduct at least 1 public hearing to receive testimony from members of the
473 public. Not later than September 15, 2026, the task force shall file a report containing its findings
474 and recommendations, including legislative recommendations, if any, with the clerks of the
475 house of representatives and the senate and the house and senate committees on ways and means.
476 SECTION 66. (a) The executive office of health and human services shall establish a
477 task force to address barriers and impediments to the practice of telehealth across state lines. The
478 task force shall consist of the following 9 members: the secretary of the executive office of
479 health and human services or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of the
480 department of public health or a designee; the commissioner of the department of mental health
481 or a designee; the executive director of the board of registration in medicine or a designee; the
482 undersecretary of the office of consumer affairs and business regulation or a designee; a
483 representative from the health policy commission; a representative from the Massachusetts
484 Medical Society; a representative from the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association; and a
485 representative from the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers.
486 (b)(1) The task force shall conduct an analysis and issue a report evaluating the
487 commonwealth’s options to facilitate appropriate interstate medical practice and the practice of
488 telemedicine, including, but not limited to, consideration of the recommendations from the
489 Federation of State Medical Boards Workgroup on telemedicine, the Telehealth Act developed
490 by the Uniform Law Commission, model legislation developed by the American Medical
491 Association, the interstate medical licensure compact and other licensure reciprocity agreements.
492 (2) The analysis and report shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) an analysis of
493 physician job vacancies in the commonwealth broken down by practice specialization and
494 projected vacancies based on the demographics of the commonwealth’s physician workforce and
495 medical school graduate retention rates; (ii) an analysis of other states’ entry into the interstate
496 medical licensure compact and any impact on quality of care resulting from entry; (iii) an
497 analysis of the ability of physicians to provide follow-up care across state lines, including via
498 telehealth; (iv) an analysis of registration models for providers who may provide care for patients
499 via telehealth with the provider located in 1 state and the patient located in another state;
500 provided, that said analysis shall include delineation of provider responsibilities for registration
501 and reporting to state professional licensure boards; (v) an analysis of impacts to health care
502 quality, cost and access resulting from other states’ entry into a medical licensure compact and
503 anticipated impacts to health care quality, cost and access associated with entry into an interstate
504 medical licensure compact; (vi) evaluations of barriers and solutions regarding prescribing across
505 state lines; (vii) evaluations of the feasibility of a regional reciprocity agreement allowing
506 telemedicine across state lines both for existing patient provider relationships and the
507 establishment of new relationships; (viii) evaluations of the feasibility of the establishment of
508 interstate proxy credentialing; and (ix) recommendations to support the continuity of care for
509 patients utilizing telehealth across state lines, including, but not limited to, recommendations to
269

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
510 support the continuity of care for people aged 25 and under when providing telehealth across
511 state lines.
512 (c) The task force shall submit its report, including any recommendations, to the clerks of
513 the house of representatives and the senate and the joint committee on health care financing not
514 later than July 1, 2026.
515 SECTION 67. (a) The working group established pursuant to item 4000-0601 of section
516 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 shall continue to develop recommendations, in addition to
517 those filed in the personal care attendant working group report finalized on February 28, 2025,
518 for the long-term sustainability of the personal care attendant program, including, but not limited
519 to, cost growth targets and how to achieve those targets for the program. Said recommendations
520 shall be filed with the secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate
521 committees on ways and means not later than November 28, 2025.
522 (b)(1) The executive office of health and human services shall establish an
523 implementation plan to preserve and allow for the long-term sustainability and cost containment
524 of the personal care attendant program. The implementation plan shall include, but shall not be
525 limited to: (i) a detailed description of how the recommendations from the February 28, 2025
526 report and the report required pursuant to subsection (a) will be implemented, including, but not
527 limited to: (A) any actions already taken to implement the recommendations and the dates on
528 which said actions were taken; and (B) future actions needed to implement the
529 recommendations; (ii) savings realized and anticipated from the implementation of the
530 recommendations from the reports with a detailed description of any changes or adjustments
531 from projected savings included in said reports; (iii) a timeline for the implementation of said
532 recommendations; (iv) the program’s growth rate in fiscal year 2026 as of December 15, 2025;
533 (v) any additional changes to the program necessary to contain the program costs consistent with
534 the goals of the working group and the cost growth targets determined by the working group
535 pursuant to subsection (a); and (vi) any other information necessary to explain cost containment
536 measures to be implemented for the program. Said implementation plan shall be filed with the
537 secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate committees on ways and means
538 not later than January 1, 2026.
539 (2) Not later than March 7, 2026, the executive office of health and human services shall
540 submit an update on the progress of the implementation of the recommendations of the reports
541 pursuant to subsection (a) and said report finalized February 28, 2025 and any other actions
542 taken to preserve and allow for the long-term sustainability and cost containment of the personal
543 care attendant program. The update on the progress of the implementation shall outline the
544 impact of the cost growth targets and how those targets are being achieved. The report shall be
545 submitted to the secretary of administration and finance and the house and senate committees on
546 ways and means.
547 SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
548 department of elementary and secondary education shall not: (i) promulgate or otherwise amend
549 its regulations relative to vocational-technical education program admissions pursuant to chapter
550 74 of the General Laws prior to the completion of the report of the task force established
270

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
551 pursuant to section 65; or (ii) take any other action prior to the completion of the report of the
552 task force that would otherwise alter, amend or affect the admissions policies of schools and
553 programs pursuant to said chapter 74 for the 2025-2026 school year or 2026-2027 vocational-
554 technical education program admissions cycle.
555 SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
556 comptroller shall transfer capital gains collected in excess of the threshold pursuant to section 5G
557 of chapter 29 of the General Laws on a quarterly basis as follows: (i) 65 per cent to the
558 Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in subsection (e) of subdivision 8 of section
559 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, which shall satisfy the fiscal year 2026 requirements set
560 forth in subdivision (1) of section 22C of said chapter 32, as amended by section 22 of chapter
561 28 of the acts of 2023; (ii) 20 per cent to the Commonwealth Stabilization Fund established in
562 section 2H of said chapter 29; and (iii) 15 per cent to the State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund
563 established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws.
564 SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary
565 of administration and finance may reduce the allotments of appropriations made in chapter 102
566 of the acts of 2021 and chapter 268 of the acts of 2022 by up to $200,000,000, which shall revert
567 to the General Fund in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. Not less than 15 days before
568 reducing said allotments, the secretary shall provide written notice to the house and senate
569 committees on ways and means summarizing the allotment reductions subject to this provision.
570 SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
571 2026, $110,000,000 shall be considered operating assistance and distributed to regional transit
572 authorities from item 1595-6370 of section 2E. For fiscal year 2026, $94,000,000 of the amount
573 transferred in item 1595-6370 shall be distributed based on fiscal year 2025 distributions in
574 accordance with the updated fiscal year 2025 bilateral memorandum of understanding between
575 each regional transit authority and the Massachusetts Department of Transportation; provided,
576 however, that each regional transit authority shall receive operating assistance from said item
577 1595-6370 of said section 2E of not less than the amount received in fiscal year 2025. The
578 department may require each regional transit authority to provide data on ridership, customer
579 service and satisfaction, asset management and financial performance, including farebox
580 recovery, and shall compile any such collected data into a report on the performance of regional
581 transit authorities and detail each authority’s progress towards meeting the performance metrics
582 established in each memorandum of understanding.
583 SECTION 72. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the amounts
584 transferred pursuant to subdivision (1) of section 22C of chapter 32 of the General Laws shall be
585 made available for the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in section 22 of said
586 chapter 32. The amounts transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said section 22C of said
587 chapter 32 shall meet the commonwealth’s obligations pursuant to said section 22C of said
588 chapter 32, including retirement benefits payable by the state employees’ retirement system and
589 the state teachers’ retirement system, for the costs associated with a 3 per cent cost-of-living
590 adjustment pursuant to section 102 of said chapter 32, for the reimbursement of local retirement
591 systems for previously authorized cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to said section 102 of said
592 chapter 32 and for the costs of increased survivor benefits pursuant to chapter 389 of the acts of
271

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
593 1984. The state board of retirement and each city, town, county and district shall verify these
594 costs, subject to rules that shall be adopted by the state treasurer. The state treasurer may make
595 payments upon a transfer of funds to reimburse certain cities and towns for pensions of retired
596 teachers, including any other obligation that the commonwealth has assumed on behalf of a
597 retirement system other than the state employees’ retirement system or state teachers’ retirement
598 system, including the commonwealth’s share of the amounts to be transferred pursuant to section
599 22B of said chapter 32. The payments under this section shall be made only pursuant to
600 distribution of money from the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund and any distribution,
601 and the payments for which distributions are required, shall be detailed in a written report
602 prepared quarterly by the secretary of administration and finance and submitted to the house and
603 senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on public service in advance of
604 the distribution. Distributions shall not be made in advance of the date on which a payment is
605 actually to be made. If the amount transferred pursuant to said subdivision (1) of said section
606 22C of said chapter 32 exceeds the amount necessary to adequately fund the annual pension
607 obligations, the excess amount shall be credited to the Pension Reserves Investment Trust Fund
608 established in subdivision (8) of said section 22 of said chapter 32 to reduce the unfunded
609 pension liability of the commonwealth.
610 SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
611 unexpended balances in items 0699-0015 and 0699-9100 of section 2 shall be deposited into the
612 State Retiree Benefits Trust Fund established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws
613 before the certification of the fiscal year 2026 consolidated net surplus, pursuant to section 5C of
614 chapter 29 of the General Laws. The amount deposited shall be an amount equal to 10 per cent of
615 all payments received by the commonwealth in fiscal year 2026 under the master settlement
616 agreement in Commonwealth of Massachusetts v. Philip Morris, Inc. et al., Middlesex Superior
617 Court, No. 95-7378; provided, however, that if in fiscal year 2026 the unexpended balances of
618 said items 0699-0015 and 0699-9100 of said section 2 are less than 10 per cent of all payments
619 received by the commonwealth in fiscal year 2026 under the master settlement agreement
620 payments, an amount equal to the difference shall be transferred to the State Retiree Benefits
621 Trust Fund from payments received by the commonwealth under the master settlement
622 agreement.
623 SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, prior to
624 transferring the consolidated net surplus in the budgetary funds for fiscal year 2026 to the
625 Commonwealth Stabilization Fund pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the
626 comptroller shall transfer $14,000,000 from the General Fund to the Disaster Relief and
627 Resiliency Fund established in section 2HHHHHH of said chapter 29.
628 SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary
629 of administration and finance, in consultation with the secretary of health and human services,
630 may transfer not more than $15,000,000 from the prescription advantage program in item 9110-
631 1455 of section 2 and the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E
632 of the General Laws in fiscal year 2026 to support the Medicare Saving or Medicare Buy-In
633 programs established in section 25A of said chapter 118E; provided, however, that the secretary
634 of health and human services shall certify to the house and senate committees on ways and
635 means, not less than 45 days in advance of the transfer, in writing, the amount to be transferred
272

House Ways and Means Committee H.4000
636 and an explanation of the amount of expected savings to those programs resulting from the
637 transfer.
638 SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, payments
639 from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General
640 Laws may be made either as safety net care payments under the commonwealth’s waiver
641 pursuant to section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1315, or as an adjustment
642 to service rate payments under Titles XIX and XXI of the federal Social Security Act or a
643 combination of both. Other federally permissible funding mechanisms available for certain
644 hospitals, as defined by regulations of the executive office of health and human services, may be
645 used to reimburse up to $70,000,000 of uncompensated care pursuant to said section 66 and
646 section 69 of said chapter 118E using sources distinct from the funding made available to the
647 Health Safety Net Trust Fund.
648 SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than
649 October 1, 2025, and without further appropriation, the comptroller shall transfer from the
650 General Fund to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of
651 the General Laws the greater of $45,000,000 or 1/12 of the total expenditures to hospitals and
652 community health centers required pursuant to this act, for the purposes of making initial gross
653 payments to qualifying acute care hospitals for the hospital fiscal year beginning October 1,
654 2025. These payments shall be made to hospitals before, and in anticipation of, the payment by
655 hospitals of their gross liability to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund. Not later than June 30,
656 2026, the comptroller shall transfer from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund to the General Fund
657 the amount of the transfer authorized by this section and any allocation of that amount as
658 certified by the director of the health safety net office established in section 65 of said chapter
659 118E.
660 SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in hospital
661 fiscal year 2026, the office of the inspector general may expend not more than $1,000,000 from
662 the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws
663 for costs associated with maintaining a health safety net audit unit within the office. The unit
664 shall continue to oversee and examine the practices in hospitals, including, but not limited to, the
665 care of the uninsured and the resulting free charges. The unit shall also study and review the
666 Medicaid program pursuant to said chapter 118E, including, but not limited to, a review of the
667 program’s eligibility requirements, utilization, claims administration and compliance with
668 federal mandates. The inspector general shall submit a report to the chairs of the house and
669 senate committees on ways and means on the results of the audits and any other completed
670 analyses not later than March 1, 2026.
671 SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, nursing
672 facility rates effective on October 1, 2025, pursuant to section 13D of chapter 118E of the
673 General Laws, may be developed using the costs of calendar year 2019.
674 SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
675 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, may transfer not more
676 than $15,000,000 from the Commonwealth Care Trust Fund established in section 2OOO of
273

Fiscal Year 2026 Budget Recommendations
677 chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of
678 chapter 118E of the General Laws.
679 SECTION 81. Sections 4, 5 and 24 to 26, inclusive, shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
680 SECTION 82. Section 22 shall take effect on August 1, 2025.
681 SECTION 83. Except as otherwise specified, this act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
274